Arya’s stitches were crooked again.
She frowned down at them with dismay and glanced over to where her sister Sansa sat among the other girls. Sansa’s needlework was exquisite. Everyone said so. “Sansa’s work is as pretty as she is,” Septa Mordane told their lady mother once. “She has such fine, delicate hands.” When Lady Catelyn had asked about Arya, the septa had sniffed. “Arya has the hands of a blacksmith.”
Arya glanced furtively across the room, worried that Septa Mordane might have read her thoughts, but the septa was paying her no attention today. She was sitting with the Princess Myrcella, all smiles and admiration. It was not often that the septa was privileged to instruct a royal princess in the womanly arts, as she had said when the queen brought Myrcella to join them. Arya thought that Myrcella’s stitches looked a little crooked too, but you would never know it from the way Septa Mordane was cooing.
She studied her own work again, looking for some way to salvage it, then sighed and put down the needle. She looked glumly at her sister. Sansa was chatting away happily as she worked. Beth Cassel, Ser Rodrik’s little girl, was sitting by her feet, listening to every word she said, and Jeyne Poole was leaning over to whisper something in her ear.
“What are you talking about?” Arya asked suddenly.
Jeyne gave her a startled look, then giggled. Sansa looked abashed. Beth blushed. No one answered.
“Tell me,” Arya said.
Jeyne glanced over to make certain that Septa Mordane was not listening. Myrcella said something then, and the septa laughed along with the rest of the ladies.
“We were talking about the prince,” Sansa said, her voice soft as a kiss.
Arya knew which prince she meant: Joffrey, of course. The tall, handsome one. Sansa got to sit with him at the feast. Arya had to sit with the little fat one. Naturally.
“Joffrey likes your sister,” Jeyne whispered, proud as if she had something to do with it. She was the daughter of Winterfell’s steward and Sansa’s dearest friend. “He told her she was very beautiful.”
“He’s going to marry her,” little Beth said dreamily, hugging herself. “Then Sansa will be queen of all the realm.”
Sansa had the grace to blush. She blushed prettily. She did everything prettily, Arya thought with dull resentment. “Beth, you shouldn’t make up stories,” Sansa corrected the younger girl, gently stroking her hair to take the harshness out of her words. She looked at Arya. “What did you think of Prince Joff, sister? He’s very gallant, don’t you think?”
“Jon says he looks like a girl,” Arya said.
Sansa sighed as she stitched. “Poor Jon,” she said. “He gets jealous because he’s a bastard.”
“He’s our brother,” Arya said, much too loudly. Her voice cut through the afternoon quiet of the tower room.
Septa Mordane raised her eyes. She had a bony face, sharp eyes, and a thin lipless mouth made for frowning. It was frowning now. “What are you talking about, children?”
“Our half brother,” Sansa corrected, soft and precise. She smiled for the septa. “Arya and I were remarking on how pleased we were to have the princess with us today,” she said.
Septa Mordane nodded. “Indeed. A great honor for us all.” Princess Myrcella smiled uncertainly at the compliment. “Arya, why aren’t you at work?” the septa asked. She rose to her feet, starched skirts rustling as she started across the room. “Let me see your stitches.”
Arya wanted to scream. It was just like Sansa to go and attract the septa’s attention. “Here,” she said, surrendering up her work.
The septa examined the fabric. “Arya, Arya, Arya,” she said. “This will not do. This will not do at all.”
Everyone was looking at her. It was too much. Sansa was too well bred to smile at her sister’s disgrace, but Jeyne was smirking on her behalf. Even Princess Myrcella looked sorry for her. Arya felt tears filling her eyes. She pushed herself out of her chair and bolted for the door.
Septa Mordane called after her. “Arya, come back here! Don’t you take another step! Your lady mother will hear of this. In front of our royal princess too! You’ll shame us all!”
Arya stopped at the door and turned back, biting her lip. The tears were running down her cheeks now. She managed a stiff little bow to Myrcella. “By your leave, my lady.”
Myrcella blinked at her and looked to her ladies for guidance. But if she was uncertain, Septa Mordane was not. “Just where do you think you are going, Arya?” the septa demanded.
Arya glared at her. “I have to go shoe a horse,” she said sweetly, taking a brief satisfaction in the shock on the septa’s face. Then she whirled and made her exit, running down the steps as fast as her feet would take her.
It wasn’t fair. Sansa had everything. Sansa was two years older; maybe by the time Arya had been born, there had been nothing left. Often it felt that way. Sansa could sew and dance and sing. She wrote poetry. She knew how to dress. She played the high harp and the bells. Worse, she was beautiful. Sansa had gotten their mother’s fine high cheekbones and the thick auburn hair of the Tullys. Arya took after their lord father. Her hair was a lusterless brown, and her face was long and solemn. Jeyne used to call her Arya Horseface, and neigh whenever she came near. It hurt that the one thing Arya could do better than her sister was ride a horse. Well, that and manage a household. Sansa had never had much of a head for figures. If she did marry Prince Joff, Arya hoped for his sake that he had a good steward.
Nymeria was waiting for her in the guardroom at the base of the stairs. She bounded to her feet as soon as she caught sight of Arya. Arya grinned. The wolf pup loved her, even if no one else did. They went everywhere together, and Nymeria slept in her room, at the foot of her bed. If Mother had not forbidden it, Arya would gladly have taken the wolf with her to needlework. Let Septa Mordane complain about her stitches then.
Nymeria nipped eagerly at her hand as Arya untied her. She had yellow eyes. When they caught the sunlight, they gleamed like two golden coins. Arya had named her after the warrior queen of the Rhoyne, who had led her people across the narrow sea. That had been a great scandal too. Sansa, of course, had named her pup “Lady.” Arya made a face and hugged the wolfling tight. Nymeria licked her ear, and she giggled.
By now Septa Mordane would certainly have sent word to her lady mother. If she went to her room, they would find her. Arya did not care to be found. She had a better notion. The boys were at practice in the yard. She wanted to see Robb put gallant Prince Joffrey flat on his back. “Come,” she whispered to Nymeria. She got up and ran, the wolf coming hard at her heels.
There was a window in the covered bridge between the armory and the Great Keep where you had a view of the whole yard. That was where they headed.
They arrived, flushed and breathless, to find Jon seated on the sill, one leg drawn up languidly to his chin. He was watching the action, so absorbed that he seemed unaware of her approach until his white wolf moved to meet them. Nymeria stalked closer on wary feet. Ghost, already larger than his litter mates, smelled her, gave her ear a careful nip, and settled back down.
Jon gave her a curious look. “Shouldn’t you be working on your stitches, little sister?”
Arya made a face at him. “I wanted to see them fight.”
He smiled. “Come here, then.”
Arya climbed up on the window and sat beside him, to a chorus of thuds and grunts from the yard below.
To her disappointment, it was the younger boys drilling. Bran was so heavily padded he looked as though he had belted on a featherbed, and Prince Tommen, who was plump to begin with, seemed positively round. They were huffing and puffing and hitting at each other with padded wooden swords under the watchful eye of old Ser Rodrik Cassel, the master-at-arms, a great stout keg of a man with magnificent white cheek whiskers. A dozen spectators, man and boy, were calling out encouragement, Robb’s voice the loudest among them. She spotted Theon Greyjoy beside him, his black doublet emblazoned with the golden kraken of his House, a look of wry contempt on his face. Both of the combatants were staggering. Arya judged that they had been at it awhile.
“A shade more exhausting than needlework,” Jon observed.
“A shade more fun than needlework,” Arya gave back at him. Jon grinned, reached over, and messed up her hair. Arya flushed. They had always been close. Jon had their father’s face, as she did. They were the only ones. Robb and Sansa and Bran and even little Rickon all took after the Tullys, with easy smiles and fire in their hair. When Arya had been little, she had been afraid that meant that she was a bastard too. It had been Jon she had gone to in her fear, and Jon who had reassured her.
“Why aren’t you down in the yard?” Arya asked him.
He gave her a half smile. “Bastards are not allowed to damage young princes,” he said. “Any bruises they take in the practice yard must come from trueborn swords.”
“Oh.” Arya felt abashed. She should have realized. For the second time today, Arya reflected that life was not fair.
She watched her little brother whack at Tommen. “I could do just as good as Bran,” she said. “He’s only seven. I’m nine.”
Jon looked her over with all his fourteen-year-old wisdom. “You’re too skinny,” he said. He took her arm to feel her muscle. Then he sighed and shook his head. “I doubt you could even lift a longsword, little sister, never mind swing one.”
Arya snatched back her arm and glared at him. Jon messed up her hair again. They watched Bran and Tommen circle each other.
“You see Prince Joffrey?” Jon asked.
She hadn’t, not at first glance, but when she looked again she found him to the back, under the shade of the high stone wall. He was surrounded by men she did not recognize, young squires in the livery of Lannister and Baratheon, strangers all. There were a few older men among them; knights, she surmised.
“Look at the arms on his surcoat,” Jon suggested.
Arya looked. An ornate shield had been embroidered on the prince’s padded surcoat. No doubt the needlework was exquisite. The arms were divided down the middle; on one side was the crowned stag of the royal House, on the other the lion of Lannister.
“The Lannisters are proud,” Jon observed. “You’d think the royal sigil would be sufficient, but no. He makes his mother’s House equal in honor to the king’s.”
“The woman is important too!” Arya protested.
Jon chuckled. “Perhaps you should do the same thing, little sister. Wed Tully to Stark in your arms.”
“A wolf with a fish in its mouth?” It made her laugh. “That would look silly. Besides, if a girl can’t fight, why should she have a coat of arms?”
Jon shrugged. “Girls get the arms but not the swords. Bastards get the swords but not the arms. I did not make the rules, little sister.”
There was a shout from the courtyard below. Prince Tommen was rolling in the dust, trying to get up and failing. All the padding made him look like a turtle on its back. Bran was standing over him with upraised wooden sword, ready to whack him again once he regained his feet. The men began to laugh.
“Enough!” Ser Rodrik called out. He gave the prince a hand and yanked him back to his feet. “Well fought. Lew, Donnis, help them out of their armor.” He looked around. “Prince Joffrey, Robb, will you go another round?”
Robb, already sweaty from a previous bout, moved forward eagerly. “Gladly.”
Joffrey moved into the sunlight in response to Rodrik’s summons. His hair shone like spun gold. He looked bored. “This is a game for children, Ser Rodrik.”
Theon Greyjoy gave a sudden bark of laughter. “You are children,” he said derisively.
“Robb may be a child,” Joffrey said. “I am a prince. And I grow tired of swatting at Starks with a play sword.”
“You got more swats than you gave, Joff,” Robb said. “Are you afraid?”
Prince Joffrey looked at him. “Oh, terrified,” he said. “You’re so much older.” Some of the Lannister men laughed.
Jon looked down on the scene with a frown. “Joffrey is truly a little shit,” he told Arya.
Ser Rodrik tugged thoughtfully at his white whiskers. “What are you suggesting?” he asked the prince.
“Live steel.”
“Done,” Robb shot back. “You’ll be sorry!”
The master-at-arms put a hand on Robb’s shoulder to quiet him. “Live steel is too dangerous. I will permit you tourney swords, with blunted edges.”
Joffrey said nothing, but a man strange to Arya, a tall knight with black hair and burn scars on his face, pushed forward in front of the prince. “This is your prince. Who are you to tell him he may not have an edge on his sword, ser?”
“Master-at-arms of Winterfell, Clegane, and you would do well not to forget it.”
“Are you training women here?” the burned man wanted to know. He was muscled like a bull.
“I am training knights,” Ser Rodrik said pointedly. “They will have steel when they are ready. When they are of an age.”
The burned man looked at Robb. “How old are you, boy?”
“Fourteen,” Robb said.
“I killed a man at twelve. You can be sure it was not with a blunt sword.”
Arya could see Robb bristle. His pride was wounded. He turned on Ser Rodrik. “Let me do it. I can beat him.”
“Beat him with a tourney blade, then,” Ser Rodrik said.
Joffrey shrugged. “Come and see me when you’re older, Stark. If you’re not too old.” There was laughter from the Lannister men.
Robb’s curses rang through the yard. Arya covered her mouth in shock. Theon Greyjoy seized Robb’s arm to keep him away from the prince. Ser Rodrik tugged at his whiskers in dismay.
Joffrey feigned a yawn and turned to his younger brother. “Come, Tommen,” he said. “The hour of play is done. Leave the children to their frolics.”
That brought more laughter from the Lannisters, more curses from Robb. Ser Rodrik’s face was beet-red with fury under the white of his whiskers. Theon kept Robb locked in an iron grip until the princes and their party were safely away.
Jon watched them leave, and Arya watched Jon. His face had grown as still as the pool at the heart of the godswood. Finally he climbed down off the window. “The show is done,” he said. He bent to scratch Ghost behind the ears. The white wolf rose and rubbed against him. “You had best run back to your room, little sister. Septa Mordane will surely be lurking. The longer you hide, the sterner the penance. You’ll be sewing all through winter. When the spring thaw comes, they will find your body with a needle still locked tight between your frozen fingers.”
Arya didn’t think it was funny. “I hate needlework!” she said with passion. “It’s not fair!”
“Nothing is fair,” Jon said. He messed up her hair again and walked away from her, Ghost moving silently beside him. Nymeria started to follow too, then stopped and came back when she saw that Arya was not coming.
Reluctantly she turned in the other direction.
It was worse than Jon had thought. It wasn’t Septa Mordane waiting in her room. It was Septa Mordane and her mother.

Her father had been fighting with the council again. Arya could see it on his face when he came to table, late again, as he had been so often. The first course, a thick sweet soup made with pumpkins, had already been taken away when Ned Stark strode into the Small Hall. They called it that to set it apart from the Great Hall, where the king could feast a thousand, but it was a long room with a high vaulted ceiling and bench space for two hundred at its trestle tables.
“My lord,” Jory said when Father entered. He rose to his feet, and the rest of the guard rose with him. Each man wore a new cloak, heavy grey wool with a white satin border. A hand of beaten silver clutched the woolen folds of each cloak and marked their wearers as men of the Hand’s household guard. There were only fifty of them, so most of the benches were empty.
“Be seated,” Eddard Stark said. “I see you have started without me. I am pleased to know there are still some men of sense in this city.” He signaled for the meal to resume. The servants began bringing out platters of ribs, roasted in a crust of garlic and herbs.
“The talk in the yard is we shall have a tourney, my lord,” Jory said as he resumed his seat. “They say that knights will come from all over the realm to joust and feast in honor of your appointment as Hand of the King.”
Arya could see that her father was not very happy about that. “Do they also say this is the last thing in the world I would have wished?”
Sansa’s eyes had grown wide as the plates. “A tourney,” she breathed. She was seated between Septa Mordane and Jeyne Poole, as far from Arya as she could get without drawing a reproach from Father. “Will we be permitted to go, Father?”
“You know my feelings, Sansa. It seems I must arrange Robert’s games and pretend to be honored for his sake. That does not mean I must subject my daughters to this folly.”
“Oh, please,” Sansa said. “I want to see.”
Septa Mordane spoke up. “Princess Myrcella will be there, my lord, and her younger than Lady Sansa. All the ladies of the court will be expected at a grand event like this, and as the tourney is in your honor, it would look queer if your family did not attend.”
Father looked pained. “I suppose so. Very well, I shall arrange a place for you, Sansa.” He saw Arya. “For both of you.”
“I don’t care about their stupid tourney,” Arya said. She knew Prince Joffrey would be there, and she hated Prince Joffrey.
Sansa lifted her head. “It will be a splendid event. You shan’t be wanted.”
Anger flashed across Father’s face. “Enough, Sansa. More of that and you will change my mind. I am weary unto death of this endless war you two are fighting. You are sisters. I expect you to behave like sisters, is that understood?”
Sansa bit her lip and nodded. Arya lowered her face to stare sullenly at her plate. She could feel tears stinging her eyes. She rubbed them away angrily, determined not to cry.
The only sound was the clatter of knives and forks. “Pray excuse me,” her father announced to the table. “I find I have small appetite tonight.” He walked from the hall.
After he was gone, Sansa exchanged excited whispers with Jeyne Poole. Down the table Jory laughed at a joke, and Hullen started in about horseflesh. “Your warhorse, now, he may not be the best one for the joust. Not the same thing, oh, no, not the same at all.” The men had heard it all before; Desmond, Jacks, and Hullen’s son Harwin shouted him down together, and Porther called for more wine.
No one talked to Arya. She didn’t care. She liked it that way. She would have eaten her meals alone in her bedchamber if they let her. Sometimes they did, when Father had to dine with the king or some lord or the envoys from this place or that place. The rest of the time, they ate in his solar, just him and her and Sansa. That was when Arya missed her brothers most. She wanted to tease Bran and play with baby Rickon and have Robb smile at her. She wanted Jon to muss up her hair and call her “little sister” and finish her sentences with her. But all of them were gone. She had no one left but Sansa, and Sansa wouldn’t even talk to her unless Father made her.
Back at Winterfell, they had eaten in the Great Hall almost half the time. Her father used to say that a lord needed to eat with his men, if he hoped to keep them. “Know the men who follow you,” she heard him tell Robb once, “and let them know you. Don’t ask your men to die for a stranger.” At Winterfell, he always had an extra seat set at his own table, and every day a different man would be asked to join him. One night it would be Vayon Poole, and the talk would be coppers and bread stores and servants. The next time it would be Mikken, and her father would listen to him go on about armor and swords and how hot a forge should be and the best way to temper steel. Another day it might be Hullen with his endless horse talk, or Septon Chayle from the library, or Jory, or Ser Rodrik, or even Old Nan with her stories.
Arya had loved nothing better than to sit at her father’s table and listen to them talk. She had loved listening to the men on the benches too; to freeriders tough as leather, courtly knights and bold young squires, grizzled old men-at-arms. She used to throw snowballs at them and help them steal pies from the kitchen. Their wives gave her scones and she invented names for their babies and played monsters-and-maidens and hide-the-treasure and come-into-my-castle with their children. Fat Tom used to call her “Arya Underfoot,” because he said that was where she always was. She’d liked that a lot better than “Arya Horseface.”
Only that was Winterfell, a world away, and now everything was changed. This was the first time they had supped with the men since arriving in King’s Landing. Arya hated it. She hated the sounds of their voices now, the way they laughed, the stories they told. They’d been her friends, she’d felt safe around them, but now she knew that was a lie. They’d let the queen kill Lady, that was horrible enough, but then the Hound found Mycah. Jeyne Poole had told Arya that he’d cut him up in so many pieces that they’d given him back to the butcher in a bag, and at first the poor man had thought it was a pig they’d slaughtered. And no one had raised a voice or drawn a blade or anything, not Harwin who always talked so bold, or Alyn who was going to be a knight, or Jory who was captain of the guard. Not even her father.
“He was my friend,” Arya whispered into her plate, so low that no one could hear. Her ribs sat there untouched, grown cold now, a thin film of grease congealing beneath them on the plate. Arya looked at them and felt ill. She pushed away from the table.
“Pray, where do you think you are going, young lady?” Septa Mordane asked.
“I’m not hungry.” Arya found it an effort to remember her courtesies. “May I be excused, please?” she recited stiffly.
“You may not,” the septa said. “You have scarcely touched your food. You will sit down and clean your plate.”
“You clean it!” Before anyone could stop her, Arya bolted for the door as the men laughed and Septa Mordane called loudly after her, her voice rising higher and higher.
Fat Tom was at his post, guarding the door to the Tower of the Hand. He blinked when he saw Arya rushing toward him and heard the septa’s shouts. “Here now, little one, hold on,” he started to say, reaching, but Arya slid between his legs and then she was running up the winding tower steps, her feet hammering on the stone while Fat Tom huffed and puffed behind her.
Her bedchamber was the only place that Arya liked in all of King’s Landing, and the thing she liked best about it was the door, a massive slab of dark oak with black iron bands. When she slammed that door and dropped the heavy crossbar, nobody could get into her room, not Septa Mordane or Fat Tom or Sansa or Jory or the Hound, nobody! She slammed it now.
When the bar was down, Arya finally felt safe enough to cry.
She went to the window seat and sat there, sniffling, hating them all, and herself most of all. It was all her fault, everything bad that had happened. Sansa said so, and Jeyne too.
Fat Tom was knocking on her door. “Arya girl, what’s wrong?” he called out. “You in there?”
“No!” she shouted. The knocking stopped. A moment later she heard him going away. Fat Tom was always easy to fool.
Arya went to the chest at the foot of her bed. She knelt, opened the lid, and began pulling her clothes out with both hands, grabbing handfuls of silk and satin and velvet and wool and tossing them on the floor. It was there at the bottom of the chest, where she’d hidden it. Arya lifted it out almost tenderly and drew the slender blade from its sheath.
Needle.
She thought of Mycah again and her eyes filled with tears. Her fault, her fault, her fault. If she had never asked him to play at swords with her …
There was a pounding at her door, louder than before. “Arya Stark, you open this door at once, do you hear me?”
Arya spun around, with Needle in her hand. “You better not come in here!” she warned. She slashed at the air savagely.
“The Hand will hear of this!” Septa Mordane raged.
“I don’t care,” Arya screamed. “Go away.”
“You will rue this insolent behavior, young lady, I promise you that.” Arya listened at the door until she heard the sound of the septa’s receding footsteps.
She went back to the window, Needle in hand, and looked down into the courtyard below. If only she could climb like Bran, she thought; she would go out the window and down the tower, run away from this horrible place, away from Sansa and Septa Mordane and Prince Joffrey, from all of them. Steal some food from the kitchens, take Needle and her good boots and a warm cloak. She could find Nymeria in the wild woods below the Trident, and together they’d return to Winterfell, or run to Jon on the Wall. She found herself wishing that Jon was here with her now. Then maybe she wouldn’t feel so alone.
A soft knock at the door behind her turned Arya away from the window and her dreams of escape. “Arya,” her father’s voice called out. “Open the door. We need to talk.”
Arya crossed the room and lifted the crossbar. Father was alone. He seemed more sad than angry. That made Arya feel even worse. “May I come in?” Arya nodded, then dropped her eyes, ashamed. Father closed the door. “Whose sword is that?”
“Mine.” Arya had almost forgotten Needle, in her hand.
“Give it to me.”
Reluctantly Arya surrendered her sword, wondering if she would ever hold it again. Her father turned it in the light, examining both sides of the blade. He tested the point with his thumb. “A bravo’s blade,” he said. “Yet it seems to me that I know this maker’s mark. This is Mikken’s work.”
Arya could not lie to him. She lowered her eyes.
Lord Eddard Stark sighed. “My nine-year-old daughter is being armed from my own forge, and I know nothing of it. The Hand of the King is expected to rule the Seven Kingdoms, yet it seems I cannot even rule my own household. How is it that you come to own a sword, Arya? Where did you get this?”
Arya chewed her lip and said nothing. She would not betray Jon, not even to their father.
After a while, Father said, “I don’t suppose it matters, truly.” He looked down gravely at the sword in his hands. “This is no toy for children, least of all for a girl. What would Septa Mordane say if she knew you were playing with swords?”
“I wasn’t playing,” Arya insisted. “I hate Septa Mordane.”
“That’s enough.” Her father’s voice was curt and hard. “The septa is doing no more than is her duty, though gods know you have made it a struggle for the poor woman. Your mother and I have charged her with the impossible task of making you a lady.”
“I don’t want to be a lady!” Arya flared.
“I ought to snap this toy across my knee here and now, and put an end to this nonsense.”
“Needle wouldn’t break,” Arya said defiantly, but her voice betrayed her words.
“It has a name, does it?” Her father sighed. “Ah, Arya. You have a wildness in you, child. ‘The wolf blood,’ my father used to call it. Lyanna had a touch of it, and my brother Brandon more than a touch. It brought them both to an early grave.” Arya heard sadness in his voice; he did not often speak of his father, or of the brother and sister who had died before she was born. “Lyanna might have carried a sword, if my lord father had allowed it. You remind me of her sometimes. You even look like her.”
“Lyanna was beautiful,” Arya said, startled. Everybody said so. It was not a thing that was ever said of Arya.
“She was,” Eddard Stark agreed, “beautiful, and willful, and dead before her time.” He lifted the sword, held it out between them. “Arya, what did you think to do with this … Needle? Who did you hope to skewer? Your sister? Septa Mordane? Do you know the first thing about sword fighting?”
All she could think of was the lesson Jon had given her. “Stick them with the pointy end,” she blurted out.
Her father snorted back laughter. “That is the essence of it, I suppose.”
Arya desperately wanted to explain, to make him see. “I was trying to learn, but …” Her eyes filled with tears. “I asked Mycah to practice with me.” The grief came on her all at once. She turned away, shaking. “I asked him,” she cried. “It was my fault, it was me …”
Suddenly her father’s arms were around her. He held her gently as she turned to him and sobbed against his chest. “No, sweet one,” he murmured. “Grieve for your friend, but never blame yourself. You did not kill the butcher’s boy. That murder lies at the Hound’s door, him and the cruel woman he serves.”
“I hate them,” Arya confided, red-faced, sniffling. “The Hound and the queen and the king and Prince Joffrey. I hate all of them. Joffrey lied, it wasn’t the way he said. I hate Sansa too. She did remember, she just lied so Joffrey would like her.”
“We all lie,” her father said. “Or did you truly think I’d believe that Nymeria ran off?”
Arya blushed guiltily. “Jory promised not to tell.”
“Jory kept his word,” her father said with a smile. “There are some things I do not need to be told. Even a blind man could see that wolf would never have left you willingly.”
“We had to throw rocks,” she said miserably. “I told her to run, to go be free, that I didn’t want her anymore. There were other wolves for her to play with, we heard them howling, and Jory said the woods were full of game, so she’d have deer to hunt. Only she kept following, and finally we had to throw rocks. I hit her twice. She whined and looked at me and I felt so ’shamed, but it was right, wasn’t it? The queen would have killed her.”
“It was right,” her father said. “And even the lie was … not without honor.” He’d put Needle aside when he went to Arya to embrace her. Now he took the blade up again and walked to the window, where he stood for a moment, looking out across the courtyard. When he turned back, his eyes were thoughtful. He seated himself on the window seat, Needle across his lap. “Arya, sit down. I need to try and explain some things to you.”
She perched anxiously on the edge of her bed. “You are too young to be burdened with all my cares,” he told her, “but you are also a Stark of Winterfell. You know our words.”
“Winter is coming,” Arya whispered.
“The hard cruel times,” her father said. “We tasted them on the Trident, child, and when Bran fell. You were born in the long summer, sweet one, you’ve never known anything else, but now the winter is truly coming. Remember the sigil of our House, Arya.”
“The direwolf,” she said, thinking of Nymeria. She hugged her knees against her chest, suddenly afraid.
“Let me tell you something about wolves, child. When the snows fall and the white winds blow, the lone wolf dies, but the pack survives. Summer is the time for squabbles. In winter, we must protect one another, keep each other warm, share our strengths. So if you must hate, Arya, hate those who would truly do us harm. Septa Mordane is a good woman, and Sansa … Sansa is your sister. You may be as different as the sun and the moon, but the same blood flows through both your hearts. You need her, as she needs you … and I need both of you, gods help me.”
He sounded so tired that it made Arya sad. “I don’t hate Sansa,” she told him. “Not truly.” It was only half a lie.
“I do not mean to frighten you, but neither will I lie to you. We have come to a dark dangerous place, child. This is not Winterfell. We have enemies who mean us ill. We cannot fight a war among ourselves. This willfulness of yours, the running off, the angry words, the disobedience … at home, these were only the summer games of a child. Here and now, with winter soon upon us, that is a different matter. It is time to begin growing up.”
“I will,” Arya vowed. She had never loved him so much as she did in that instant. “I can be strong too. I can be as strong as Robb.”
He held Needle out to her, hilt first. “Here.”
She looked at the sword with wonder in her eyes. For a moment she was afraid to touch it, afraid that if she reached for it it would be snatched away again, but then her father said, “Go on, it’s yours,” and she took it in her hand.
“I can keep it?” she said. “For true?”
“For true.” He smiled. “If I took it away, no doubt I’d find a morningstar hidden under your pillow within the fortnight. Try not to stab your sister, whatever the provocation.”
“I won’t. I promise.” Arya clutched Needle tightly to her chest as her father took his leave.
The next morning, as they broke their fast, she apologized to Septa Mordane and asked for her pardon. The septa peered at her suspiciously, but Father nodded.
Three days later, at midday, her father’s steward Vayon Poole sent Arya to the Small Hall. The trestle tables had been dismantled and the benches shoved against the walls. The hall seemed empty, until an unfamiliar voice said, “You are late, boy.” A slight man with a bald head and a great beak of a nose stepped out of the shadows, holding a pair of slender wooden swords. “Tomorrow you will be here at midday,” He had an accent, the lilt of the Free Cities, Braavos perhaps, or Myr.
“Who are you?” Arya asked.
“I am your dancing master.” He tossed her one of the wooden blades. She grabbed for it, missed, and heard it clatter to the floor. “Tomorrow you will catch it. Now pick it up.”
It was not just a stick, but a true wooden sword complete with grip and guard and pommel. Arya picked it up and clutched it nervously with both hands, holding it out in front of her. It was heavier than it looked, much heavier than Needle.
The bald man clicked his teeth together. “That is not the way, boy. This is not a greatsword that is needing two hands to swing it. You will take the blade in one hand.”
“It’s too heavy,” Arya said.
“It is heavy as it needs to be to make you strong, and for the balancing. A hollow inside is filled with lead, just so. One hand now is all that is needing.”
Arya took her right hand off the grip and wiped her sweaty palm on her pants. She held the sword in her left hand. He seemed to approve. “The left is good. All is reversed, it will make your enemies more awkward. Now you are standing wrong. Turn your body sideface, yes, so. You are skinny as the shaft of a spear, do you know. That is good too, the target is smaller. Now the grip. Let me see.” He moved closer and peered at her hand, prying her fingers apart, rearranging them. “Just so, yes. Do not squeeze it so tight, no, the grip must be deft, delicate.”
“What if I drop it?” Arya said.
“The steel must be part of your arm,” the bald man told her. “Can you drop part of your arm? No. Nine years Syrio Forel was first sword to the Sealord of Braavos, he knows these things. Listen to him, boy.”
It was the third time he had called her “boy.” “I’m a girl,” Arya objected.
“Boy, girl,” Syrio Forel said. “You are a sword, that is all.” He clicked his teeth together. “Just so, that is the grip. You are not holding a battle-axe, you are holding a—”
“—needle,” Arya finished for him, fiercely.
“Just so. Now we will begin the dance. Remember, child, this is not the iron dance of Westeros we are learning, the knight’s dance, hacking and hammering, no. This is the bravo’s dance, the water dance, swift and sudden. All men are made of water, do you know this? When you pierce them, the water leaks out and they die.” He took a step backward, raised his own wooden blade. “Now you will try to strike me.”
Arya tried to strike him. She tried for four hours, until every muscle in her body was sore and aching, while Syrio Forel clicked his teeth together and told her what to do.
The next day their real work began.

The one-eared black tom arched his back and hissed at her.
Arya padded down the alley, balanced lightly on the balls of her bare feet, listening to the flutter of her heart, breathing slow deep breaths. Quiet as a shadow, she told herself, light as a feather. The tomcat watched her come, his eyes wary.
Catching cats was hard. Her hands were covered with half-healed scratches, and both knees were scabbed over where she had scraped them raw in tumbles. At first even the cook’s huge fat kitchen cat had been able to elude her, but Syrio had kept her at it day and night. When she’d run to him with her hands bleeding, he had said, “So slow? Be quicker, girl. Your enemies will give you more than scratches.” He had dabbed her wounds with Myrish fire, which burned so bad she had had to bite her lip to keep from screaming. Then he sent her out after more cats.
The Red Keep was full of cats: lazy old cats dozing in the sun, cold-eyed mousers twitching their tails, quick little kittens with claws like needles, ladies’ cats all combed and trusting, ragged shadows prowling the midden heaps. One by one Arya had chased them down and snatched them up and brought them proudly to Syrio Forel … all but this one, this one-eared black devil of a tomcat. “That’s the real king of this castle right there,” one of the gold cloaks had told her. “Older than sin and twice as mean. One time, the king was feasting the queen’s father, and that black bastard hopped up on the table and snatched a roast quail right out of Lord Tywin’s fingers. Robert laughed so hard he like to burst. You stay away from that one, child.”
He had run her halfway across the castle; twice around the Tower of the Hand, across the inner bailey, through the stables, down the serpentine steps, past the small kitchen and the pig yard and the barracks of the gold cloaks, along the base of the river wall and up more steps and back and forth over Traitor’s Walk, and then down again and through a gate and around a well and in and out of strange buildings until Arya didn’t know where she was.
Now at last she had him. High walls pressed close on either side, and ahead was a blank windowless mass of stone. Quiet as a shadow, she repeated, sliding forward, light as a feather.
When she was three steps away from him, the tomcat bolted. Left, then right, he went; and right, then left, went Arya, cutting off his escape. He hissed again and tried to dart between her legs. Quick as a snake, she thought. Her hands closed around him. She hugged him to her chest, whirling and laughing aloud as his claws raked at the front of her leather jerkin. Ever so fast, she kissed him right between the eyes, and jerked her head back an instant before his claws would have found her face. The tomcat yowled and spit.
“What’s he doing to that cat?”
Startled, Arya dropped the cat and whirled toward the voice. The tom bounded off in the blink of an eye. At the end of the alley stood a girl with a mass of golden curls, dressed as pretty as a doll in blue satin. Beside her was a plump little blond boy with a prancing stag sewn in pearls across the front of his doublet and a miniature sword at his belt. Princess Myrcella and Prince Tommen, Arya thought. A septa as large as a draft horse hovered over them, and behind her two big men in crimson cloaks, Lannister house guards.
“What were you doing to that cat, boy?” Myrcella asked again, sternly. To her brother she said, “He’s a ragged boy, isn’t he? Look at him.” She giggled.
“A ragged dirty smelly boy,” Tommen agreed.
They don’t know me, Arya realized. They don’t even know I’m a girl. Small wonder; she was barefoot and dirty, her hair tangled from the long run through the castle, clad in a jerkin ripped by cat claws and brown roughspun pants hacked off above her scabby knees. You don’t wear skirts and silks when you’re catching cats. Quickly she lowered her head and dropped to one knee. Maybe they wouldn’t recognize her. If they did, she would never hear the end of it. Septa Mordane would be mortified, and Sansa would never speak to her again from the shame.
The old fat septa moved forward. “Boy, how did you come here? You have no business in this part of the castle.”
“You can’t keep this sort out,” one of the red cloaks said. “Like trying to keep out rats.”
“Who do you belong to, boy?” the septa demanded. “Answer me. What’s wrong with you, are you mute?”
Arya’s voice caught in her throat. If she answered, Tommen and Myrcella would know her for certain.
“Godwyn, bring him here,” the septa said. The taller of the guardsmen started down the alley.
Panic gripped her throat like a giant’s hand. Arya could not have spoken if her life had hung on it. Calm as still water, she mouthed silently.
As Godwyn reached for her, Arya moved. Quick as a snake. She leaned to her left, letting his fingers brush her arm, spinning around him. Smooth as summer silk. By the time he got himself turned, she was sprinting down the alley. Swift as a deer. The septa was screeching at her. Arya slid between legs as thick and white as marble columns, bounded to her feet, bowled into Prince Tommen and hopped over him when he sat down hard and said “Oof,” spun away from the second guard, and then she was past them all, running full out.
She heard shouts, then pounding footsteps, closing behind her. She dropped and rolled. The red cloak went careening past her, stumbling. Arya sprang back to her feet. She saw a window above her, high and narrow, scarcely more than an arrow slit. Arya leapt, caught the sill, pulled herself up. She held her breath as she wriggled through. Slippery as an eel. Dropping to the floor in front of a startled scrubwoman, she hopped up, brushed the rushes off her clothes, and was off again, out the door and along a long hall, down a stair, across a hidden courtyard, around a corner and over a wall and through a low narrow window into a pitch-dark cellar. The sounds grew more and more distant behind her.
Arya was out of breath and quite thoroughly lost. She was in for it now if they had recognized her, but she didn’t think they had. She’d moved too fast. Swift as a deer.
She hunkered down in the dark against a damp stone wall and listened for the pursuit, but the only sound was the beating of her own heart and a distant drip of water. Quiet as a shadow, she told herself. She wondered where she was. When they had first come to King’s Landing, she used to have bad dreams about getting lost in the castle. Father said the Red Keep was smaller than Winterfell, but in her dreams it had been immense, an endless stone maze with walls that seemed to shift and change behind her. She would find herself wandering down gloomy halls past faded tapestries, descending endless circular stairs, darting through courtyards or over bridges, her shouts echoing unanswered. In some of the rooms the red stone walls would seem to drip blood, and nowhere could she find a window. Sometimes she would hear her father’s voice, but always from a long way off, and no matter how hard she ran after it, it would grow fainter and fainter, until it faded to nothing and Arya was alone in the dark.
It was very dark right now, she realized. She hugged her bare knees tight against her chest and shivered. She would wait quietly and count to ten thousand. By then it would be safe for her to come creeping back out and find her way home.
By the time she had reached eighty-seven, the room had begun to lighten as her eyes adjusted to the blackness. Slowly the shapes around her took on form. Huge empty eyes stared at her hungrily through the gloom, and dimly she saw the jagged shadows of long teeth. She had lost the count. She closed her eyes and bit her lip and sent the fear away. When she looked again, the monsters would be gone. Would never have been. She pretended that Syrio was beside her in the dark, whispering in her ear. Calm as still water, she told herself. Strong as a bear. Fierce as a wolverine. She opened her eyes again.
The monsters were still there, but the fear was gone.
Arya got to her feet, moving warily. The heads were all around her. She touched one, curious, wondering if it was real. Her fingertips brushed a massive jaw. It felt real enough. The bone was smooth beneath her hand, cold and hard to the touch. She ran her fingers down a tooth, black and sharp, a dagger made of darkness. It made her shiver.
“It’s dead,” she said aloud. “It’s just a skull, it can’t hurt me.” Yet somehow the monster seemed to know she was there. She could feel its empty eyes watching her through the gloom, and there was something in that dim, cavernous room that did not love her. She edged away from the skull and backed into a second, larger than the first. For an instant she could feel its teeth digging into her shoulder, as if it wanted a bite of her flesh. Arya whirled, felt leather catch and tear as a huge fang nipped at her jerkin, and then she was running. Another skull loomed ahead, the biggest monster of all, but Arya did not even slow. She leapt over a ridge of black teeth as tall as swords, dashed through hungry jaws, and threw herself against the door.
Her hands found a heavy iron ring set in the wood, and she yanked at it. The door resisted a moment, before it slowly began to swing inward, with a creak so loud Arya was certain it could be heard all through the city. She opened the door just far enough to slip through, into the hallway beyond.
If the room with the monsters had been dark, the hall was the blackest pit in the seven hells. Calm as still water, Arya told herself, but even when she gave her eyes a moment to adjust, there was nothing to see but the vague grey outline of the door she had come through. She wiggled her fingers in front of her face, felt the air move, saw nothing. She was blind. A water dancer sees with all her senses, she reminded herself. She closed her eyes and steadied her breathing one two three, drank in the quiet, reached out with her hands.
Her fingers brushed against rough unfinished stone to her left. She followed the wall, her hand skimming along the surface, taking small gliding steps through the darkness. All halls lead somewhere. Where there is a way in, there is a way out. Fear cuts deeper than swords. Arya would not be afraid. It seemed as if she had been walking a long ways when the wall ended abruptly and a draft of cold air blew past her cheek. Loose hairs stirred faintly against her skin.
From somewhere far below her, she heard noises. The scrape of boots, the distant sound of voices. A flickering light brushed the wall ever so faintly, and she saw that she stood at the top of a great black well, a shaft twenty feet across plunging deep into the earth. Huge stones had been set into the curving walls as steps, circling down and down, dark as the steps to hell that Old Nan used to tell them of. And something was coming up out of the darkness, out of the bowels of the earth …
Arya peered over the edge and felt the cold black breath on her face. Far below, she saw the light of a single torch, small as the flame of a candle. Two men, she made out. Their shadows writhed against the sides of the well, tall as giants. She could hear their voices, echoing up the shaft.
“…   found one bastard,” one said. “The rest will come soon. A day, two days, a fortnight …”
“And when he learns the truth, what will he do?” a second voice asked in the liquid accents of the Free Cities.
“The gods alone know,” the first voice said. Arya could see a wisp of grey smoke drifting up off the torch, writhing like a snake as it rose. “The fools tried to kill his son, and what’s worse, they made a mummer’s farce of it. He’s not a man to put that aside. I warn you, the wolf and lion will soon be at each other’s throats, whether we will it or no.”
“Too soon, too soon,” the voice with the accent complained. “What good is war now? We are not ready. Delay.”
“As well bid me stop time. Do you take me for a wizard?”
The other chuckled. “No less.” Flames licked at the cold air. The tall shadows were almost on top of her. An instant later the man holding the torch climbed into her sight, his companion beside him. Arya crept back away from the well, dropped to her stomach, and flattened herself against the wall. She held her breath as the men reached the top of the steps.
“What would you have me do?” asked the torchbearer, a stout man in a leather half cape. Even in heavy boots, his feet seemed to glide soundlessly over the ground. A round scarred face and a stubble of dark beard showed under his steel cap, and he wore mail over boiled leather, and a dirk and shortsword at his belt. It seemed to Arya there was something oddly familiar about him.
“If one Hand can die, why not a second?” replied the man with the accent and the forked yellow beard. “You have danced the dance before, my friend.” He was no one Arya had ever seen before, she was certain of it. Grossly fat, yet he seemed to walk lightly, carrying his weight on the balls of his feet as a water dancer might. His rings glimmered in the torchlight, red-gold and pale silver, crusted with rubies, sapphires, slitted yellow tiger eyes. Every finger wore a ring; some had two.
“Before is not now, and this Hand is not the other,” the scarred man said as they stepped out into the hall. Still as stone, Arya told herself, quiet as a shadow. Blinded by the blaze of their own torch, they did not see her pressed flat against the stone, only a few feet away.
“Perhaps so,” the forked beard replied, pausing to catch his breath after the long climb. “Nonetheless, we must have time. The princess is with child. The khal will not bestir himself until his son is born. You know how they are, these savages.”
The man with the torch pushed at something. Arya heard a deep rumbling. A huge slab of rock, red in the torchlight, slid down out of the ceiling with a resounding crash that almost made her cry out. Where the entry to the well had been was nothing but stone, solid and unbroken.
“If he does not bestir himself soon, it may be too late,” the stout man in the steel cap said. “This is no longer a game for two players, if ever it was. Stannis Baratheon and Lysa Arryn have fled beyond my reach, and the whispers say they are gathering swords around them. The Knight of Flowers writes Highgarden, urging his lord father to send his sister to court. The girl is a maid of fourteen, sweet and beautiful and tractable, and Lord Renly and Ser Loras intend that Robert should bed her, wed her, and make a new queen. Littlefinger … the gods only know what game Littlefinger is playing. Yet Lord Stark’s the one who troubles my sleep. He has the bastard, he has the book, and soon enough he’ll have the truth. And now his wife has abducted Tyrion Lannister, thanks to Littlefinger’s meddling. Lord Tywin will take that for an outrage, and Jaime has a queer affection for the Imp. If the Lannisters move north, that will bring the Tullys in as well. Delay, you say. Make haste, I reply. Even the finest of jugglers cannot keep a hundred balls in the air forever.”
“You are more than a juggler, old friend. You are a true sorcerer. All I ask is that you work your magic awhile longer.” They started down the hall in the direction Arya had come, past the room with the monsters.
“What I can do, I will,” the one with the torch said softly. “I must have gold, and another fifty birds.”
She let them get a long way ahead, then went creeping after them. Quiet as a shadow.
“So many?” The voices were fainter as the light dwindled ahead of her. “The ones you need are hard to find … so young, to know their letters … perhaps older … not die so easy …”
“No. The younger are safer … treat them gently …”
“…   if they kept their tongues …”
“…   the risk …”
Long after their voices had faded away, Arya could still see the light of the torch, a smoking star that bid her follow. Twice it seemed to disappear, but she kept on straight, and both times she found herself at the top of steep, narrow stairs, the torch glimmering far below her. She hurried after it, down and down. Once she stumbled over a rock and fell against the wall, and her hand found raw earth supported by timbers, whereas before the tunnel had been dressed stone.
She must have crept after them for miles. Finally they were gone, but there was no place to go but forward. She found the wall again and followed, blind and lost, pretending that Nymeria was padding along beside her in the darkness. At the end she was knee-deep in foul-smelling water, wishing she could dance upon it as Syrio might have, and wondering if she’d ever see light again. It was full dark when finally Arya emerged into the night air.
She found herself standing at the mouth of a sewer where it emptied into the river. She stank so badly that she stripped right there, dropping her soiled clothing on the riverbank as she dove into the deep black waters. She swam until she felt clean, and crawled out shivering. Some riders went past along the river road as Arya was washing her clothes, but if they saw the scrawny naked girl scrubbing her rags in the moonlight, they took no notice.
She was miles from the castle, but from anywhere in King’s Landing you needed only to look up to see the Red Keep high on Aegon’s Hill, so there was no danger of losing her way. Her clothes were almost dry by the time she reached the gatehouse. The portcullis was down and the gates barred, so she turned aside to a postern door. The gold cloaks who had the watch sneered when she told them to let her in. “Off with you,” one said. “The kitchen scraps are gone, and we’ll have no begging after dark.”
“I’m not a beggar,” she said. “I live here.”
“I said, off with you. Do you need a clout on the ear to help your hearing?”
“I want to see my father.”
The guards exchanged a glance. “I want to fuck the queen myself, for all the good it does me,” the younger one said.
The older scowled. “Who’s this father of yours, boy, the city ratcatcher?”
“The Hand of the King,” Arya told him.
Both men laughed, but then the older one swung his fist at her, casually, as a man would swat a dog. Arya saw the blow coming even before it began. She danced back out of the way, untouched. “I’m not a boy,” she spat at them. “I’m Arya Stark of Winterfell, and if you lay a hand on me my lord father will have both your heads on spikes. If you don’t believe me, fetch Jory Cassel or Vayon Poole from the Tower of the Hand.” She put her hands on her hips. “Now are you going to open the gate, or do you need a clout on the ear to help your hearing?”
Her father was alone in the solar when Harwin and Fat Tom marched her in, an oil lamp glowing softly at his elbow. He was bent over the biggest book Arya had ever seen, a great thick tome with cracked yellow pages of crabbed script, bound between faded leather covers, but he closed it to listen to Harwin’s report. His face was stern as he sent the men away with thanks.
“You realize I had half my guard out searching for you?” Eddard Stark said when they were alone. “Septa Mordane is beside herself with fear. She’s in the sept praying for your safe return. Arya, you know you are never to go beyond the castle gates without my leave.”
“I didn’t go out the gates,” she blurted. “Well, I didn’t mean to. I was down in the dungeons, only they turned into this tunnel. It was all dark, and I didn’t have a torch or a candle to see by, so I had to follow. I couldn’t go back the way I came on account of the monsters. Father, they were talking about killing you! Not the monsters, the two men. They didn’t see me, I was being still as stone and quiet as a shadow, but I heard them. They said you had a book and a bastard and if one Hand could die, why not a second? Is that the book? Jon’s the bastard, I bet.”
“Jon? Arya, what are you talking about? Who said this?”
“They did,” she told him. “There was a fat one with rings and a forked yellow beard, and another in mail and a steel cap, and the fat one said they had to delay but the other one told him he couldn’t keep juggling and the wolf and the lion were going to eat each other and it was a mummer’s farce.” She tried to remember the rest. She hadn’t quite understood everything she’d heard, and now it was all mixed up in her head. “The fat one said the princess was with child. The one in the steel cap, he had the torch, he said that they had to hurry. I think he was a wizard.”
“A wizard,” said Ned, unsmiling. “Did he have a long white beard and tall pointed hat speckled with stars?”
“No! It wasn’t like Old Nan’s stories. He didn’t look like a wizard, but the fat one said he was.”
“I warn you, Arya, if you’re spinning this thread of air—”
“No, I told you, it was in the dungeons, by the place with the secret wall. I was chasing cats, and well …” She screwed up her face. If she admitted knocking over Prince Tommen, he would be really angry with her. “…   well, I went in this window. That’s where I found the monsters.”
“Monsters and wizards,” her father said. “It would seem you’ve had quite an adventure. These men you heard, you say they spoke of juggling and mummery?”
“Yes,” Arya admitted, “only—”
“Arya, they were mummers,” her father told her. “There must be a dozen troupes in King’s Landing right now, come to make some coin off the tourney crowds. I’m not certain what these two were doing in the castle, but perhaps the king has asked for a show.”
“No.” She shook her head stubbornly. “They weren’t—”
“You shouldn’t be following people about and spying on them in any case. Nor do I cherish the notion of my daughter climbing in strange windows after stray cats. Look at you, sweetling. Your arms are covered with scratches. This has gone on long enough. Tell Syrio Forel that I want a word with him—”
He was interrupted by a short, sudden knock. “Lord Eddard, pardons,” Desmond called out, opening the door a crack, “but there’s a black brother here begging audience. He says the matter is urgent. I thought you would want to know.”
“My door is always open to the Night’s Watch,” Father said.
Desmond ushered the man inside. He was stooped and ugly, with an unkempt beard and unwashed clothes, yet Father greeted him pleasantly and asked his name.
“Yoren, as it please m’lord. My pardons for the hour.” He bowed to Arya. “And this must be your son. He has your look.”
“I’m a girl,” Arya said, exasperated. If the old man was down from the Wall, he must have come by way of Winterfell. “Do you know my brothers?” she asked excitedly. “Robb and Bran are at Winterfell, and Jon’s on the Wall. Jon Snow, he’s in the Night’s Watch too, you must know him, he has a direwolf, a white one with red eyes. Is Jon a ranger yet? I’m Arya Stark.” The old man in his smelly black clothes was looking at her oddly, but Arya could not seem to stop talking. “When you ride back to the Wall, would you bring Jon a letter if I wrote one?” She wished Jon were here right now. He’d believe her about the dungeons and the fat man with the forked beard and the wizard in the steel cap.
“My daughter often forgets her courtesies,” Eddard Stark said with a faint smile that softened his words. “I beg your forgiveness, Yoren. Did my brother Benjen send you?”
“No one sent me, m’lord, saving old Mormont. I’m here to find men for the Wall, and when Robert next holds court, I’ll bend the knee and cry our need, see if the king and his Hand have some scum in the dungeons they’d be well rid of. You might say as Benjen Stark is why we’re talking, though. His blood ran black. Made him my brother as much as yours. It’s for his sake I’m come. Rode hard, I did, near killed my horse the way I drove her, but I left the others well behind.”
“The others?”
Yoren spat. “Sellswords and freeriders and like trash. That inn was full o’ them, and I saw them take the scent. The scent of blood or the scent of gold, they smell the same in the end. Not all o’ them made for King’s Landing, either. Some went galloping for Casterly Rock, and the Rock lies closer. Lord Tywin will have gotten the word by now, you can count on it.”
Father frowned. “What word is this?”
Yoren eyed Arya. “One best spoken in private, m’lord, begging your pardons.”
“As you say. Desmond, see my daughter to her chambers.” He kissed her on the brow. “We’ll finish our talk on the morrow.”
Arya stood rooted to the spot. “Nothing bad’s happened to Jon, has it?” she asked Yoren. “Or Uncle Benjen?”
“Well, as to Stark, I can’t say. The Snow boy was well enough when I left the Wall. It’s not them as concerns me.”
Desmond took her hand. “Come along, milady. You heard your lord father.”
Arya had no choice but to go with him, wishing it had been Fat Tom. With Tom, she might have been able to linger at the door on some excuse and hear what Yoren was saying, but Desmond was too single-minded to trick. “How many guards does my father have?” she asked him as they descended to her bedchamber.
“Here at King’s Landing? Fifty.”
“You wouldn’t let anyone kill him, would you?” she asked.
Desmond laughed. “No fear on that count, little lady. Lord Eddard’s guarded night and day. He’ll come to no harm.”
“The Lannisters have more than fifty men,” Arya pointed out.
“So they do, but every northerner is worth ten of these southron swords, so you can sleep easy.”
“What if a wizard was sent to kill him?”
“Well, as to that,” Desmond replied, drawing his longsword, “wizards die the same as other men, once you cut their heads off.”

“High,” Syrio Forel called out, slashing at her head. The stick swords clacked as Arya parried. “Left,” he shouted, and his blade came whistling. Hers darted to meet it. The clack made him click his teeth together.
“Right,” he said, and “Low,” and “Left,” and “Left” again, faster and faster, moving forward. Arya retreated before him, checking each blow.
“Lunge,” he warned, and when he thrust she sidestepped, swept his blade away, and slashed at his shoulder. She almost touched him, almost, so close it made her grin. A strand of hair dangled in her eyes, limp with sweat. She pushed it away with the back of her hand.
“Left,” Syrio sang out. “Low.” His sword was a blur, and the Small Hall echoed to the clack clack clack. “Left. Left. High. Left. Right. Left. Low. Left!”
The wooden blade caught her high in the breast, a sudden stinging blow that hurt all the more because it came from the wrong side. “Ow,” she cried out. She would have a fresh bruise there by the time she went to sleep, somewhere out at sea. A bruise is a lesson, she told herself, and each lesson makes us better.
Syrio stepped back. “You are dead now.”
Arya made a face. “You cheated,” she said hotly. “You said left and you went right.”
“Just so. And now you are a dead girl.”
“But you lied!”
“My words lied. My eyes and my arm shouted out the truth, but you were not seeing.”
“I was so,” Arya said. “I watched you every second!”
“Watching is not seeing, dead girl. The water dancer sees. Come, put down the sword, it is time for listening now.”
She followed him over to the wall, where he settled onto a bench. “Syrio Forel was first sword to the Sealord of Braavos, and are you knowing how that came to pass?”
“You were the finest swordsman in the city.”
“Just so, but why? Other men were stronger, faster, younger, why was Syrio Forel the best? I will tell you now.” He touched the tip of his little finger lightly to his eyelid. “The seeing, the true seeing, that is the heart of it.
“Hear me. The ships of Braavos sail as far as the winds blow, to lands strange and wonderful, and when they return their captains fetch queer animals to the Sealord’s menagerie. Such animals as you have never seen, striped horses, great spotted things with necks as long as stilts, hairy mouse-pigs as big as cows, stinging manticores, tigers that carry their cubs in a pouch, terrible walking lizards with scythes for claws. Syrio Forel has seen these things.
“On the day I am speaking of, the first sword was newly dead, and the Sealord sent for me. Many bravos had come to him, and as many had been sent away, none could say why. When I came into his presence, he was seated, and in his lap was a fat yellow cat. He told me that one of his captains had brought the beast to him, from an island beyond the sunrise. ‘Have you ever seen her like?’ he asked of me.
“And to him I said, ‘Each night in the alleys of Braavos I see a thousand like him,’ and the Sealord laughed, and that day I was named the first sword.”
Arya screwed up her face. “I don’t understand.”
Syrio clicked his teeth together. “The cat was an ordinary cat, no more. The others expected a fabulous beast, so that is what they saw. How large it was, they said. It was no larger than any other cat, only fat from indolence, for the Sealord fed it from his own table. What curious small ears, they said. Its ears had been chewed away in kitten fights. And it was plainly a tomcat, yet the Sealord said ‘her,’ and that is what the others saw. Are you hearing?”
Arya thought about it. “You saw what was there.”
“Just so. Opening your eyes is all that is needing. The heart lies and the head plays tricks with us, but the eyes see true. Look with your eyes. Hear with your ears. Taste with your mouth. Smell with your nose. Feel with your skin. Then comes the thinking, afterward, and in that way knowing the truth.”
“Just so,” said Arya, grinning.
Syrio Forel allowed himself a smile. “I am thinking that when we are reaching this Winterfell of yours, it will be time to put this needle in your hand.”
“Yes!” Arya said eagerly. “Wait till I show Jon—”
Behind her the great wooden doors of the Small Hall flew open with a resounding crash. Arya whirled.
A knight of the Kingsguard stood beneath the arch of the door with five Lannister guardsmen arrayed behind him. He was in full armor, but his visor was up. Arya remembered his droopy eyes and rust-colored whiskers from when he had come to Winterfell with the king: Ser Meryn Trant. The red cloaks wore mail shirts over boiled leather and steel caps with lion crests. “Arya Stark,” the knight said, “come with us, child.”
Arya chewed her lip uncertainly. “What do you want?”
“Your father wants to see you.”
Arya took a step forward, but Syrio Forel held her by the arm. “And why is it that Lord Eddard is sending Lannister men in the place of his own? I am wondering.”
“Mind your place, dancing master,” Ser Meryn said. “This is no concern of yours.”
“My father wouldn’t send you,” Arya said. She snatched up her stick sword. The Lannisters laughed.
“Put down the stick, girl,” Ser Meryn told her. “I am a Sworn Brother of the Kingsguard, the White Swords.”
“So was the Kingslayer when he killed the old king,” Arya said. “I don’t have to go with you if I don’t want.”
Ser Meryn Trant ran out of patience. “Take her,” he said to his men. He lowered the visor of his helm.
Three of them started forward, chainmail clinking softly with each step. Arya was suddenly afraid. Fear cuts deeper than swords, she told herself, to slow the racing of her heart.
Syrio Forel stepped between them, tapping his wooden sword lightly against his boot. “You will be stopping there. Are you men or dogs that you would threaten a child?”
“Out of the way, old man,” one of the red cloaks said.
Syrio’s stick came whistling up and rang against his helm. “I am Syrio Forel, and you will now be speaking to me with more respect.”
“Bald bastard.” The man yanked free his longsword. The stick moved again, blindingly fast. Arya heard a loud crack as the sword went clattering to the stone floor. “My hand,” the guardsman yelped, cradling his broken fingers.
“You are quick, for a dancing master,” said Ser Meryn.
“You are slow, for a knight,” Syrio replied.
“Kill the Braavosi and bring me the girl,” the knight in the white armor commanded.
Four Lannister guardsmen unsheathed their swords. The fifth, with the broken fingers, spat and pulled free a dagger with his left hand.
Syrio Forel clicked his teeth together, sliding into his water dancer’s stance, presenting only his side to the foe. “Arya child,” he called out, never looking, never taking his eyes off the Lannisters, “we are done with dancing for the day. Best you are going now. Run to your father.”
Arya did not want to leave him, but he had taught her to do as he said. “Swift as a deer,” she whispered.
“Just so,” said Syrio Forel as the Lannisters closed.
Arya retreated, her own sword stick clutched tightly in her hand. Watching him now, she realized that Syrio had only been toying with her when they dueled. The red cloaks came at him from three sides with steel in their hands. They had chainmail over their chest and arms, and steel codpieces sewn into their pants, but only leather on their legs. Their hands were bare, and the caps they wore had noseguards, but no visor over the eyes.
Syrio did not wait for them to reach him, but spun to his left. Arya had never seen a man move as fast. He checked one sword with his stick and whirled away from a second. Off balance, the second man lurched into the first. Syrio put a boot to his back and the red cloaks went down together. The third guard came leaping over them, slashing at the water dancer’s head. Syrio ducked under his blade and thrust upward. The guardsman fell screaming as blood welled from the wet red hole where his left eye had been.
The fallen men were getting up. Syrio kicked one in the face and snatched the steel cap off the other’s head. The dagger man stabbed at him. Syrio caught the thrust in the helmet and shattered the man’s kneecap with his stick. The last red cloak shouted a curse and charged, hacking down with both hands on his sword. Syrio rolled right, and the butcher’s cut caught the helmetless man between neck and shoulder as he struggled to his knees. The longsword crunched through mail and leather and flesh. The man on his knees shrieked. Before his killer could wrench free his blade, Syrio jabbed him in the apple of his throat. The guardsman gave a choked cry and staggered back, clutching at his neck, his face blackening.
Five men were down, dead, or dying by the time Arya reached the back door that opened on the kitchen. She heard Ser Meryn Trant curse. “Bloody oafs,” he swore, drawing his longsword from its scabbard.
Syrio Forel resumed his stance and clicked his teeth together. “Arya child,” he called out, never looking at her, “be gone now.”
Look with your eyes, he had said. She saw: the knight in his pale armor head to foot, legs, throat, and hands sheathed in metal, eyes hidden behind his high white helm, and in his hand cruel steel. Against that: Syrio, in a leather vest, with a wooden sword in his hand. “Syrio, run,” she screamed.
“The first sword of Braavos does not run,” he sang as Ser Meryn slashed at him. Syrio danced away from his cut, his stick a blur. In a heartbeat, he had bounced blows off the knight’s temple, elbow, and throat, the wood ringing against the metal of helm, gauntlet, and gorget. Arya stood frozen. Ser Meryn advanced; Syrio backed away. He checked the next blow, spun away from the second, deflected the third.
The fourth sliced his stick in two, splintering the wood and shearing through the lead core.
Sobbing, Arya spun and ran.
She plunged through the kitchens and buttery, blind with panic, weaving between cooks and potboys. A baker’s helper stepped in front of her, holding a wooden tray. Arya bowled her over, scattering fragrant loaves of fresh-baked bread on the floor. She heard shouting behind her as she spun around a portly butcher who stood gaping at her with a cleaver in his hands. His arms were red to the elbow.
All that Syrio Forel had taught her went racing through her head. Swift as a deer. Quiet as a shadow. Fear cuts deeper than swords. Quick as a snake. Calm as still water. Fear cuts deeper than swords. Strong as a bear. Fierce as a wolverine. Fear cuts deeper than swords. The man who fears losing has already lost. Fear cuts deeper than swords. Fear cuts deeper than swords. Fear cuts deeper than swords. The grip of her wooden sword was slick with sweat, and Arya was breathing hard when she reached the turret stair. For an instant she froze. Up or down? Up would take her to the covered bridge that spanned the small court to the Tower of the Hand, but that would be the way they’d expect her to go, for certain. Never do what they expect, Syrio once said. Arya went down, around and around, leaping over the narrow stone steps two and three at a time. She emerged in a cavernous vaulted cellar, surrounded by casks of ale stacked twenty feet tall. The only light came through narrow slanting windows high in the wall.
The cellar was a dead end. There was no way out but the way she had come in. She dare not go back up those steps, but she couldn’t stay here, either. She had to find her father and tell him what had happened. Her father would protect her.
Arya thrust her wooden sword through her belt and began to climb, leaping from cask to cask until she could reach the window. Grasping the stone with both hands, she pulled herself up. The wall was three feet thick, the window a tunnel slanting up and out. Arya wriggled toward daylight. When her head reached ground level, she peered across the bailey to the Tower of the Hand.
The stout wooden door hung splintered and broken, as if by axes. A dead man sprawled facedown on the steps, his cloak tangled beneath him, the back of his mailed shirt soaked red. The corpse’s cloak was grey wool trimmed with white satin, she saw with sudden terror. She could not tell who he was.
“No,” she whispered. What was happening? Where was her father? Why had the red cloaks come for her? She remembered what the man with the yellow beard had said, the day she had found the monsters. If one Hand can die, why not a second? Arya felt tears in her eyes. She held her breath to listen. She heard the sounds of fighting, shouts, screams, the clang of steel on steel, coming through the windows of the Tower of the Hand.
She could not go back. Her father …
Arya closed her eyes. For a moment she was too frightened to move. They had killed Jory and Wyl and Heward, and that guardsman on the step, whoever he had been. They could kill her father too, and her if they caught her. “Fear cuts deeper than swords,” she said aloud, but it was no good pretending to be a water dancer, Syrio had been a water dancer and the white knight had probably killed him, and anyhow she was only a little girl with a wooden stick, alone and afraid.
She squirmed out into the yard, glancing around warily as she climbed to her feet. The castle seemed deserted. The Red Keep was never deserted. All the people must be hiding inside, their doors barred. Arya glanced up longingly at her bedchamber, then moved away from the Tower of the Hand, keeping close to the wall as she slid from shadow to shadow. She pretended she was chasing cats … except she was the cat now, and if they caught her, they would kill her.
Moving between buildings and over walls, keeping stone to her back wherever possible so no one could surprise her, Arya reached the stables almost without incident. A dozen gold cloaks in mail and plate ran past as she was edging across the inner bailey, but without knowing whose side they were on, she hunched down low in the shadows and let them pass.
Hullen, who had been master of horse at Winterfell as long as Arya could remember, was slumped on the ground by the stable door. He had been stabbed so many times it looked as if his tunic was patterned with scarlet flowers. Arya was certain he was dead, but when she crept closer, his eyes opened. “Arya Underfoot,” he whispered. “You must … warn your … your lord father …” Frothy red spittle bubbled from his mouth. The master of horse closed his eyes again and said no more.
Inside were more bodies; a groom she had played with, and three of her father’s household guard. A wagon, laden with crates and chests, stood abandoned near the door of the stable. The dead men must have been loading it for the trip to the docks when they were attacked. Arya snuck closer. One of the corpses was Desmond, who’d shown her his longsword and promised to protect her father. He lay on his back, staring blindly at the ceiling as flies crawled across his eyes. Close to him was a dead man in the red cloak and lion-crest helm of the Lannisters. Only one, though. Every northerner is worth ten of these southron swords, Desmond had told her. “You liar!” she said, kicking his body in a sudden fury.
The animals were restless in their stalls, whickering and snorting at the scent of blood. Arya’s only plan was to saddle a horse and flee, away from the castle and the city. All she had to do was stay on the kingsroad and it would take her back to Winterfell. She took a bridle and harness off the wall.
As she crossed in back of the wagon, a fallen chest caught her eye. It must have been knocked down in the fight or dropped as it was being loaded. The wood had split, the lid opening to spill the chest’s contents across the ground. Arya recognized silks and satins and velvets she never wore. She might need warm clothes on the kingsroad, though … and besides …
Arya knelt in the dirt among the scattered clothes. She found a heavy woolen cloak, a velvet skirt and a silk tunic and some smallclothes, a dress her mother had embroidered for her, a silver baby bracelet she might sell. Shoving the broken lid out of the way, she groped inside the chest for Needle. She had hidden it way down at the bottom, under everything, but her stuff had all been jumbled around when the chest was dropped. For a moment Arya was afraid someone had found the sword and stolen it. Then her fingers felt the hardness of metal under a satin gown.
“There she is,” a voice hissed close behind her.
Startled, Arya whirled. A stableboy stood behind her, a smirk on his face, his filthy white undertunic peeking out from beneath a soiled jerkin. His boots were covered with manure, and he had a pitchfork in one hand. “Who are you?” she asked.
“She don’t know me,” he said, “but I knows her, oh, yes. The wolf girl.”
“Help me saddle a horse,” Arya pleaded, reaching back into the chest, groping for Needle. “My father’s the Hand of the King, he’ll reward you.”
“Father’s dead,” the boy said. He shuffled toward her. “It’s the queen who’ll be rewarding me. Come here, girl.”
“Stay away!” Her fingers closed around Needle’s hilt.
“I says, come.” He grabbed her arm, hard.
Everything Syrio Forel had ever taught her vanished in a heartbeat. In that instant of sudden terror, the only lesson Arya could remember was the one Jon Snow had given her, the very first.
She stuck him with the pointy end, driving the blade upward with a wild, hysterical strength.
Needle went through his leather jerkin and the white flesh of his belly and came out between his shoulder blades. The boy dropped the pitchfork and made a soft noise, something between a gasp and a sigh. His hands closed around the blade. “Oh, gods,” he moaned, as his undertunic began to redden. “Take it out.”
When she took it out, he died.
The horses were screaming. Arya stood over the body, still and frightened in the face of death. Blood had gushed from the boy’s mouth as he collapsed, and more was seeping from the slit in his belly, pooling beneath his body. His palms were cut where he’d grabbed at the blade. She backed away slowly, Needle red in her hand. She had to get away, someplace far from here, someplace safe away from the stableboy’s accusing eyes.
She snatched up the bridle and harness again and ran to her mare, but as she lifted the saddle to the horse’s back, Arya realized with a sudden sick dread that the castle gates would be closed. Even the postern doors would likely be guarded. Maybe the guards wouldn’t recognize her. If they thought she was a boy, perhaps they’d let her … no, they’d have orders not to let anyone out, it wouldn’t matter whether they knew her or not.
But there was another way out of the castle …
The saddle slipped from Arya’s fingers and fell to the dirt with a thump and a puff of dust. Could she find the room with the monsters again? She wasn’t certain, yet she knew she had to try.
She found the clothing she’d gathered and slipped into the cloak, concealing Needle beneath its folds. The rest of her things she tied in a roll. With the bundle under her arm, she crept to the far end of the stable. Unlatching the back door, she peeked out anxiously. She could hear the distant sound of swordplay, and the shivery wail of a man screaming in pain across the bailey. She would need to go down the serpentine steps, past the small kitchen and the pig yard, that was how she’d gone last time, chasing the black tomcat … only that would take her right past the barracks of the gold cloaks. She couldn’t go that way. Arya tried to think of another way. If she crossed to the other side of the castle, she could creep along the river wall and through the little godswood … but first she’d have to cross the yard, in the plain view of the guards on the walls.
She had never seen so many men on the walls. Gold cloaks, most of them, armed with spears. Some of them knew her by sight. What would they do if they saw her running across the yard? She’d look so small from up there, would they be able to tell who she was? Would they care?
She had to leave now, she told herself, but when the moment came, she was too frightened to move.
Calm as still water, a small voice whispered in her ear. Arya was so startled she almost dropped her bundle. She looked around wildly, but there was no one in the stable but her, and the horses, and the dead men.
Quiet as a shadow, she heard. Was it her own voice, or Syrio’s? She could not tell, yet somehow it calmed her fears.
She stepped out of the stable.
It was the scariest thing she’d ever done. She wanted to run and hide, but she made herself walk across the yard, slowly, putting one foot in front of the other as if she had all the time in the world and no reason to be afraid of anyone. She thought she could feel their eyes, like bugs crawling on her skin under her clothes. Arya never looked up. If she saw them watching, all her courage would desert her, she knew, and she would drop the bundle of clothes and run and cry like a baby, and then they would have her. She kept her gaze on the ground. By the time she reached the shadow of the royal sept on the far side of the yard, Arya was cold with sweat, but no one had raised the hue and cry.
The sept was open and empty. Inside, half a hundred prayer candles burned in a fragrant silence. Arya figured the gods would never miss two. She stuffed them up her sleeves, and left by a back window. Sneaking back to the alley where she had cornered the one-eared tom was easy, but after that she got lost. She crawled in and out of windows, hopped over walls, and felt her way through dark cellars, quiet as a shadow. Once she heard a woman weeping. It took her more than an hour to find the low narrow window that slanted down to the dungeon where the monsters waited.
She tossed her bundle through and doubled back to light her candle. That was chancy; the fire she’d remembered seeing had burnt down to embers, and she heard voices as she was blowing on the coals. Cupping her fingers around the flickering candle, she went out the window as they were coming in the door, without ever getting a glimpse of who it was.
This time the monsters did not frighten her. They seemed almost old friends. Arya held the candle over her head. With each step she took, the shadows moved against the walls, as if they were turning to watch her pass. “Dragons,” she whispered. She slid Needle out from under her cloak. The slender blade seemed very small and the dragons very big, yet somehow Arya felt better with steel in her hand.
The long windowless hall beyond the door was as black as she remembered. She held Needle in her left hand, her sword hand, the candle in her right fist. Hot wax ran down across her knuckles. The entrance to the well had been to the left, so Arya went right. Part of her wanted to run, but she was afraid of snuffing out her candle. She heard the faint squeaking of rats and glimpsed a pair of tiny glowing eyes on the edge of the light, but rats did not scare her. Other things did. It would be so easy to hide here, as she had hidden from the wizard and the man with the forked beard. She could almost see the stableboy standing against the wall, his hands curled into claws with the blood still dripping from the deep gashes in his palms where Needle had cut him. He might be waiting to grab her as she passed. He would see her candle coming a long way off. Maybe she would be better off without the light …
Fear cuts deeper than swords, the quiet voice inside her whispered. Suddenly Arya remembered the crypts at Winterfell. They were a lot scarier than this place, she told herself. She’d been just a little girl the first time she saw them. Her brother Robb had taken them down, her and Sansa and baby Bran, who’d been no bigger than Rickon was now. They’d only had one candle between them, and Bran’s eyes had gotten as big as saucers as he stared at the stone faces of the Kings of Winter, with their wolves at their feet and their iron swords across their laps.
Robb took them all the way down to the end, past Grandfather and Brandon and Lyanna, to show them their own tombs. Sansa kept looking at the stubby little candle, anxious that it might go out. Old Nan had told her there were spiders down here, and rats as big as dogs. Robb smiled when she said that. “There are worse things than spiders and rats,” he whispered. “This is where the dead walk.” That was when they heard the sound, low and deep and shivery. Baby Bran had clutched at Arya’s hand.
When the spirit stepped out of the open tomb, pale white and moaning for blood, Sansa ran shrieking for the stairs, and Bran wrapped himself around Robb’s leg, sobbing. Arya stood her ground and gave the spirit a punch. It was only Jon, covered with flour. “You stupid,” she told him, “you scared the baby,” but Jon and Robb just laughed and laughed, and pretty soon Bran and Arya were laughing too.
The memory made Arya smile, and after that the darkness held no more terrors for her. The stableboy was dead, she’d killed him, and if he jumped out at her she’d kill him again. She was going home. Everything would be better once she was home again, safe behind Winterfell’s grey granite walls.
Her footsteps sent soft echoes hurrying ahead of her as Arya plunged deeper into the darkness.

The scent of hot bread drifting from the shops along the Street of Flour was sweeter than any perfume Arya had ever smelled. She took a deep breath and stepped closer to the pigeon. It was a plump one, speckled brown, busily pecking at a crust that had fallen between two cobblestones, but when Arya’s shadow touched it, it took to the air.
Her stick sword whistled out and caught it two feet off the ground, and it went down in a flurry of brown feathers. She was on it in the blink of an eye, grabbing a wing as the pigeon flapped and fluttered. It pecked at her hand. She grabbed its neck and twisted until she felt the bone snap.
Compared with catching cats, pigeons were easy.
A passing septon was looking at her askance. “Here’s the best place to find pigeon,” Arya told him as she brushed herself off and picked up her fallen stick sword. “They come for the crumbs.” He hurried away.
She tied the pigeon to her belt and started down the street. A man was pushing a load of tarts by on a two-wheeled cart; the smells sang of blueberries and lemons and apricots. Her stomach made a hollow rumbly noise. “Could I have one?” she heard herself say. “A lemon, or … or any kind.”
The pushcart man looked her up and down. Plainly he did not like what he saw. “Three coppers.”
Arya tapped her wooden sword against the side of her boot. “I’ll trade you a fat pigeon,” she said.
“The Others take your pigeon,” the pushcart man said.
The tarts were still warm from the oven. The smells were making her mouth water, but she did not have three coppers … or one. She gave the pushcart man a look, remembering what Syrio had told her about seeing. He was short, with a little round belly, and when he moved he seemed to favor his left leg a little. She was just thinking that if she snatched a tart and ran he would never be able to catch her when he said, “You be keepin’ your filthy hands off. The gold cloaks know how to deal with thieving little gutter rats, that they do.”
Arya glanced warily behind her. Two of the City Watch were standing at the mouth of an alley. Their cloaks hung almost to the ground, the heavy wool dyed a rich gold; their mail and boots and gloves were black. One wore a longsword at his hip, the other an iron cudgel. With a last wistful glance at the tarts, Arya edged back from the cart and hurried off. The gold cloaks had not been paying her any special attention, but the sight of them tied her stomach in knots. Arya had been staying as far from the castle as she could get, yet even from a distance she could see the heads rotting atop the high red walls. Flocks of crows squabbled noisily over each head, thick as flies. The talk in Flea Bottom was that the gold cloaks had thrown in with the Lannisters, their commander raised to a lord, with lands on the Trident and a seat on the king’s council.
She had also heard other things, scary things, things that made no sense to her. Some said her father had murdered King Robert and been slain in turn by Lord Renly. Others insisted that Renly had killed the king in a drunken quarrel between brothers. Why else should he have fled in the night like a common thief? One story said the king had been killed by a boar while hunting, another that he’d died eating a boar, stuffing himself so full that he’d ruptured at the table. No, the king had died at table, others said, but only because Varys the Spider poisoned him. No, it had been the queen who poisoned him. No, he had died of a pox. No, he had choked on a fish bone.
One thing all the stories agreed on: King Robert was dead. The bells in the seven towers of the Great Sept of Baelor had tolled for a day and a night, the thunder of their grief rolling across the city in a bronze tide. They only rang the bells like that for the death of a king, a tanner’s boy told Arya.
All she wanted was to go home, but leaving King’s Landing was not so easy as she had hoped. Talk of war was on every lip, and gold cloaks were as thick on the city walls as fleas on … well, her, for one. She had been sleeping in Flea Bottom, on rooftops and in stables, wherever she could find a place to lie down, and it hadn’t taken her long to learn that the district was well named.
Every day since her escape from the Red Keep, Arya had visited each of the seven city gates in turn. The Dragon Gate, the Lion Gate, and the Old Gate were closed and barred. The Mud Gate and the Gate of the Gods were open, but only to those who wanted to enter the city; the guards let no one out. Those who were allowed to leave left by the King’s Gate or the Iron Gate, but Lannister men-at-arms in crimson cloaks and lion-crested helms manned the guard posts there. Spying down from the roof of an inn by the King’s Gate, Arya saw them searching wagons and carriages, forcing riders to open their saddlebags, and questioning everyone who tried to pass on foot.
Sometimes she thought about swimming the river, but the Blackwater Rush was wide and deep, and everyone agreed that its currents were wicked and treacherous. She had no coin to pay a ferryman or take passage on a ship.
Her lord father had taught her never to steal, but it was growing harder to remember why. If she did not get out soon, she would have to take her chances with the gold cloaks. She hadn’t gone hungry much since she learned to knock down birds with her stick sword, but she feared so much pigeon was making her sick. A couple she’d eaten raw, before she found Flea Bottom.
In the Bottom there were pot-shops along the alleys where huge tubs of stew had been simmering for years, and you could trade half your bird for a heel of yesterday’s bread and a “bowl o’ brown,” and they’d even stick the other half in the fire and crisp it up for you, so long as you plucked the feathers yourself. Arya would have given anything for a cup of milk and a lemon cake, but the brown wasn’t so bad. It usually had barley in it, and chunks of carrot and onion and turnip, and sometimes even apple, with a film of grease swimming on top. Mostly she tried not to think about the meat. Once she had gotten a piece of fish.
The only thing was, the pot-shops were never empty, and even as she bolted down her food, Arya could feel them watching. Some of them stared at her boots or her cloak, and she knew what they were thinking. With others, she could almost feel their eyes crawling under her leathers; she didn’t know what they were thinking, and that scared her even more. A couple times, she was followed out into the alleys and chased, but so far no one had been able to catch her.
The silver bracelet she’d hoped to sell had been stolen her first night out of the castle, along with her bundle of good clothes, snatched while she slept in a burnt-out house off Pig Alley. All they left her was the cloak she had been huddled in, the leathers on her back, her wooden practice sword … and Needle. She’d been lying on top of Needle, or else it would have been gone too; it was worth more than all the rest together. Since then Arya had taken to walking around with her cloak draped over her right arm, to conceal the blade at her hip. The wooden sword she carried in her left hand, out where everybody could see it, to scare off robbers, but there were men in the pot-shops who wouldn’t have been scared off if she’d had a battle-axe. It was enough to make her lose her taste for pigeon and stale bread. Often as not, she went to bed hungry rather than risk the stares.
Once she was outside the city, she would find berries to pick, or orchards she might raid for apples and cherries. Arya remembered seeing some from the kingsroad on the journey south. And she could dig for roots in the forest, even run down some rabbits. In the city, the only things to run down were rats and cats and scrawny dogs. The pot-shops would give you a fistful of coppers for a litter of pups, she’d heard, but she didn’t like to think about that.
Down below the Street of Flour was a maze of twisting alleys and cross streets. Arya scrambled through the crowds, trying to put distance between her and the gold cloaks. She had learned to keep to the center of the street. Sometimes she had to dodge wagons and horses, but at least you could see them coming. If you walked near the buildings, people grabbed you. In some alleys you couldn’t help but brush against the walls; the buildings leaned in so close they almost met.
A whooping gang of small children went running past, chasing a rolling hoop. Arya stared at them with resentment, remembering the times she’d played at hoops with Bran and Jon and their baby brother Rickon. She wondered how big Rickon had grown, and whether Bran was sad. She would have given anything if Jon had been here to call her “little sister” and muss her hair. Not that it needed mussing. She’d seen her reflection in puddles, and she didn’t think hair got any more mussed than hers.
She had tried talking to the children she saw in the street, hoping to make a friend who would give her a place to sleep, but she must have talked wrong or something. The little ones only looked at her with quick, wary eyes and ran away if she came too close. Their big brothers and sisters asked questions Arya couldn’t answer, called her names, and tried to steal from her. Only yesterday, a scrawny barefoot girl twice her age had knocked her down and tried to pull the boots off her feet, but Arya gave her a crack on her ear with her stick sword that sent her off sobbing and bleeding.
A gull wheeled overhead as she made her way down the hill toward Flea Bottom. Arya glanced at it thoughtfully, but it was well beyond the reach of her stick. It made her think of the sea. Maybe that was the way out. Old Nan used to tell stories of boys who stowed away on trading galleys and sailed off into all kinds of adventures. Maybe Arya could do that too. She decided to visit the riverfront. It was on the way to the Mud Gate anyway, and she hadn’t checked that one today.
The wharfs were oddly quiet when Arya got there. She spied another pair of gold cloaks, walking side by side through the fish market, but they never so much as looked at her. Half the stalls were empty, and it seemed to her that there were fewer ships at dock than she remembered. Out on the Blackwater, three of the king’s war galleys moved in formation, gold-painted hulls splitting the water as their oars rose and fell. Arya watched them for a bit, then began to make her way along the river.
When she saw the guardsmen on the third pier, in grey woolen cloaks trimmed with white satin, her heart almost stopped in her chest. The sight of Winterfell's colors brought tears to her eyes. Behind them, a sleek three-banked trading galley rocked at her moorings. Arya could not read the name painted on the hull; the words were strange, Myrish, Braavosi, perhaps even High Valyrian. She grabbed a passing longshoreman by the sleeve. “Please,” she said, “what ship is this?”
“She’s the Wind Witch, out of Myr,” the man said.
“She’s still here,” Arya blurted. The longshoreman gave her a queer look, shrugged, and walked away. Arya ran toward the pier. The Wind Witch was the ship Father had hired to take her home … still waiting! She’d imagined it had sailed ages ago.
Two of the guardsmen were dicing together while the third walked rounds, his hand on the pommel of his sword. Ashamed to let them see her crying like a baby, she stopped to rub at her eyes. Her eyes her eyes her eyes, why did …
Look with your eyes, she heard Syrio whisper.
Arya looked. She knew all of her father’s men. The three in the grey cloaks were strangers. “You,” the one walking rounds called out. “What do you want here, boy?” The other two looked up from their dice.
It was all Arya could do not to bolt and run, but she knew that if she did, they would be after her at once. She made herself walk closer. They were looking for a girl, but he thought she was a boy. She’d be a boy, then. “Want to buy a pigeon?” She showed him the dead bird.
“Get out of here,” the guardsman said.
Arya did as he told her. She did not have to pretend to be frightened. Behind her, the men went back to their dice.
She could not have said how she got back to Flea Bottom, but she was breathing hard by the time she reached the narrow crooked unpaved streets between the hills. The Bottom had a stench to it, a stink of pigsties and stables and tanner’s sheds, mixed in with the sour smell of winesinks and cheap whorehouses. Arya wound her way through the maze dully. It was not until she caught a whiff of bubbling brown coming through a pot-shop door that she realized her pigeon was gone. It must have slipped from her belt as she ran, or someone had stolen it and she’d never noticed. For a moment she wanted to cry again. She’d have to walk all the way back to the Street of Flour to find another one that plump.
Far across the city, bells began to ring.
Arya glanced up, listening, wondering what the ringing meant this time.
“What’s this now?” a fat man called from the pot-shop.
“The bells again, gods ha’mercy,” wailed an old woman.
A red-haired whore in a wisp of painted silk pushed open a second-story window. “Is it the boy king that’s died now?” she shouted down, leaning out over the street. “Ah, that’s a boy for you, they never last long.” As she laughed, a naked man slid his arms around her from behind, biting her neck and rubbing the heavy white breasts that hung loose beneath her shift.
“Stupid slut,” the fat man shouted up. “The king’s not dead, that’s only summoning bells. One tower tolling. When the king dies, they ring every bell in the city.”
“Here, quit your biting, or I’ll ring your bells,” the woman in the window said to the man behind her, pushing him off with an elbow. “So who is it died, if not the king?”
“It’s a summoning,” the fat man repeated.
Two boys close to Arya’s age scampered past, splashing through a puddle. The old woman cursed them, but they kept right on going. Other people were moving too, heading up the hill to see what the noise was about. Arya ran after the slower boy. “Where you going?” she shouted when she was right behind him. “What’s happening?”
He glanced back without slowing. “The gold cloaks is carryin’ him to the sept.”
“Who?” she yelled, running hard.
“The Hand! They’ll be taking his head off, Buu says.”
A passing wagon had left a deep rut in the street. The boy leapt over, but Arya never saw it. She tripped and fell, face first, scraping her knee open on a stone and smashing her fingers when her hands hit the hard-packed earth. Needle tangled between her legs. She sobbed as she struggled to her knees. The thumb of her left hand was covered with blood. When she sucked on it, she saw that half the thumbnail was gone, ripped off in her fall. Her hands throbbed, and her knee was all bloody too.
“Make way!” someone shouted from the cross street. “Make way for my lords of Redwyne!” It was all Arya could do to get out of the road before they ran her down, four guardsmen on huge horses, pounding past at a gallop. They wore checked cloaks, blue-and-burgundy. Behind them, two young lordlings rode side by side on a pair of chestnut mares alike as peas in a pod. Arya had seen them in the bailey a hundred times; the Redwyne twins, Ser Horas and Ser Hobber, homely youths with orange hair and square, freckled faces. Sansa and Jeyne Poole used to call them Ser Horror and Ser Slobber, and giggle whenever they caught sight of them. They did not look funny now.
Everyone was moving in the same direction, all in a hurry to see what the ringing was all about. The bells seemed louder now, clanging, calling. Arya joined the stream of people. Her thumb hurt so bad where the nail had broken that it was all she could do not to cry. She bit her lip as she limped along, listening to the excited voices around her.
“—the King’s Hand, Lord Stark. They’re carrying him up to Baelor’s Sept.”
“I heard he was dead.”
“Soon enough, soon enough. Here, I got me a silver stag says they lop his head off.”
“Past time, the traitor.” The man spat.
Arya struggled to find a voice. “He never—” she started, but she was only a child and they talked right over her.
“Fool! They ain’t neither going to lop him. Since when do they knick traitors on the steps of the Great Sept?”
“Well, they don’t mean to anoint him no knight. I heard it was Stark killed old King Robert. Slit his throat in the woods, and when they found him, he stood there cool as you please and said it was some old boar did for His Grace.”
“Ah, that’s not true, it was his own brother did him, that Renly, him with his gold antlers.”
“You shut your lying mouth, woman. You don’t know what you’re saying, his lordship’s a fine true man.”
By the time they reached the Street of the Sisters, they were packed in shoulder to shoulder. Arya let the human current carry her along, up to the top of Visenya’s Hill. The white marble plaza was a solid mass of people, all yammering excitedly at each other and straining to get closer to the Great Sept of Baelor. The bells were very loud here.
Arya squirmed through the press, ducking between the legs of horses and clutching tight to her sword stick. From the middle of the crowd, all she could see were arms and legs and stomachs, and the seven slender towers of the sept looming overhead. She spotted a wood wagon and thought to climb up on the back where she might be able to see, but others had the same idea. The teamster cursed at them and drove them off with a crack of his whip.
Arya grew frantic. Forcing her way to the front of the crowd, she was shoved up against the stone of a plinth. She looked up at Baelor the Blessed, the septon king. Sliding her stick sword through her belt, Arya began to climb. Her broken thumbnail left smears of blood on the painted marble, but she made it up, and wedged herself in between the king’s feet.
That was when she saw her father.
Lord Eddard stood on the High Septon’s pulpit outside the doors of the sept, supported between two of the gold cloaks. He was dressed in a rich grey velvet doublet with a white wolf sewn on the front in beads, and a grey wool cloak trimmed with fur, but he was thinner than Arya had ever seen him, his long face drawn with pain. He was not standing so much as being held up; the cast over his broken leg was grey and rotten.
The High Septon himself stood behind him, a squat man, grey with age and ponderously fat, wearing long white robes and an immense crown of spun gold and crystal that wreathed his head with rainbows whenever he moved.
Clustered around the doors of the sept, in front of the raised marble pulpit, were a knot of knights and high lords. Joffrey was prominent among them, his raiment all crimson, silk and satin patterned with prancing stags and roaring lions, a gold crown on his head. His queen mother stood beside him in a black mourning gown slashed with crimson, a veil of black diamonds in her hair. Arya recognized the Hound, wearing a snowy white cloak over his dark grey armor, with four of the Kingsguard around him. She saw Varys the eunuch gliding among the lords in soft slippers and a patterned damask robe, and she thought the short man with the silvery cape and pointed beard might be the one who had once fought a duel for Mother.
And there in their midst was Sansa, dressed in sky-blue silk, with her long auburn hair washed and curled and silver bracelets on her wrists. Arya scowled, wondering what her sister was doing here, why she looked so happy.
A long line of gold-cloaked spearmen held back the crowd, commanded by a stout man in elaborate armor, all black lacquer and gold filigree. His cloak had the metallic shimmer of true cloth-of-gold.
When the bell ceased to toll, a quiet slowly settled across the great plaza, and her father lifted his head and began to speak, his voice so thin and weak she could scarcely make him out. People behind her began to shout out, “What?” and “Louder!” The man in the black-and-gold armor stepped up behind Father and prodded him sharply. You leave him alone! Arya wanted to shout, but she knew no one would listen. She chewed her lip.
Her father raised his voice and began again. “I am Eddard Stark, Lord of Winterfell and Hand of the King,” he said more loudly, his voice carrying across the plaza, “and I come before you to confess my treason in the sight of gods and men.”
“NO,” Arya whimpered. Below her, the crowd began to scream and shout. Taunts and obscenities filled the air. Sansa had hidden her face in her hands.
Her father raised his voice still higher, straining to be heard. “I betrayed the faith of my king and the trust of my friend, Robert,” he shouted. “I swore to defend and protect his children, yet before his blood was cold, I plotted to depose and murder his son and seize the throne for myself. Let the High Septon and Baelor the Beloved and the Seven bear witness to the truth of what I say: Joffrey Baratheon is the one true heir to the Iron Throne, and by the grace of all the gods, Lord of the Seven Kingdoms and Protector of the Realm.”
A stone came sailing out of the crowd. Arya cried out as she saw her father hit. The gold cloaks kept him from falling. Blood ran down his face from a deep gash across his forehead. More stones followed. One struck the guard to Father’s left. Another went clanging off the breastplate of the knight in the black-and-gold armor. Two of the Kingsguard stepped in front of Joffrey and the queen, protecting them with their shields.
Her hand slid beneath her cloak and found Needle in its sheath. She tightened her fingers around the grip, squeezing as hard as she had ever squeezed anything. Please, gods, keep him safe, she prayed. Don’t let them hurt my father.
The High Septon knelt before Joffrey and his mother. “As we sin, so do we suffer,” he intoned, in a deep swelling voice much louder than Father’s. “This man has confessed his crimes in the sight of gods and men, here in this holy place.” Rainbows danced around his head as he lifted his hands in entreaty. “The gods are just, yet Blessed Baelor taught us that they are also merciful. What shall be done with this traitor, Your Grace?”
A thousand voices were screaming, but Arya never heard them. Prince Joffrey … no, King Joffrey … stepped out from behind the shields of his Kingsguard. “My mother bids me let Lord Eddard take the black, and Lady Sansa has begged mercy for her father.” He looked straight at Sansa then, and smiled, and for a moment Arya thought that the gods had heard her prayer, until Joffrey turned back to the crowd and said, “But they have the soft hearts of women. So long as I am your king, treason shall never go unpunished. Ser Ilyn, bring me his head!”
The crowd roared, and Arya felt the statue of Baelor rock as they surged against it. The High Septon clutched at the king’s cape, and Varys came rushing over waving his arms, and even the queen was saying something to him, but Joffrey shook his head. Lords and knights moved aside as he stepped through, tall and fleshless, a skeleton in iron mail, the King’s Justice. Dimly, as if from far off, Arya heard her sister scream. Sansa had fallen to her knees, sobbing hysterically. Ser Ilyn Payne climbed the steps of the pulpit.
Arya wriggled between Baelor’s feet and threw herself into the crowd, drawing Needle. She landed on a man in a butcher’s apron, knocking him to the ground. Immediately someone slammed into her back and she almost went down herself. Bodies closed in around her, stumbling and pushing, trampling on the poor butcher. Arya slashed at them with Needle.
High atop the pulpit, Ser Ilyn Payne gestured and the knight in black-and-gold gave a command. The gold cloaks flung Lord Eddard to the marble, with his head and chest out over the edge.
“Here, you!” an angry voice shouted at Arya, but she bowled past, shoving people aside, squirming between them, slamming into anyone in her way. A hand fumbled at her leg and she hacked at it, kicked at shins. A woman stumbled and Arya ran up her back, cutting to both sides, but it was no good, no good, there were too many people, no sooner did she make a hole than it closed again. Someone buffeted her aside. She could still hear Sansa screaming.
Ser Ilyn drew a two-handed greatsword from the scabbard on his back. As he lifted the blade above his head, sunlight seemed to ripple and dance down the dark metal, glinting off an edge sharper than any razor. Ice, she thought, he has Ice! Her tears streamed down her face, blinding her.
And then a hand shot out of the press and closed round her arm like a wolf trap, so hard that Needle went flying from her hand. Arya was wrenched off her feet. She would have fallen if he hadn’t held her up, as easy as if she were a doll. A face pressed close to hers, long black hair and tangled beard and rotten teeth. “Don’t look!” a thick voice snarled at her.
“I … I … I …” Arya sobbed.
The old man shook her so hard her teeth rattled. “Shut your mouth and close your eyes, boy.” Dimly, as if from far away, she heard a … a noise … a soft sighing sound, as if a million people had let out their breath at once. The old man’s fingers dug into her arm, stiff as iron. “Look at me. Yes, that’s the way of it, at me.” Sour wine perfumed his breath. “Remember, boy?”
It was the smell that did it. Arya saw the matted greasy hair, the patched, dusty black cloak that covered his twisted shoulders, the hard black eyes squinting at her. And she remembered the black brother who had come to visit her father.
“Know me now, do you? There’s a bright boy.” He spat. “They’re done here. You’ll be coming with me, and you’ll be keeping your mouth shut.” When she started to reply, he shook her again, even harder. “Shut, I said.”
The plaza was beginning to empty. The press dissolved around them as people drifted back to their lives. But Arya’s life was gone. Numb, she trailed along beside … Yoren, yes, his name is Yoren. She did not recall him finding Needle, until he handed the sword back to her. “Hope you can use that, boy.”
“I’m not—” she started.
He shoved her into a doorway, thrust dirty fingers through her hair, and gave it a twist, yanking her head back. “—not a smart boy, that what you mean to say?”
He had a knife in his other hand.
As the blade flashed toward her face, Arya threw herself backward, kicking wildly, wrenching her head from side to side, but he had her by the hair, so strong, she could feel her scalp tearing, and on her lips the salt taste of tears.

At Winterfell they had called her “Arya Horseface” and she’d thought 
nothing could be worse, but that was before the orphan boy Lommy Greenhands had 
named her “Lumpyhead.”
Her head felt lumpy when she touched it. When Yoren had dragged her 
into that alley she’d thought he meant to kill her, but the sour old man had 
only held her tight, sawing through her mats and tangles with his dagger. She 
remembered how the breeze sent the fistfuls of dirty brown hair skittering 
across the paving stones, toward the sept where her father had died. “I’m 
taking men and boys from the city,” Yoren growled as the sharp steel scraped 
at her head. “Now you hold still, boy.” By the time he had 
finished, her scalp was nothing but tufts and stubble.Afterward he told her that from there to Winterfell she’d be Arry the 
orphan boy. “Gate shouldn’t be hard, but the road’s another matter. You got a 
long way to go in bad company. I got thirty this time, men and boys all bound 
for the Wall, and don’t be thinking they’re like that bastard brother o’ 
yours.” He shook her. “Lord Eddard gave me pick o’ the dungeons, and I didn’t 
find no little lordlings down there. This lot, half o’ them would turn you over 
to the queen quick as spit for a pardon and maybe a few silvers. The other 
half’d do the same, only they’d rape you first. So you keep to yourself and 
make your water in the woods,

alone. That’ll be the hardest part, the pissing, so don’t drink no more’n you 
need.”
Leaving King’s Landing was easy, just like he’d said. The Lannister guardsmen 
on the gate were stopping everyone, but Yoren called one by name and their 
wagons were waved through. No one spared Arya a glance. They were looking for a 
highborn girl, daughter of the King’s Hand, not for a skinny boy with his hair 
chopped off. Arya never looked back. She wished the Rush would rise and wash 
the whole city away, Flea Bottom and the Red Keep and the Great Sept and 
everything, and everyone too, especially Prince Joffrey and 
his mother. But she knew it wouldn’t, and anyhow Sansa was still in the city 
and would wash away too. When she remembered that, Arya decided to wish for 
Winterfell instead.
Yoren was wrong about the pissing, though. That wasn’t the hardest part at all; 
Lommy Greenhands and Hot Pie were the hardest part. Orphan boys. Yoren had 
plucked some from the streets with promises of food for their bellies and shoes 
for their feet. The rest he’d found in chains. “The Watch needs good men,” he 
told them as they set out, “but you lot will have to do.”
Yoren had taken grown men from the dungeons as well, thieves and poachers and 
rapers and the like. The worst were the three he’d found in the black cells who 
must have scared even him, because he kept them fettered hand and foot in the 
back of a wagon, and vowed they’d stay in irons all the way to the Wall. One 
had no nose, only the hole in his face where it had been cut off, and the gross 
fat bald one with the pointed teeth and the

weeping sores on his cheeks had eyes like nothing
human.
They took five wagons out of King’s Landing, laden with supplies for the Wall: 
hides and bolts of cloth, bars of pig iron, a cage of ravens, books and paper 
and ink, a bale of sourleaf, jars of oil, and chests of medicine and spices. 
Teams of plow horses pulled the wagons, and Yoren had bought two coursers and a 
half-dozen donkeys for the boys. Arya would have preferred a real horse, but 
the donkey was better than riding on a wagon.
The men paid her no mind, but she was not so lucky with the boys. She was two 
years younger than the youngest orphan, not to mention smaller and skinnier, 
and Lommy and Hot Pie took her silence to mean she was scared, or stupid, or 
deaf. “Look at that sword Lumpyhead’s got there,” Lommy said one morning as 
they made their plodding way past orchards and wheat fields. He’d been a dyer’s 
apprentice before he was caught stealing, and his arms were mottled green to 
the elbow. When he laughed he brayed like the donkeys they were riding. 
“Where’s a gutter rat like Lumpyhead get him a sword?”
Arya chewed her lip sullenly. She could see the back of Yoren’s faded black 
cloak up ahead of the wagons, but she was determined not to go crying to him 
for help.
“Maybe he’s a little squire,” Hot Pie put in. His mother had been a baker 
before she died, and he’d pushed her cart through the streets all day, shouting 
“Hot pies! Hot pies!” “Some lordy lord’s little squire boy, that’s 
it.”
“He ain’t no squire, look at him. I bet that’s not even a

real sword. I bet it’s just some play sword made of tin.”
Arya hated them making fun of Needle. “It’s castle-forged steel, you stupid,” 
she snapped, turning in the saddle to glare at them, “and you better shut your 
mouth.”
The orphan boys hooted. “Where’d you get a blade like that, Lumpyface?” Hot 
Pie wanted to know.
“Lumpyhead,” corrected Lommy. “He prob’ly
stole it.”
“I did not!” she shouted. Jon Snow had given her Needle. Maybe she 
had to let them call her Lumpyhead, but she wasn’t going to let them call Jon a 
thief.
“If he stole it, we could take it off him,” said Hot Pie. “It’s not his 
anyhow. I could use me a sword like that.”
Lommy egged him on. “Go on, take it off him, I dare you.”
Hot Pie kicked his donkey, riding closer. “Hey, Lumpyface, you gimme that 
sword.” His hair was the color of straw, his fat face all sunburnt and 
peeling. “You don’t know how to use it.”
Yes I do, Arya could have said. I killed a boy, a fat boy like 
you, I stabbed him in the belly and he died, and I’ll kill you too if you don’t 
let me alone. Only she did not dare. Yoren didn’t know about the 
stableboy, but she was afraid of what he might do if he found out. Arya was 
pretty sure that some of the other men were killers too, the three in the 
manacles for sure, but the queen wasn’t looking for them, so it 
wasn’t the same.
“Look at him,” brayed Lommy Greenhands. “I bet he’s going to cry now. You 
want to cry, Lumpyhead?”
She had cried in her sleep the night before, dreaming of her

father. Come morning, she’d woken red-eyed and dry, and could not have shed 
another tear if her life had hung on it.
“He’s going to wet his pants,” Hot Pie suggested.
“Leave him be,” said the boy with the shaggy black hair who rode behind them. 
Lommy had named him the Bull, on account of this horned helm he had 
that he polished all the time but never wore. Lommy didn’t dare mock the Bull. 
He was older, and big for his age, with a broad chest and strong-looking 
arms.
“You better give Hot Pie the sword, Arry,” Lommy said. “Hot Pie wants it 
bad. He kicked a boy to death. He’ll do the same to you, I bet.”
“I knocked him down and I kicked him in the balls, and I kept kicking him 
there until he was dead,” Hot Pie boasted. “I kicked him all to pieces. His 
balls were broke open and bloody and his cock turned black. You better gimme 
the sword.”
Arya slid her practice sword from her belt. “You can have this one,” she told 
Hot Pie, not wanting to fight.
“That’s just some stick.” He rode nearer and tried to reach over for Needle’s 
hilt.
Arya made the stick whistle as she laid the wood across his donkey’s 
hindquarters. The animal hawed and bucked, dumping Hot Pie on the 
ground. She vaulted off her own donkey and poked him in the gut as he tried to 
get up and he sat back down with a grunt. Then she whacked him across the face 
and his nose made a crack like a branch breaking. Blood dribbled from 
his nostrils. When Hot Pie began to wail, Arya whirled toward Lommy Greenhands,

who was sitting on his donkey openmouthed. “You want some sword too?” she 
yelled, but he didn’t. He raised dyed green hands in front of his face and 
squealed at her to get away.
The Bull shouted, “Behind you,” and Arya spun. Hot Pie was on his knees, his 
fist closing around a big jagged rock. She let him throw it, ducking her head 
as it sailed past. Then she flew at him. He raised a hand and she hit it, and 
then his cheek, and then his knee. He grabbed for her, and she danced aside and 
bounced the wood off the back of his head. He fell down and got up and stumbled 
after her, his red face all smeared with dirt and blood. Arya slid into a water 
dancer’s stance and waited. When he came close enough, she lunged, right 
between his legs, so hard that if her wooden sword had had a point it would 
have come out between his butt cheeks.
By the time Yoren pulled her off him, Hot Pie was sprawled out on the ground 
with his breeches brown and smelly, crying as Arya whapped him over and over 
and over. “Enough,” the black brother roared, prying the stick 
sword from her fingers, “you want to kill the fool?” When Lommy and some 
others started to squeal, the old man turned on them too. “Shut your mouths, 
or I’ll be shutting them for you. Any more o’ this, I’ll tie you lot behind the 
wagons and drag you to the Wall.” He spat. “And that goes twice for 
you, Arry. You come with me, boy. Now.”
They were all looking at her, even the three chained and manacled in the back 
of the wagon. The fat one snapped his pointy teeth together and 
hissed, but Arya ignored him.The old man dragged her well off the road into a tangle of trees, cursing 
and muttering all the while. “If I had a thimble o’ sense, I would’ve left you 
in King’s Landing. You hear me, boy?” He always snarled that word, 
putting a bite in it so she would be certain to hear. “Unlace your breeches 
and pull ’em down. Go on, there’s no one here to see. Do it.” Sullenly, Arya 
did as he said. “Over there, against the oak. Yes, like that.” She wrapped 
her arms around the trunk and pressed her face to the rough wood. “You scream 
now. You scream loud.”
I won’t, Arya thought stubbornly, but when Yoren laid the wood 
against the back of her bare thighs, the shriek burst out of her anyway. 
“Think that hurt?” he said. “Try this one.” The stick came whistling. Arya 
shrieked again, clutching the tree to keep from falling. “One more.” She held 
on tight, chewing her lip, flinching when she heard it coming. The stroke made 
her jump and howl. I won’t cry, she thought, I won’t do that. 
I’m a Stark of Winterfell, our sigil is the direwolf, direwolves don’t 
cry. She could feel a thin trickle of blood running down her left leg. Her 
thighs and cheeks were ablaze with pain. “Might be I got your attention now,” 
Yoren said. “Next time you take that stick to one of your brothers, you’ll get 
twice what you give, you hear me? Now cover yourself.”
They’re not my brothers, Arya thought as she bent to yank up her 
breeches, but she knew better than to say so. Her hands fumbled with her belt 
and laces.
Yoren was looking at her. “You hurt?”Calm as still water, she told herself, the way Syrio Forel had 
taught her. “Some.”
He spat. “That pie boy’s hurting worse. It wasn’t him as killed your father, 
girl, nor that thieving Lommy neither. Hitting them won’t bring him 
back.”
“I know,” Arya muttered sullenly.
“Here’s something you don’t know. It wasn’t supposed to happen like it did. I 
was set to leave, wagons bought and loaded, and a man comes with a boy for me, 
and a purse of coin, and a message, never mind who it’s from. Lord Eddard’s to 
take the black, he says to me, wait, he’ll be going with you. Why d’you think I 
was there? Only something went queer.”
“Joffrey,” Arya breathed. “Someone should kill 
him!”
“Someone will, but it won’t be me, nor you neither.” Yoren tossed back her 
stick sword. “Got sourleaf back at the wagons,” he said as they made their 
way back to the road. “You’ll chew some, it’ll help with the 
sting.”
It did help, some, though the taste of it was foul and it made her spit look 
like blood. Even so, she walked for the rest of that day, and the day after, 
and the day after that, too raw to sit a donkey. Hot Pie was worse 
off; Yoren had to shift some barrels around so he could lie in the back of a 
wagon on some sacks of barley, and he whimpered every time the wheels hit a 
rock. Lommy Greenhands wasn’t even hurt, yet he stayed as far away from Arya as 
he could get. “Every time you look at him, he twitches,” the Bull told her as 
she walked beside his donkey.

She did not answer. It seemed safer not to talk to anyone.
That night she lay upon her thin blanket on the hard ground, staring up at the 
great red comet. The comet was splendid and scary all at once. “The Red 
Sword,” the Bull named it; he claimed it looked like a sword, the blade still 
red-hot from the forge. When Arya squinted the right way she could see the 
sword too, only it wasn’t a new sword, it was Ice, her father’s greatsword, all 
ripply Valyrian steel, and the red was Lord Eddard’s blood on the blade after 
Ser Ilyn the King’s Justice had cut off his head. Yoren had made her look away 
when it happened, yet it seemed to her that the comet looked like Ice must 
have, after.
When at last she slept, she dreamed of home. The kingsroad wound its way past 
Winterfell on its way to the Wall, and Yoren had promised he’d leave her there 
with no one any wiser about who she’d been. She yearned to see her mother 
again, and Robb and Bran and Rickon . . . but it was Jon Snow 
she thought of most. She wished somehow they could come to the Wall 
before Winterfell, so Jon might muss up her hair and call her 
“little sister.” She’d tell him, “I missed you,” and he’d say it too at the 
very same moment, the way they always used to say things together. She would 
have liked that. She would have liked that better than anything.

They traveled dawn to dusk, past woods and orchards and neatly tended 
fields, through small villages, crowded market towns, and stout holdfasts. Come 
dark, they would make camp and eat by the light of the Red Sword. The men took 
turns standing watch. Arya would glimpse firelight flickering through the trees 
from the camps of other travelers. There seemed to be more camps every night, 
and more traffic on the kingsroad by day.Morn, noon, and night they came, old folks and little children, big men 
and small ones, barefoot girls and women with babes at their breasts. Some 
drove farm wagons or bumped along in the back of ox carts. More rode: draft 
horses, ponies, mules, donkeys, anything that would walk or run or roll. One 
woman led a milk cow with a little girl on its back. Arya saw a smith pushing a 
wheelbarrow with his tools inside, hammers and tongs and even an anvil, and a 
little while later a different man with a different wheelbarrow, only inside 
this one were two babies in a blanket. Most came on foot, with their goods on 
their shoulders and weary, wary looks upon their faces. They walked south, 
toward the city, toward King’s Landing, and only one in a hundred spared so 
much as a word for Yoren and his charges, traveling north. She wondered why no 
one else was going the same way as them.
Many of the travelers were armed; Arya saw daggers and

dirks, scythes and axes, and here and there a sword. Some had made clubs from 
tree limbs, or carved knobby staffs. They fingered their weapons and gave 
lingering looks at the wagons as they rolled by, yet in the end they let the 
column pass. Thirty was too many, no matter what they had in those 
wagons.
Look with your eyes, Syrio had said, listen with your 
ears.
One day a madwoman began to scream at them from the side of the road. “Fools! 
They’ll kill you, fools!” She was scarecrow thin, with hollow eyes and bloody 
feet.
The next morning, a sleek merchant on a grey mare reined up by Yoren and 
offered to buy his wagons and everything in them for a quarter of their worth. 
“It’s war, they’ll take what they want, you’ll do better selling to me, my 
friend.” Yoren turned away with a twist of his crooked shoulders, and 
spat.
Arya noticed the first grave that same day; a small mound beside the road, dug 
for a child. A crystal had been set in the soft earth, and Lommy wanted to take 
it until the Bull told him he’d better leave the dead alone. A few leagues 
farther on, Praed pointed out more graves, a whole row freshly dug. After that, 
a day hardly passed without one.
One time Arya woke in the dark, frightened for no reason she could name. Above, 
the Red Sword shared the sky with half a thousand stars. The night seemed oddly 
quiet to her, though she could hear Yoren’s muttered snores, the crackle of the 
fire, even the muffled stirrings of the donkeys. Yet somehow it felt as though 
the world were holding its breath, and the silence made her

shiver. She went back to sleep clutching Needle.
Come morning, when Praed did not awaken, Arya realized that it had been his 
coughing she had missed. They dug a grave of their own then, burying the 
sellsword where he’d slept. Yoren stripped him of his valuables before they 
threw the dirt on him. One man claimed his boots, another his dagger. His mail 
shirt and helm were parceled out. His longsword Yoren handed to the Bull. 
“Arms like yours, might be you can learn to use this,” he told him. A boy 
called Tarber tossed a handful of acorns on top of Praed’s body, so an oak 
might grow to mark his place.
That evening they stopped in a village at an ivy-covered inn. Yoren counted the 
coins in his purse and decided they had enough for a hot meal. “We’ll sleep 
outside, same as ever, but they got a bathhouse here, if any of you feels the 
need o’ hot water and a lick o’ soap.”
Arya did not dare, even though she smelled as bad as Yoren by now, all sour and 
stinky. Some of the creatures living in her clothes had come all the way from 
Flea Bottom with her; it didn’t seem right to drown them. Tarber and Hot Pie 
and the Bull joined the line of men headed for the tubs. Others settled down in 
front of the bathhouse. The rest crowded into the common room. Yoren even sent 
Lommy out with tankards for the three in fetters, who’d been left chained up in 
the back of their wagon.
Washed and unwashed alike supped on hot pork pies and baked apples. The
innkeeper 
gave them a round of beer on the house. “I had a brother took the black, years 
ago. Serving boy, clever, but

one day he got seen filching pepper from m’lord’s table. He liked the taste of 
it, is all. Just a pinch o’ pepper, but Ser Malcolm was a hard man. You get 
pepper on the Wall?” When Yoren shook his head, the man sighed. “Shame. Lync 
loved that pepper.”
Arya sipped at her tankard cautiously, between spoonfuls of pie still warm from 
the oven. Her father sometimes let them have a cup of beer, she remembered. 
Sansa used to make a face at the taste and say that wine was ever so much 
finer, but Arya had liked it well enough. It made her sad to think of Sansa and 
her father.
The inn was full of people moving south, and the common room erupted in scorn 
when Yoren said they were traveling the other way. “You’ll be back soon 
enough,” the innkeeper vowed. “There’s no going north. Half the fields are 
burnt, and what folks are left are walled up inside their holdfasts. One bunch 
rides off at dawn and another one shows up by dusk.”
“That’s nothing to us,” Yoren insisted stubbornly. “Tully or Lannister, 
makes no matter. The Watch takes no part.”
Lord Tully is my grandfather, Arya thought. It mattered to 
her, but she chewed her lip and kept quiet, listening.
“It’s more than Lannister and Tully,” the innkeeper said. “There’s wild men 
down from the Mountains of the Moon, try telling them you take no 
part. And the Starks are in it too, the young lord’s come down, the dead Hand’s 
son . . .”
Arya sat up straight, straining to hear. Did he mean Robb?
“I heard the boy rides to battle on a wolf,” said a yellow-haired man with a 
tankard in his hand.“Fool’s talk.” Yoren spat.
“The man I heard it from, he saw it himself. A wolf big as a horse, he 
swore.”
“Swearing don’t make it true, Hod,” the innkeeper said. “You keep swearing 
you’ll pay what you owe me, and I’ve yet to see a copper.” The common room 
erupted in laughter, and the man with the yellow hair turned red.
“It’s been a bad year for wolves,” volunteered a sallow man in a 
travel-stained green cloak. “Around the Gods Eye, the packs have grown 
bolder’n anyone can remember. Sheep, cows, dogs, makes no matter, they kill as 
they like, and they got no fear of men. It’s worth your life to go into those 
woods by night.”
“Ah, that’s more tales, and no more true than the other.”
“I heard the same thing from my cousin, and she’s not the sort to lie,” an 
old woman said. “She says there’s this great pack, hundreds of them, 
mankillers. The one that leads them is a she-wolf, a bitch from the seventh 
hell.”A she-wolf. Arya sloshed her beer, wondering. Was the Gods Eye near the 
Trident? She wished she had a map. It had been near the Trident that she’d left 
Nymeria. She hadn’t wanted to, but Jory said they had no choice, that if the 
wolf came back with them she’d be killed for biting Joffrey, even though he’d 
deserved it. They’d had to shout and scream and throw stones, and it wasn’t 
until a few of Arya’s stones struck home that the direwolf had finally stopped 
following them. She probably wouldn’t even know me now, Arya thought. 
Or if she did, she’d hate me.
The man in the green cloak said, “I heard how this hellbitch walked into a 
village one day . . . a market day, people everywhere, and she 
walks in bold as you please and tears a baby from his mother’s arms. When the 
tale reached Lord Mooton, him and his sons

swore they’d put an end to her. They tracked her to her lair with a pack of 
wolfhounds, and barely escaped with their skins. Not one of those dogs came 
back, not one.”
“That’s just a story,” Arya blurted out before she could stop herself. 
“Wolves don’t eat babies.”“And what would you know about it, lad?” asked the man in the green 
cloak.
Before she could think of an answer, Yoren had her by the arm. “The boy’s 
greensick on beer, that’s all it is.”
“No I’m not. They don’t eat babies . . .”
“Outside, boy . . . and see that you stay there 
until you learn to shut your mouth when men are talking.” He gave her a stiff 
shove, toward the side door that led back to the stables. “Go on now. See that 
the stableboy has watered our horses.”
Arya went outside, stiff with fury. “They don’t,” she muttered, 
kicking at a rock as she stalked off. It went rolling and fetched up under the 
wagons.
“Boy,” a friendly voice called out. “Lovely boy.”
One of the men in irons was talking to her. Warily, Arya approached the wagon, 
one hand on Needle’s hilt.
The prisoner lifted an empty tankard, his chains rattling. “A man could use 
another taste of beer. A man has a thirst, wearing these heavy bracelets.” He 
was the youngest of the three, slender, fine-featured, always smiling. His hair 
was red on one side and white on the other, all matted and filthy from cage and 
travel. “A man could use a bath too,” he said, when he saw the way Arya was 
looking at him. “A boy could make a friend.”
“I have friends,” Arya said.
“None I can see,” said the one without a nose. He was squat and thick, with 
huge hands. Black hair covered his arms and legs and chest, even his back. He 
reminded Arya of a drawing she

had once seen in a book, of an ape from the Summer Isles. The hole in his face 
made it hard to look at him for long.
The bald one opened his mouth and hissed like some immense white 
lizard. When Arya flinched back, startled, he opened his mouth wide and waggled 
his tongue at her, only it was more a stump than a tongue. “Stop that,” she 
blurted.
“A man does not choose his companions in the black cells,” the handsome one 
with the red-and-white hair said. Something about the way he talked reminded 
her of Syrio; it was the same, yet different too. “These two, they have no 
courtesy. A man must ask forgiveness. You are called Arry, is that not 
so?”
“Lumpyhead,” said the noseless one. “Lumpyhead Lumpyface Stickboy. 
Have a 
care, Lorath, he’ll hit you with his stick.”
“A man must be ashamed of the company he keeps, Arry,” the handsome one said. 
“This man has the honor to be Jaqen H’ghar, once of the Free City of Lorath. 
Would that he were home. This man’s ill-bred companions in captivity are named 
Rorge”—he waved his tankard at the noseless man—“and Biter.” 
Biter hissed at her again, displaying a mouthful of yellowed teeth 
filed into points. “A man must have some name, is that not so? Biter cannot 
speak and Biter cannot write, yet his teeth are very sharp, so a man calls him 
Biter and he smiles. Are you charmed?”
Arya backed away from the wagon. “No.” They can’t hurt me, she told 
herself, they’re all chained up.
He turned his tankard upside down. “A man must weep.”
Rorge, the noseless one, flung his drinking cup at her with

a curse. His manacles made him clumsy, yet even so he would have sent the heavy 
pewter tankard crashing into her head if Arya hadn’t leapt aside. “You get us 
some beer, pimple. Now!”
“You shut your mouth!” Arya tried to think what Syrio would have done. She 
drew her wooden practice sword.
“Come closer,” Rorge said, “and I’ll shove that stick up your bunghole and 
fuck you bloody.”
Fear cuts deeper than swords. Arya made herself approach the wagon. 
Every step was harder than the one before. Fierce as a wolverine, calm as 
still water. The words sang in her head. Syrio would not have been afraid. 
She was almost close enough to touch the wheel when Biter lurched to his feet 
and grabbed for her, his irons clanking and rattling. The manacles brought 
his hands up short, half a foot from her face. He hissed.
She hit him. Hard, right between his little eyes.
Screaming, Biter reeled back, and then threw all his weight against his chains. 
The links slithered and turned and grew taut, and Arya heard the creak of old 
dry wood as the great iron rings strained against the floorboards of the wagon. 
Huge pale hands groped for her while veins bulged along Biter’s arms, but the 
bonds held, and finally the man collapsed backward. Blood ran from the weeping 
sores on his cheeks.
“A boy has more courage than sense,” the one who had named himself Jaqen 
H’ghar observed.
Arya edged backward away from the wagon. When she felt the hand on her 
shoulder, she whirled, bringing up her stick sword

again, but it was only the Bull. “What are you doing?”
He raised his hands defensively. “Yoren said none of us should go near those 
three.”
“They don’t scare me,” Arya said.
“Then you’re stupid. They scare me.” The Bull’s hand fell to the 
hilt of his sword, and Rorge began to laugh. “Let’s get away from 
them.”
Arya scuffed at the ground with her foot, but she let the Bull lead her around 
to the front of the inn. Rorge’s laughter and Biter’s hissing followed them. 
“Want to fight?” she asked the Bull. She wanted to hit something.
He blinked at her, startled. Strands of thick black hair, still wet from the 
bathhouse, fell across his deep blue eyes. “I’d hurt you.”
“You would not.”
“You don’t know how strong I am.”
“You don’t know how quick I am.”
“You’re asking for it, Arry.” He drew Praed’s longsword. “This is cheap 
steel, but it’s a real sword.”
Arya unsheathed Needle. “This is good steel, so it’s realer than 
yours.”
The Bull shook his head. “Promise not to cry if I cut you?”
“I’ll promise if you will.” She turned sideways, into her water dancer’s 
stance, but the Bull did not move. He was looking at something behind her. 
“What’s wrong?”
“Gold cloaks.” His face closed up tight.It couldn’t be, Arya thought, but when she glanced back, they 
were riding up the kingsroad, six in the black ringmail and golden cloaks of 
the City Watch. One was an officer; he wore a black enamel breastplate 
ornamented with four golden disks. They drew up in front of the inn. Look 
with your eyes, Syrio’s voice seemed to whisper. Her eyes saw white lather 
under their saddles; the horses had been ridden long and hard. Calm as still 
water, she took the Bull by the arm and drew him back behind a tall flowering 
hedge.
“What is it?” he asked. “What are you doing? Let go.”
“Quiet as a shadow,” she whispered, pulling him down.
Some of Yoren’s other charges were sitting in front of the bathhouse, waiting 
their turn at a tub. “You men,” one of the gold cloaks shouted. “You the 
ones left to take the black?”
“We might be,” came the cautious answer.
“We’d rather join you boys,” old Reysen said. “We hear it’s cold 
on that Wall.”
The gold cloak officer dismounted. “I have a warrant for a certain 
boy—”
Yoren stepped out of the inn, fingering his tangled black beard. “Who is it 
wants this boy?”
The other gold cloaks were dismounting to stand beside their horses. “Why are 
we hiding?” the Bull whispered.
“It’s me they want,” Arya whispered back. His ear smelled of soap. “You be 
quiet.”
“The queen wants him, old man, not that it’s your concern,”

the officer said, drawing a ribbon from his belt. “Here, Her Grace’s seal and 
warrant.”
Behind the hedge, the Bull shook his head doubtfully. “Why would the queen 
want you, Arry?”
She punched his shoulder. “Be quiet!”
Yoren fingered the warrant ribbon with its blob of golden wax. “Pretty.” He 
spit. “Thing is, the boy’s in the Night’s Watch now. What he done back in the 
city don’t mean piss-all.”
“The queen’s not interested in your views, old man, and neither am I,” the 
officer said. “I’ll have the boy.”
Arya thought about running, but she knew she wouldn’t get far on her donkey 
when the gold cloaks had horses. And she was so tired of running. She’d run 
when Ser Meryn came for her, and again when they killed her father. If she was 
a real water dancer, she would go out there with Needle and kill all of them, 
and never run from anyone ever again.
“You’ll have no one,” Yoren said stubbornly. “There’s laws on such 
things.”
The gold cloak drew a shortsword. “Here’s your law.”
Yoren looked at the blade. “That’s no law, just a sword. Happens I got one 
too.”
The officer smiled. “Old fool. I have five men with me.”
Yoren spat. “Happens I got thirty.”
The gold cloak laughed. “This lot?” said a big lout with a broken nose. 
“Who’s first?” he shouted, showing his steel.
Tarber plucked a pitchfork out of a bale of hay. “I am.”“No, I am,” called Cutjack, the plump stonemason, pulling his hammer 
off the leather apron he always wore.
“Me.” Kurz came up off the ground with his skinning knife in hand.
“Me and him.” Koss strung his longbow.
“All of us,” said Reysen, snatching up the tall hardwood walking staff he 
carried.
Dobber stepped naked out of the bathhouse with his clothes in a bundle, saw 
what was happening, and dropped everything but his dagger. “Is it a fight?” 
he asked.
“I guess,” said Hot Pie, scrambling on all fours for a big rock to throw. 
Arya could not believe what she was seeing. She hated Hot Pie! Why 
would he risk himself for her?
The one with the broken nose still thought it was funny. “You girls put away 
them rocks and sticks before you get spanked. None of you knows what end of a 
sword to hold.”
“I do!” Arya wouldn’t let them die for her like Syrio. She 
wouldn’t! Shoving through the hedge with Needle in hand, she slid into a water 
dancer’s stance.
Broken Nose guffawed. The officer looked her up and down. “Put the blade away, 
little girl, no one wants to hurt you.”
“I’m not a girl!” she yelled, furious. What was wrong with them? 
They rode all this way for her and here she was and they were just smiling at 
her. “I’m the one you want.”
“He’s the one we want.” The officer jabbed his shortsword toward 
the Bull, who’d come forward to stand beside her, Praed’s

cheap steel in his hand.
But it was a mistake to take his eyes off Yoren, even for an instant. Quick as 
that, the black brother’s sword was pressed to the apple of the officer’s 
throat. “Neither’s the one you get, less you want me to see if your apple’s 
ripe yet. I got me ten, fifteen more brothers in that inn, if you still need 
convincing. I was you, I’d let loose of that gutcutter, spread my cheeks over 
that fat little horse, and gallop on back to the city.” He spat, and poked 
harder with the point of his sword. “Now.”
The officer’s fingers uncurled. His sword fell in the dust.
“We’ll just keep that,” Yoren said. “Good steel’s always needed on the 
Wall.”
“As you say. For now. Men.” The gold cloaks sheathed and mounted up. “You’d 
best scamper up to that Wall of yours in a hurry, old man. The next time I 
catch you, I believe I’ll have your head to go with the bastard 
boy’s.”
“Better men than you have tried.” Yoren slapped the rump of the officer’s 
horse with the flat of his sword and sent him reeling off down the kingsroad. 
His men followed.
When they were out of sight, Hot Pie began to whoop, but Yoren looked angrier 
than ever. “Fool! You think he’s done with us? Next time he won’t prance up 
and hand me no damn ribbon. Get the rest out o’ them baths, we need to be 
moving. Ride all night, maybe we can stay ahead o’ them for a bit.” He scooped 
up the shortsword the officer had dropped. “Who wants this?”
“Me!” Hot Pie yelled.“Don’t be using it on Arry.” He handed the boy the sword, hilt first, 
and walked over to Arya, but it was the Bull he spoke to. “Queen wants you 
bad, boy.”
Arya was lost. “Why should she want him?”
The Bull scowled at her. “Why should she want you? You’re nothing 
but a little gutter rat!”
“Well, you’re nothing but a bastard boy!” Or maybe he was only 
pretending to be a bastard boy. “What’s your true name?”
“Gendry,” he said, like he wasn’t quite sure.
“Don’t see why no one wants neither o’ you,” Yoren said, “but they can’t 
have you regardless. You ride them two coursers. First sight of a gold cloak, 
make for the Wall like a dragon’s on your tail. The rest o’ us don’t mean spit 
to them.”
“Except for you,” Arya pointed out. “That man said he’d take your head 
too.”
“Well, as to that,” Yoren said, “if he can get it off my shoulders, he’s 
welcome to it.”

The road was little more than two ruts through the weeds.
The good part was, with so little traffic there’d be no one to point the finger 
and say which way they’d gone. The human flood that had flowed down the 
kingsroad was only a trickle here.The bad part was, the road wound back and forth like a snake, tangling 
with even smaller trails and sometimes seeming to vanish entirely only to 
reappear half a league farther on when they had all but given up hope. Arya 
hated it. The land was gentle enough, rolling hills and terraced fields 
interspersed with meadows and woodlands and little valleys where willows 
crowded close to slow shallow streams. Even so, the path was so narrow and 
crooked that their pace had dropped to a crawl.
It was the wagons that slowed them, lumbering along, axles creaking under the 
weight of their heavy loads. A dozen times a day they had to stop to free a 
wheel that had stuck in a rut, or double up the teams to climb a muddy slope. 
Once, in the middle of a dense stand of oak, they came face-to-face with three 
men pulling a load of firewood in an ox cart, with no way for either to get 
around. There had been nothing for it but to wait while the foresters unhitched 
their ox, led him through the trees, spun the cart, hitched the ox up again, 
and started back the way they’d come. The ox was even slower than the 
wagons, so that day they
hardly got anywhere at all.
Arya could not help looking over her shoulder, wondering when the gold cloaks 
would catch them. At night, she woke at every noise to grab for Needle’s hilt. 
They never made camp without putting out sentries now, but Arya did not trust 
them, especially the orphan boys. They might have done well enough in the 
alleys of King’s Landing, but out here they were lost. When she was being quiet 
as a shadow, she could sneak past all of them, flitting out by starlight to 
make her water in the woods where no one would see. Once, when Lommy Greenhands 
had
the watch, she shimmied up an oak and moved from tree to tree until she was 
right above his head, and he never saw a thing. She would have jumped down on 
top of him, but she knew his scream would wake the whole camp, and Yoren might 
take a stick to her again.
Lommy and the other orphans all treated the Bull like someone special now 
because the queen wanted his head, though he would have none of it. “I never 
did nothing to no queen,” he said angrily. “I did my work, is all. Bellows 
and tongs and fetch and carry. I was s’posed to be an armorer, and one day 
Master Mott says I got to join the Night’s Watch, that’s all I know.” Then 
he’d go off to polish his helm. It was a beautiful helm, rounded and curved, 
with a slit visor and two great metal bull’s horns. Arya would watch him polish 
the metal with an oilcloth, shining it so bright you could see the flames of 
the cookfire reflected in the steel. Yet he never actually put it on his 
head.
“I bet he’s that traitor’s bastard,” Lommy said one night,

in a hushed voice so Gendry would not hear. “The wolf lord, the one they 
nicked on Baelor’s steps.”
“He is not,” Arya declared. My father only had one bastard, and that’s 
Jon. She stalked off into the trees, wishing she could just saddle her 
horse and ride home. She was a good horse, a chestnut mare with a white blaze 
on her forehead. And Arya had always been a good rider. She could gallop off 
and never see any of them, unless she wanted to. Only then she’d have no one to 
scout ahead of her, or watch behind, or stand guard while she napped, and when 
the gold cloaks caught her, she’d be all alone. It was safer to stay with Yoren 
and the others.
“We’re not far from Gods Eye,” the black brother said one morning. “The 
kingsroad won’t be safe till we’re across the Trident. So we’ll come up around 
the lake along the western shore, they’re not like to look for us there.” At 
the next spot where two ruts cut cross each other, he turned the wagons 
west.
Here farmland gave way to forest, the villages and holdfasts were smaller and 
farther apart, the hills higher and the valleys deeper. Food grew harder to 
come by. In the city, Yoren had loaded up the wagons with salt fish, hard 
bread, lard, turnips, sacks of beans and barley, and wheels of yellow cheese, 
but every bite of it had been eaten. Forced to live off the land, Yoren turned 
to Koss and Kurz, who’d been taken as poachers. He would send them ahead of the 
column, into the woods, and come dusk they would be back with a deer slung 
between them on a pole or a brace of quail swinging from their belts. The 
younger boys would be set

to picking blackberries along the road, or climbing fences to fill a sack with 
apples if they happened upon an orchard.
Arya was a skilled climber and a fast picker, and she liked to go off by 
herself. One day she came across a rabbit, purely by happenstance. It was brown 
and fat, with long ears and a twitchy nose. Rabbits ran faster than cats, but 
they couldn’t climb trees half so well. She whacked it with her stick and 
grabbed it by its ears, and Yoren stewed it with some mushrooms and wild 
onions. Arya was given a whole leg, since it was her rabbit. She shared it with 
Gendry. The rest of them each got a spoonful, even the three in manacles. Jaqen 
H’ghar thanked her politely for the treat, and Biter licked the grease off his 
dirty fingers with a blissful look, but Rorge, the noseless one, only laughed 
and said, “There’s a hunter now. Lumpyface Lumpyhead Rabbitkiller.”
Outside a holdfast called Briarwhite, some fieldhands surrounded them in a 
cornfield, demanding coin for the ears they’d taken. Yoren eyed their scythes 
and tossed them a few coppers. “Time was, a man in black was feasted from 
Dorne to Winterfell, and even high lords called it an honor to shelter him 
under their roofs,” he said bitterly. “Now cravens like you want hard coin 
for a bite of wormy apple.” He spat.
“It’s sweetcorn, better’n a stinking old black bird like you deserves,” one 
of them answered roughly. “You get out of our field now, and take these sneaks 
and stabbers with you, or we’ll stake you up in the corn to scare the other 
crows away.”
They roasted the sweetcorn in the husk that night, turning

the ears with long forked sticks, and ate it hot right off the cob. Arya 
thought it tasted wonderful, but Yoren was too angry to eat. A cloud seemed to 
hang over him, ragged and black as his cloak. He paced about the camp 
restlessly, muttering to himself.
The next day Koss came racing back to warn Yoren of a camp ahead. “Twenty or 
thirty men, in mail and halfhelms,” he said. “Some of them are cut up bad, 
and one’s dying, from the sound of him. With all the noise he was making, I got 
right up close. They got spears and shields, but only one horse, and that’s 
lame. I think they been there awhile, from the stink of the place.”
“See a banner?”
“Spotted treecat, yellow and black, on a mud-brown field.”
Yoren folded a sourleaf into his mouth and chewed. “Can’t say,” he admitted. 
“Might be one side, might be t’other. If they’re hurt that bad, likely they’d 
take our mounts no matter who they are. Might be they’d take more than that. I 
believe we’ll go wide around them.” It took them miles out of their way, and 
cost them two days at the least, but the old man said it was cheap at the 
price. “You’ll have time enough on the Wall. The rest o’ your lives, most 
like. Seems to me there’s no rush to get there.”
Arya saw men guarding the fields more and more when they turned north again. 
Often they stood silently beside the road, giving a cold eye to anyone who 
passed. Elsewhere they patrolled on horses, riding their fence lines with axes 
strapped to their saddles. At one place, she spotted a man perched up in a dead 
tree, with a bow in his hand and a quiver hanging from the branch

beside him. The moment he spied them, he notched an arrow to his bowstring, and 
never looked away until the last wagon was out of sight. All the while, Yoren 
cursed. “Him in his tree, let’s see how well he likes it up there when the 
Others come to take him. He’ll scream for the Watch then, that he 
will.”
A day later Dobber spied a red glow against the evening sky. “Either this road 
went and turned again, or that sun’s setting in the north.”
Yoren climbed a rise to get a better look. “Fire,” he announced. He licked a 
thumb and held it up. “Wind should blow it away from us. Still bears 
watching.”
And watch it they did. As the world darkened, the fire seemed to grow brighter 
and brighter, until it looked as though the whole north was ablaze. From time 
to time, they could even smell the smoke, though the wind held steady and the 
flames never got any closer. By dawn the fire had burned itself out, but none 
of them slept very well that night.
It was midday when they arrived at the place where the village had been. The 
fields were a charred desolation for miles around, the houses blackened shells. 
The carcasses of burnt and butchered animals dotted the ground, under living 
blankets of carrion crows that rose, cawing furiously, when disturbed. Smoke 
still drifted from inside the holdfast. Its timber palisade looked strong from 
afar, but had not proved strong enough.
Riding out in front of the wagons on her horse, Arya saw burnt bodies impaled 
on sharpened stakes atop the walls, their

hands drawn up tight in front of their faces as if to fight off the flames that 
had consumed them. Yoren called a halt when they were still some distance off, 
and told Arya and the other boys to guard the wagons while he and Murch and 
Cutjack went in on foot. A flock of ravens rose from inside the walls when they 
climbed through the broken gate, and the caged ravens in their wagons called 
out to them with quorks and raucous shrieks.
“Should we go in after them?” Arya asked Gendry after Yoren and the others 
had been gone a long time.
“Yoren said wait.” Gendry’s voice sounded hollow. When Arya turned to look, 
she saw that he was wearing his helm, all shiny steel and great curving 
horns.
When they finally returned, Yoren had a little girl in his arms, and Murch and 
Cutjack were carrying a woman in a sling made of an old torn quilt. The girl 
was no older than two and she cried all the time, a whimpery sound, like 
something was caught in her throat. Either she couldn’t talk yet or she had 
forgotten how. The woman’s right arm ended in a bloody stump at her elbow, and 
her eyes didn’t seem to see anything, even when she was looking right at it. 
She talked, but she only said one thing. “Please,” she cried, over and over. 
“Please. Please.” Rorge thought that was funny. He laughed through the hole 
in his face where his nose had been, and Biter started laughing too, until 
Murch cursed them and told them to shut up.
Yoren had them fix the woman a place in the back of a wagon. “And be quick 
about it,” he said. “Come dark, there’ll be wolves

here, and worse.”
“I’m scared,” Hot Pie murmured when he saw the one-armed woman thrashing in 
the wagon.
“Me too,” Arya confessed.
He squeezed her shoulder. “I never truly kicked no boy to death, Arry. I just 
sold my mommy’s pies, is all.”
Arya rode as far ahead of the wagons as she dared, so she wouldn’t have to hear 
the little girl crying or listen to the woman whisper, “Please.” She 
remembered a story Old Nan had told once, about a man imprisoned in a dark 
castle by evil giants. He was very brave and smart and he tricked the giants 
and escaped . . . but no sooner was he outside the castle than 
the Others took him, and drank his hot red blood. Now she knew how he must have 
felt.
The one-armed woman died at evenfall. Gendry and Cutjack dug her grave on a 
hillside beneath a weeping willow. When the wind blew, Arya thought she could 
hear the long trailing branches whispering, “Please. Please. Please.” The 
little hairs on the back of her neck rose, and she almost ran from the 
graveside.
“No fire tonight,” Yoren told them. Supper was a handful of wild radishes 
Koss found, a cup of dry beans, water from a nearby brook. The water had a 
funny taste to it, and Lommy told them it was the taste of bodies, rotting 
someplace upstream. Hot Pie would have hit him if old Reysen hadn’t pulled them 
apart.
Arya drank too much water, just to fill her belly with something. She never 
thought she’d be able to sleep, yet somehow she did. When she woke, it was 
pitch-black and her bladder was

full to bursting. Sleepers huddled all around her, wrapped in blankets and 
cloaks. Arya found Needle, stood, listened. She heard the soft footfalls of a 
sentry, men turning in restless sleep, Rorge’s rattling snores, and the queer 
hissing sound that Biter made when he slept. From a different wagon came the 
steady rhythmic scrape of steel on stone as Yoren sat, chewing sourleaf and 
sharpening the edge of his dirk.
Hot Pie was one of the boys on watch. “Where you going?” he asked when he saw 
Arya heading for the trees.
Arya waved vaguely at the woods.
“No you’re not,” Hot Pie said. He had gotten bolder again now that he had a 
sword on his belt, even though it was just a shortsword and he handled it like 
a cleaver. “The old man said for everyone to stay close tonight.”
“I need to make water,” Arya explained.
“Well, use that tree right there.” He pointed. “You don’t know what’s out 
there, Arry. I heard wolves before.”
Yoren wouldn’t like it if she fought with him. She tried to look afraid. 
“Wolves? For true?”
“I heard,” he assured her.
“I don’t think I need to go after all.” She went back to her blanket and 
pretended to sleep until she heard Hot Pie’s footsteps going away. Then she 
rolled over and slipped off into the woods on the other side of the camp, quiet 
as a shadow. There were sentries out this way too, but Arya had no trouble 
avoiding them. Just to make sure, she went out twice as far as usual.

When she was sure there was no one near, she skinned down her breeches and 
squatted to do her business.
She was making water, her clothing tangled about her ankles, when she heard 
rustling from under the trees. Hot Pie, she thought in panic, he 
followed me. Then she saw the eyes shining out from the wood, bright with 
reflected moonlight. Her belly clenched tight as she grabbed for Needle, not 
caring if she pissed herself, counting eyes, two four eight twelve, a whole 
pack . . .
One of them came padding out from under the trees. He stared at her, and bared 
his teeth, and all she could think was how stupid she’d been and how Hot Pie 
would gloat when they found her half-eaten body the next morning. But the wolf 
turned and raced back into the darkness, and quick as that the eyes were gone. 
Trembling, she cleaned herself and laced up and followed a distant scraping 
sound back to camp, and to Yoren. Arya climbed up into the wagon beside him, 
shaken. “Wolves,” she whispered hoarsely. “In the woods.”
“Aye. They would be.” He never looked at her.
“They scared me.”
“Did they?” He spat. “Seems to me your kind was fond o’ wolves.”
“Nymeria was a direwolf.” Arya hugged herself. “That’s different. Anyhow, 
she’s gone. Jory and I threw rocks at her until she ran off, or else the queen 
would have killed her.” It made her sad to talk about it. “I bet if she’d 
been in the city, she wouldn’t have let them cut off Father’s head.”“Orphan boys got no fathers,” Yoren said, “or did you forget that?” 
The sourleaf had turned his spit red, so it looked like his mouth was bleeding. 
“The only wolves we got to fear are the ones wear manskin, like those who done 
for that village.”
“I wish I was home,” she said miserably. She tried so hard to be brave, to be 
fierce as a wolverine and all, but sometimes she felt like she was just a 
little girl after all.
The black brother peeled a fresh sourleaf from the bale in the wagon and 
stuffed it into his mouth. “Might be I should of left you where I found you, 
boy. All of you. Safer in the city, seems to me.”
“I don’t care. I want to go home.”
“Been bringing men to the Wall for close on thirty years.” Froth shone on 
Yoren’s lips, like bubbles of blood. “All that time, I only lost three. Old 
man died of a fever, city boy got snakebit taking a shit, and one fool tried to 
kill me in my sleep and got a red smile for his trouble.” He drew the dirk 
across his throat, to show her. “Three in thirty years.” He spat out the old 
sourleaf. “A ship now, might have been wiser. No chance o’ finding more men on 
the way, but still . . . clever man, he’d go by ship, but 
me . . . thirty years I been taking this kingsroad.” He 
sheathed his dirk. “Go to sleep, boy. Hear me?”
She did try. Yet as she lay under her thin blanket, she could hear the wolves 
howling . . . and another sound, fainter, no more than a 
whisper on the wind, that might have been screams.

The river was a blue-green ribbon shining in the morning sun. Reeds grew 
thick in the shallows along the banks, and Arya saw a water snake skimming 
across the surface, ripples spreading out behind it as it went. Overhead a hawk 
flew in lazy circles.
It seemed a peaceful place . . . until Koss spotted the dead 
man. “There, in the reeds.” He pointed, and Arya saw it. The body of a 
soldier, shapeless and swollen. His sodden green cloak had hung up on a rotted 
log, and a school of tiny silver fishes were nibbling at his face. “I told you 
there was bodies,” Lommy announced. “I could taste them in that 
water.”When Yoren saw the corpse, he spat. “Dobber, see if he’s got anything 
worth the taking. Mail, knife, a bit o’ coin, what have you.” He spurred his 
gelding and rode out into the river, but the horse struggled in the soft mud 
and beyond the reeds the water deepened. Yoren rode back angry, his horse 
covered in brown slime up to the knees. “We won’t be crossing here. Koss, 
you’ll come with me upriver, look for a ford. Woth, Gerren, you go downstream. 
The rest o’ you wait here. Put a guard out.”
Dobber found a leather purse in the dead man’s belt. Inside were four coppers 
and a little hank of blond hair tied up with a red ribbon. Lommy and Tarber 
stripped naked and went wading, and Lommy scooped up handfuls of slimy mud and 
threw them at Hot Pie,

shouting, “Mud Pie! Mud Pie!” In the back of their wagon, Rorge cursed and 
threatened and told them to unchain him while Yoren was gone, but no one paid 
him any mind. Kurz caught a fish with his bare hands. Arya saw how he did it, 
standing over a shallow pool, calm as still water, his hand darting out quick 
as a snake when the fish swam near. It didn’t look as hard as catching cats. 
Fish didn’t have claws.
It was midday when the others returned. Woth reported a wooden bridge half a 
mile downstream, but someone had burned it up. Yoren peeled a sourleaf off the 
bale. “Might be we could swim the horses over, maybe the donkeys, but there’s 
no way we’ll get those wagons across. And there’s smoke to the north and west, 
more fires, could be this side o’ the river’s the place we want to be.” He 
picked up a long stick and drew a circle in the mud, a line trailing down from 
it. “That’s Gods Eye, with the river flowing south. We’re here.” He poked a 
hole beside the line of the river, under the circle. “We can’t go round west 
of the lake, like I thought. East takes us back to the kingsroad.” He moved 
the stick up to where the line and circle met. “Near as I recall, there’s a 
town here. The holdfast’s stone, and there’s a lordling got his seat there too, 
just a towerhouse, but he’ll have a guard, might be a knight or two. We follow 
the river north, should be there before dark. They’ll have boats, so I mean to 
sell all we got and hire us one.” He drew the stick up through the circle of 
the lake, from bottom to top. “Gods be good, we’ll find a wind and sail across 
the Gods Eye to Harrentown.” He thrust the point

down at the top of the circle. “We can buy new mounts there, or else take 
shelter at Harrenhal. That’s Lady Whent’s seat, and she’s always been a friend 
o’ the Watch.”
Hot Pie’s eyes got wide. “There’s ghosts in 
Harrenhal . . .”
Yoren spat. “There’s for your ghosts.” He tossed the stick down in the mud. 
“Mount up.”
Arya was remembering the stories Old Nan used to tell of Harrenhal. Evil King 
Harren had walled himself up inside, so Aegon unleashed his dragons and turned 
the castle into a pyre. Nan said that fiery spirits still haunted the blackened 
towers. Sometimes men went to sleep safe in their beds and were found dead in 
the morning, all burnt up. Arya didn’t really believe that, and anyhow it had 
all happened a long time ago. Hot Pie was being silly; it wouldn’t be ghosts at 
Harrenhal, it would be knights. Arya could reveal herself to Lady 
Whent, and the knights would escort her home and keep her safe. That was what 
knights did; they kept you safe, especially women. Maybe Lady Whent would even 
help the crying girl.
The river track was no kingsroad, yet it was not half bad for what it was, and 
for once the wagons rolled along smartly. They saw the first house an hour shy 
of evenfall, a snug little thatch-roofed cottage surrounded by fields of wheat. 
Yoren rode out ahead, hallooing, but got no answer. “Dead, might be. Or 
hiding. Dobber, Rey, with me.” The three men went into the cottage. “Pots is 
gone, no sign o’ any coin laid by,” Yoren muttered when they returned. “No 
animals. Run, most like. Might

be we met ’em on the kingsroad.” At least the house and field had not been 
burned, and there were no corpses about. Tarber found a garden out back, and 
they pulled some onions and radishes and filled a sack with cabbages before 
they went on their way.
A little farther up the road, they glimpsed a forester’s cabin surrounded by 
old trees and neatly stacked logs ready for the splitting, and later a 
ramshackle stilt-house leaning over the river on poles ten feet tall, both 
deserted. They passed more fields, wheat and corn and barley ripening in the 
sun, but here there were no men sitting in trees, nor walking the rows with 
scythes. Finally the town came into view; a cluster of white houses spread out 
around the walls of the holdfast, a big sept with a shingled wooden roof, the 
lord’s towerhouse sitting on a small rise to the west . . . and 
no sign of any people, anywhere.
Yoren sat on his horse, frowning through his tangle of beard. “Don’t like 
it,” he said, “but there it is. We’ll go have us a look. A careful 
look. See maybe there’s some folk hiding. Might be they left a boat behind, or 
some weapons we can use.”
The black brother left ten to guard the wagons and the whimpery little girl, 
and split the rest of them into four groups of five to search the town. “Keep 
your eyes and ears open,” he warned them, before he rode off to the towerhouse 
to see if there was any sign of the lordling or his guards.
Arya found herself with Gendry, Hot Pie, and Lommy. Squat, kettle-bellied Woth 
had pulled an oar on a galley once, which made him the next best thing they had 
to a sailor, so Yoren told him to

take them down to the lakefront and see if they could find a boat. As they rode 
between the silent white houses, gooseprickles crawled up Arya’s arms. This 
empty town frightened her almost as much as the burnt holdfast where they’d 
found the crying girl and the one-armed woman. Why would people run off and 
leave their homes and everything? What could scare them so much?
The sun was low to the west, and the houses cast long dark shadows. A sudden 
clap of sound made Arya reach for Needle, but it was only a shutter banging in 
the wind. After the open river shore, the closeness of the town unnerved 
her.
When she glimpsed the lake ahead between houses and trees, Arya put her knees 
into her horse, galloping past Woth and Gendry. She burst out onto the grassy 
sward beside the pebbled shore. The setting sun made the tranquil surface of 
the water shimmer like a sheet of beaten copper. It was the biggest lake she 
had ever seen, with no hint of a far shore. She saw a rambling inn to her left, 
built out over the water on heavy wooden pilings. To her right, a long pier 
jutted into the lake, and there were other docks farther east, wooden fingers 
reaching out from the town. But the only boat in view was an upside-down 
rowboat abandoned on the rocks beneath the inn, its bottom thoroughly rotted 
out. “They’re gone,” Arya said, dejected. What would they do now?
“There’s an inn,” Lommy said, when the others rode up. “Do you think they 
left any food? Or ale?”
“Let’s go see,” Hot Pie suggested.
“Never you mind about no inn,” snapped Woth. “Yoren said

we’re to find a boat.”
“They took the boats.” Somehow Arya knew it was true; they could search the 
whole town, and they’d find no more than the upside-down rowboat. Despondent, 
she climbed off her horse and knelt by the lake. The water lapped softly around 
her legs. A few lantern bugs were coming out, their little lights blinking on 
and off. The green water was warm as tears, but there was no salt in it. It 
tasted of summer and mud and growing things. Arya plunged her face down into it 
to wash off the dust and dirt and sweat of the day. When she leaned back the 
trickles ran down the back of her neck and under her collar. They felt good. 
She wished she could take off her clothes and swim, gliding through the warm 
water like an skinny pink otter. Maybe she could swim all the way to 
Winterfell.
Woth was shouting at her to help search, so she did, peering into boathouses 
and sheds while her horse grazed along the shore. They found some sails, some 
nails, buckets of tar gone hard, and a mother cat with a litter of new-born 
kittens. But no boats.
The town was as dark as any forest when Yoren and the others reappeared. 
“Tower’s empty,” he said. “Lord’s gone off to fight maybe, or to get his 
smallfolk to safety, no telling. Not a horse or pig left in town, but we’ll 
eat. Saw a goose running loose, and some chickens, and there’s good fish in the 
Gods Eye.”
“The boats are gone,” Arya reported.
“We could patch the bottom of that rowboat,” said Koss.
“Might do for four o’ us,” Yoren said.“There’s nails,” Lommy pointed out. “And there’s trees all around. We 
could build us all boats.”
Yoren spat. “You know anything ’bout boat-building, dyer’s boy?” Lommy looked 
blank.
“A raft,” suggested Gendry. “Anyone can build a raft, and long poles for 
pushing.”
Yoren looked thoughtful. “Lake’s too deep to pole across, but if we stayed to 
the shallows near shore . . . it’d mean leaving the wagons. 
Might be that’s best. I’ll sleep on it.”
“Can we stay at the inn?” Lommy asked.
“We’ll stay in the holdfast, with the gates barred,” the old man said. “I 
like the feel o’ stone walls about me when I sleep.”
Arya could not keep quiet. “We shouldn’t stay here,” she blurted. “The 
people didn’t. They all ran off, even their lord.”
“Arry’s scared,” Lommy announced, braying laughter.
“I’m not,” she snapped back, “but they were.”
“Smart boy,” said Yoren. “Thing is, the folks who lived here were at war, 
like it or no. We’re not. Night’s Watch takes no part, so no man’s our 
enemy.”
And no man’s our friend, she thought, but this time she held her 
tongue. Lommy and the rest were looking at her, and she did not want to seem 
craven in front of them.
The holdfast gates were studded with iron nails. Within, they found a pair of 
iron bars the size of saplings, with post holes in the ground and metal 
brackets on the gate. When they slotted the bars through the brackets, they 
made a huge X brace.

It was no Red Keep, Yoren announced when they’d explored the holdfast top to 
bottom, but it was better than most, and should do for a night well enough. The 
walls were rough unmortared stone ten feet high, with a wooden catwalk inside 
the battlements. There was a postern gate to the north, and Gerren discovered a 
trap under the straw in the old wooden barn, leading to a narrow, winding 
tunnel. He followed it a long way under the earth and came out by the lake. 
Yoren had them roll a wagon on top of the trap, to make certain no one came in 
that way. He divided them into three watches, and sent Tarber, Kurz, and 
Cutjack off to the abandoned towerhouse to keep an eye out from on high. Kurz 
had a hunting horn to sound if danger threatened.
They drove their wagons and animals inside and barred the gates behind them. 
The barn was a ramshackle thing, large enough to hold half the animals in the 
town. The haven, where the townfolk would shelter in times of trouble, was even 
larger, low and long and built of stone, with a thatched roof. Koss went out 
the postern gate and brought the goose back, and two chickens as well, and 
Yoren allowed a cookfire. There was a big kitchen inside the holdfast, though 
all the pots and kettles had been taken. Gendry, Dobber, and Arya drew cook 
duty. Dobber told Arya to pluck the fowl while Gendry split wood. “Why can’t I 
split the wood?” she asked, but no one listened. Sullenly, she set to plucking 
a chicken while Yoren sat on the end of the bench sharpening the edge of his 
dirk with a whetstone.
When the food was ready, Arya ate a chicken leg and a bit of

onion. No one talked much, not even Lommy. Gendry went off by himself 
afterward, polishing his helm with a look on his face like he wasn’t even 
there. The crying girl whimpered and wept, but when Hot Pie offered her a bit 
of goose she gobbled it down and looked for more.
Arya drew second watch, so she found a straw pallet in the haven. Sleep did not 
come easy, so she borrowed Yoren’s stone and set to honing Needle. Syrio Forel 
had said that a dull blade was like a lame horse. Hot Pie squatted on the 
pallet beside her, watching her work. “Where’d you get a good sword like 
that?” he asked. When he saw the look she gave him, he raised his hands 
defensively. “I never said you stole it, I just wanted to know where you got 
it, is all.”
“My brother gave it to me,” she muttered.
“I never knew you had no brother.”
Arya paused to scratch under her shirt. There were fleas in the straw, though 
she couldn’t see why a few more would bother her. “I have lots of 
brothers.”
“You do? Are they bigger than you, or littler?”
I shouldn’t be talking like this. Yoren said I should keep my mouth 
shut. “Bigger,” she lied. “They have swords too, big longswords, and 
they showed me how to kill people who bother me.”
“I was talking, not bothering.” Hot Pie went off and let her alone and Arya 
curled up on her pallet. She could hear the crying girl from the far side of 
the haven. I wish she’d just be quiet. Why does she have to cry all the 
time?She must have slept, though she never remembered closing her eyes. She 
dreamed a wolf was howling, and the sound was so terrible that it woke her at 
once. Arya sat up on her pallet with her heart thumping. “Hot Pie, wake up.” 
She scrambled to her feet. “Woth, Gendry, didn’t you hear?” She pulled on a 
boot.
All around her, men and boys stirred and crawled from their pallets. “What’s 
wrong?” Hot Pie asked. “Hear what?” Gendry wanted to know. “Arry had a bad 
dream,” someone else said.
“No, I heard it,” she insisted. “A wolf.”
“Arry has wolves in his head,” sneered Lommy. “Let them howl,” Gerren said, 
“they’re out there, we’re in here.” Woth agreed. “Never saw no wolf could 
storm a holdfast.” Hot Pie was saying, “I never heard nothing.”
“It was a wolf,” she shouted at them as she yanked on her second 
boot. “Something’s wrong, someone’s coming, get up!”
Before they could hoot her down again, the sound came shuddering through the 
night—only it was no wolf this time, it was Kurz blowing his hunting 
horn, sounding danger. In a heartbeat, all of them were pulling on clothes and 
snatching for whatever weapons they owned. Arya ran for the gate as the horn 
sounded again. As she dashed past the barn, Biter threw himself furiously 
against his chains, and Jaqen H’ghar called out from the back of their wagon. 
“Boy! Sweet boy! Is it war, red war? Boy, free us. A man can fight. 
Boy!” She ignored him and plunged on. By then she could hear horses 
and shouts beyond the wall.
She scrambled up onto the catwalk. The parapets were a bit

too high and Arya a bit too short; she had to wedge her toes into the holes 
between the stones to see over. For a moment she thought the town was full of 
lantern bugs. Then she realized they were men with torches, galloping between 
the houses. She saw a roof go up, flames licking at the belly of the night with 
hot orange tongues as the thatch caught. Another followed, and then another, 
and soon there were fires blazing everywhere.
Gendry climbed up beside her, wearing his helm. “How many?”
Arya tried to count, but they were riding too fast, torches spinning through 
the air as they flung them. “A hundred,” she said. “Two hundred, I don’t 
know.” Over the roar of the flames, she could hear shouts. “They’ll come for 
us soon.”
“There,” Gendry said, pointing.
A column of riders moved between the burning buildings toward the holdfast. 
Firelight glittered off metal helms and spattered their mail and plate with 
orange and yellow highlights. One carried a banner on a tall lance. She thought 
it was red, but it was hard to tell in the night, with the fires roaring all 
around. Everything seemed red or black or orange.
The fire leapt from one house to another. Arya saw a tree consumed, the flames 
creeping across its branches until it stood against the night in robes of 
living orange. Everyone was awake now, manning the catwalks or struggling with 
the frightened animals below. She could hear Yoren shouting commands. Something 
bumped against her leg, and she glanced down to discover the crying girl 
clutching her. “Get away!” She wrenched her leg

free. “What are you doing up here? Run and hide someplace, you stupid.” She 
shoved the girl away.
The riders reined up before the gates. “You in the holdfast!” 
shouted a knight in a tall helm with a spiked crest. “Open, in the name 
of the king!”
“Aye, and which king is that?” old Reysen yelled back down, before Woth 
cuffed him into silence.
Yoren climbed the battlement beside the gate, his faded black cloak tied to a 
wooden staff. “You men hold down here!” he shouted. “The 
townfolk’s gone.”
“And who are you, old man? One of Lord Beric’s cravens?” called the knight in 
the spiked helm. “If that fat fool Thoros is in there, ask him how he likes 
these fires.”
“Got no such man here,” Yoren shouted back. “Only some lads for the Watch. 
Got no part o’ your war.” He hoisted up the staff, so they could all see the 
color of his cloak. “Have a look. That’s black, for the Night’s 
Watch.”
“Or black for House Dondarrion,” called the man who bore the enemy banner. 
Arya could see its colors more clearly now in the light of the burning town: a 
golden lion on red. “Lord Beric’s sigil is a purple lightning bolt on a black 
field.”
Suddenly Arya remembered the morning she had thrown the orange in Sansa’s face 
and gotten juice all over her stupid ivory silk gown. There had been some 
southron lordling at the tourney, her sister’s stupid friend Jeyne was in love 
with him. He had a lightning bolt on his shield and her father had sent him out 
to behead the Hound’s brother. It seemed a thousand years ago now,

something that had happened to a different person in a different 
life . . . to Arya Stark the Hand’s daughter, not Arry the 
orphan boy. How would Arry know lords and such?
“Are you blind, man?” Yoren waved his staff back and forth, making the cloak 
ripple. “You see a bloody lightning bolt?”
“By night all banners look black,” the knight in the spiked helm observed. 
“Open, or we’ll know you for outlaws in league with the king’s 
enemies.”
Yoren spat. “Who’s got your command?”
“I do.” The reflections of burning houses glimmered dully on the armor of his 
warhorse as the others parted to let him pass. He was a stout man with a 
manticore on his shield, and ornate scrollwork crawling across his steel 
breastplate. Through the open visor of his helm, a face pale and piggy peered 
up. “Ser Amory Lorch, bannerman to Lord Tywin Lannister of Casterly Rock, the 
Hand of the King. The true king, Joffrey.” He had a high, thin 
voice. “In his name, I command you to open these gates.”
All around them, the town burned. The night air was full of smoke, and the 
drifting red embers outnumbered the stars. Yoren scowled. “Don’t see the need. 
Do what you want to the town, it’s naught to me, but leave us be. We’re no foes 
to you.”
Look with your eyes, Arya wanted to shout at the men below. “Can’t 
they see we’re no lords or knights?” she whispered.
“I don’t think they care, Arry,” Gendry whispered back.
And she looked at Ser Amory’s face, the way Syrio had taught her to look, and 
she saw that he was right.“If you are no traitors, open your gates,” Ser Amory called. “We’ll 
make certain you’re telling it true and be on our way.”
Yoren was chewing sourleaf. “Told you, no one here but us. You got my word on 
that.”
The knight in the spiked helm laughed. “The crow gives us his 
word.”
“You lost, old man?” mocked one of the spearmen. “The Wall’s a long way 
north o’ here.”
“I command you once more, in King Joffrey’s name, to prove the loyalty you 
profess and open these gates,” said Ser Amory.
For a long moment Yoren considered, chewing. Then he spat. “Don’t think I 
will.”
“So be it. You defy the king’s command, and so proclaim yourselves rebels, 
black cloaks or no.”
“Got me young boys in here,” Yoren shouted down.
“Young boys and old men die the same.” Ser Amory raised a lanquid fist, and a 
spear came hurtling from the fire-bright shadows behind. Yoren must have been 
the target, but it was Woth beside him who was hit. The spearhead went in his 
throat and exploded out the back of his neck, dark and wet. Woth grabbed at the 
shaft, and fell boneless from the walk.
“Storm the walls and kill them all,” Ser Amory said in a bored voice. More 
spears flew. Arya yanked down Hot Pie by the back of his tunic. From outside 
came the rattle of armor, the scrape of swords on scabbards, the banging of 
spears on shields, mingled with curses and the hoofbeats of racing horses. A 
torch

sailed spinning above their heads, trailing fingers of fire as it thumped down 
in the dirt of the yard.
“Blades!” Yoren shouted. “Spread apart, defend the wall wherever 
they hit. Koss, Urreg, hold the postern. Lommy, pull that spear out of Woth and 
get up where he was.”
Hot Pie dropped his shortsword when he tried to unsheath it. Arya shoved the 
blade back into his hand. “I don’t know how to swordfight,” he said, 
white-eyed.
“It’s easy,” Arya said, but the lie died in her throat as a hand 
grasped the top of the parapet. She saw it by the light of the burning town, so 
clear that it was as if time had stopped. The fingers were blunt, callused, 
wiry black hairs grew between the knuckles, there was dirt under the nail of 
the thumb. Fear cuts deeper than swords, she remembered as the top of 
a pothelm loomed up behind the hand.
She slashed down hard, and Needle’s castle-forged steel bit into the grasping 
fingers between the knuckles. “Winterfell!” she screamed. Blood 
spurted, fingers flew, and the helmed face vanished as suddenly as it had 
appeared. “Behind!” Hot Pie yelled. Arya whirled. The second man was bearded 
and helmetless, his dirk between his teeth to leave both hands free for 
climbing. As he swung his leg over the parapet, she drove her point at his 
eyes. Needle never touched him; he reeled backward and fell. I hope he 
falls on his face and cuts off his tongue. “Watch them, not 
me!” she screamed at Hot Pie. The next time someone tried to climb their part 
of the wall, the boy hacked at his hands with his

swordshort until the man dropped away.
Ser Amory had no ladders, but the holdfast walls were rough-cut and unmortared, 
easy to climb, and there seemed to be no end to the foes. For each one Arya cut 
or stabbed or shoved back, another was coming over the wall. The knight in the 
spiked helm reached the rampart, but Yoren tangled his black banner around his 
spike, and forced the point of his dirk through his armor while the man was 
fighting the cloth. Every time Arya looked up, more torches were flying, 
trailing long tongues of flame that lingered behind her eyes. She saw a gold 
lion on a red banner and thought of Joffrey, wishing he was here so she could 
drive Needle through his sneery face. When four men assaulted the gate with 
axes, Koss shot them down with arrows, one by one. Dobber wrestled a man off 
the walk, and Lommy smashed his head with a rock before he could rise, and 
hooted until he saw the knife in Dobber’s belly and realized he wouldn’t be 
getting up either. Arya jumped over a dead boy no older than Jon, lying with 
his arm cut off. She didn’t think she’d done it, but she wasn’t sure. She heard 
Qyle beg for mercy before a knight with a wasp on his shield smashed his face 
in with a spiked mace. Everything smelled of blood and smoke and iron and piss, 
but after a time it seemed like that was only one smell. She never saw how the 
skinny man got over the wall, but when he did she fell on him with Gendry and 
Hot Pie. Gendry’s sword shattered on the man’s helm, tearing it off his head. 
Underneath he was bald and scared-looking, with missing teeth and a speckly 
grey beard, but even as she was

feeling sorry for him she was killing him, shouting, “Winterfell! 
Winterfell!” while Hot Pie screamed “Hot Pie!” beside her as 
he hacked at the man’s scrawny neck.
When the skinny man was dead, Gendry stole his sword and leapt down into the 
yard to fight some more. Arya looked past him, and saw steel shadows running 
through the holdfast, firelight shining off mail and blades, and she knew that 
they’d gotten over the wall somewhere, or broken through at the postern. She 
jumped down beside Gendry, landing the way Syrio had taught her. The night rang 
to the clash of steel and the cries of the wounded and dying. For a moment Arya 
stood uncertain, not knowing which way to go. Death was all around 
her.
And then Yoren was there, shaking her, screaming in her face. 
“Boy!” he yelled, the way he always yelled it. “Get out, 
it’s done, we’ve lost. Herd up all you can, you and him and the others, the 
boys, you get them out. Now!”
“How?” Arya said.
“That trap,” he screamed. “Under the barn.”
Quick as that he was gone, off to fight, sword in hand. Arya grabbed Gendry by 
the arm. “He said go,” she shouted, “the barn, the way out.” 
Through the slits of his helm, the Bull’s eyes shone with reflected fire. He 
nodded. They called Hot Pie down from the wall and found Lommy Greenhands where 
he lay bleeding from a spear thrust through his calf. They found Gerren too, 
but he was hurt too bad to move. As they were running toward the barn, Arya 
spied the crying girl sitting in the middle of the

chaos, surrounded by smoke and slaughter. She grabbed her by the hand and 
pulled her to her feet as the others raced ahead. The girl wouldn’t walk, even 
when slapped. Arya dragged her with her right hand while she held Needle in the 
left. Ahead, the night was a sullen red. The barn’s on fire, she 
thought. Flames were licking up its sides from where a torch had fallen on 
straw, and she could hear the screaming of the animals trapped within. Hot Pie 
stepped out of the barn. “Arry, come on! Lommy’s gone, 
leave her if she won’t come!”
Stubbornly, Arya dragged all the harder, pulling the crying girl along. Hot Pie 
scuttled back inside, abandoning them . . . but Gendry came 
back, the fire shining so bright on his polished helm that the horns seemed to 
glow orange. He ran to them, and hoisted the crying girl up over his shoulder. 
“Run!”
Rushing through the barn doors was like running into a furnace. The air was 
swirling with smoke, the back wall a sheet of fire ground to roof. Their horses 
and donkeys were kicking and rearing and screaming. The poor animals, 
Arya thought. Then she saw the wagon, and the three men manacled to its bed. 
Biter was flinging himself against the chains, blood running down his arms from 
where the irons clasped his wrists. Rorge screamed curses, kicking at the wood. 
“Boy!” called Jaqen H’ghar. “Sweet boy!”
The open trap was only a few feet ahead, but the fire was spreading fast, 
consuming the old wood and dry straw faster than she would have believed. Arya 
remembered the Hound’s horrible burned face. “Tunnel’s narrow,” Gendry 
shouted. “How do we get

her through?”
“Pull her,” Arya said. “Push her.”
“Good boys, kind boys,” called Jaqen H’ghar, coughing.
“Get these fucking chains off!” Rorge screamed.
Gendry ignored them. “You go first, then her, then me. Hurry, it’s a long 
way.”
“When you split the firewood,” Arya remembered, “where did you leave the 
axe?”
“Out by the haven.” He spared a glance for the chained men. “I’d save the 
donkeys first. There’s no time.”
“You take her!” she yelled. “You get her out! You do it!” The fire beat at 
her back with hot red wings as she fled the burning barn. It felt blessedly 
cool outside, but men were dying all around her. She saw Koss throw down his 
blade to yield, and she saw them kill him where he stood. Smoke was everywhere. 
There was no sign of Yoren, but the axe was where Gendry had left it, by the 
woodpile outside the haven. As she wrenched it free, a mailed hand grabbed her 
arm. Spinning, Arya drove the head of the axe hard between his legs. She never 
saw his face, only the dark blood seeping between the links of his hauberk. 
Going back into that barn was the hardest thing she ever did. Smoke was pouring 
out the open door like a writhing black snake, and she could hear the screams 
of the poor animals inside, donkeys and horses and men. She chewed her lip, and 
darted through the doors, crouched low where the smoke wasn’t quite so 
thick.
A donkey was caught in a ring of fire, shrieking in terror

and pain. She could smell the stench of burning hair. The roof was gone up too, 
and things were falling down, pieces of flaming wood and bits of straw and hay. 
Arya put a hand over her mouth and nose. She couldn’t see the wagon for the 
smoke, but she could still hear Biter screaming. She crawled toward the 
sound.
And then a wheel was looming over her. The wagon jumped and moved a 
half foot when Biter threw himself against his chains again. Jaqen saw her, but 
it was too hard to breathe, let alone talk. She threw the axe into the wagon. 
Rorge caught it and lifted it over his head, rivers of sooty sweat pouring down 
his noseless face. Arya was running, coughing. She heard the steel crash 
through the old wood, and again, again. An instant later came a crack 
as loud as thunder, and the bottom of the wagon came ripping loose in an 
explosion of splinters.
Arya rolled headfirst into the tunnel and dropped five feet. She got dirt in 
her mouth but she didn’t care, the taste was fine, the taste was mud and water 
and worms and life. Under the earth the air was cool and dark. Above was 
nothing but blood and roaring red and choking smoke and the screams of dying 
horses. She moved her belt around so Needle would not be in her way, and began 
to crawl. A dozen feet down the tunnel she heard the sound, like the roar of 
some monstrous beast, and a cloud of hot smoke and black dust came billowing up 
behind her, smelling of hell. Arya held her breath and kissed the mud on the 
floor of the tunnel and cried. For whom, she could not say.

When she climbed all the way up to the highest branch, Arya could see 
chimneys poking through the trees. Thatched roofs clustered along the shore of 
the lake and the small stream that emptied into it, and a wooden pier jutted 
out into the water beside a low long building with a slate roof.
She skinnied farther out, until the branch began to sag under her weight. No 
boats were tied to the pier, but she could see thin tendrils of smoke rising 
from some of the chimneys, and part of a wagon jutting out behind a 
stable.Someone’s there. Arya chewed her lip. All the other places 
they’d come upon had been empty and desolate. Farms, villages, castles, septs, 
barns, it made no matter. If it could burn, the Lannisters had burned it; if it 
could die, they’d killed it. They had even set the woods ablaze where they 
could, though the leaves were still green and wet from recent rains, and the 
fires had not spread. “They would have burned the lake if they could have,” 
Gendry had said, and Arya knew he was right. On the night of their escape, the 
flames of the burning town had shimmered so brightly on the water that it had 
seemed that the lake was afire.
When they finally summoned the nerve to steal back into the ruins the next 
night, nothing remained but blackened stones, the hollow shells of houses, and 
corpses. In some places wisps of

pale smoke still rose from the ashes. Hot Pie had pleaded with them not to go 
back, and Lommy called them fools and swore that Ser Amory would catch them and 
kill them too, but Lorch and his men had long gone by the time they reached the 
holdfast. They found the gates broken down, the walls partly demolished, and 
the inside strewn with the unburied dead. One look was enough for Gendry. 
“They’re killed, every one,” he said. “And dogs have been at them too, 
look.”
“Or wolves.”
“Dogs, wolves, it makes no matter. It’s done here.”
But Arya would not leave until they found Yoren. They couldn’t have killed 
him, she told herself, he was too hard and tough, and a brother of 
the Night’s Watch besides. She said as much to Gendry as they searched among 
the corpses.
The axe blow that had killed him had split his skull apart, but the great 
tangled beard could be no one else’s, or the garb, patched and unwashed and so 
faded it was more grey than black. Ser Amory Lorch had given no more thought to 
burying his own dead than to those he had murdered, and the corpses of four 
Lannister men-at-arms were heaped near Yoren’s. Arya wondered how many it had 
taken to bring him down.
He was going to take me home, she thought as they dug the old man’s 
hole. There were too many dead to bury them all, but Yoren at least must have a 
grave, Arya had insisted. He was going to bring me safe to Winterfell, he 
promised. Part of her wanted to cry. The other part wanted to kick 
him.It was Gendry who thought of the lord’s towerhouse and the three that 
Yoren had sent to hold it. They had come under attack as well, but the round 
tower had only one entry, a second-story door reached by a ladder. Once that 
had been pulled inside, Ser Amory’s men could not get at them. The Lannisters 
had piled brush around the tower’s base and set it afire, but the stone would 
not burn, and Lorch did not have the patience to starve them out. Cutjack 
opened the door at Gendry’s shout, and when Kurz said they’d be better pressing 
on north than going back, Arya had clung to the hope that she still might reach 
Winterfell.
Well, this village was no Winterfell, but those thatched roofs promised warmth 
and shelter and maybe even food, if they were bold enough to risk them. 
Unless it’s Lorch there. He had horses; he would have traveled faster than 
us.
She watched from the tree for a long time, hoping she might see something; a 
man, a horse, a banner, anything that would help her know. A few times she 
glimpsed motion, but the buildings were so far off it was hard to be certain. 
Once, very clearly, she heard the whinny of a horse.
The air was full of birds, crows mostly. From afar, they were no larger than 
flies as they wheeled and flapped above the thatched roofs. To the east, Gods 
Eye was a sheet of sun-hammered blue that filled half the world. Some days, as 
they made their slow way up the muddy shore (Gendry wanted no part of any 
roads, and even Hot Pie and Lommy saw the sense in that), Arya felt as though 
the lake were calling her. She wanted to leap into those

placid blue waters, to feel clean again, to swim and splash and bask in the 
sun. But she dare not take off her clothes where the others could see, not even 
to wash them. At the end of the day she would often sit on a rock and dangle 
her feet in the cool water. She had finally thrown away her cracked and rotted 
shoes. Walking barefoot was hard at first, but the blisters had finally broken, 
the cuts had healed, and her soles had turned to leather. The mud was nice 
between her toes, and she liked to feel the earth underfoot when she 
walked.
From up here, she could see a small wooded island off to the northeast. Thirty 
yards from shore, three black swans were gliding over the water, so 
serene . . . no one had told them that war had come, and they 
cared nothing for burning towns and butchered men. She stared at them with 
yearning. Part of her wanted to be a swan. The other part wanted to eat one. 
She had broken her fast on some acorn paste and a handful of bugs. Bugs weren’t 
so bad when you got used to them. Worms were worse, but still not as bad as the 
pain in your belly after days without food. Finding bugs was easy, all you had 
to do was kick over a rock. Arya had eaten a bug once when she was little, just 
to make Sansa screech, so she hadn’t been afraid to eat another. Weasel wasn’t 
either, but Hot Pie retched up the beetle he tried to swallow, and Lommy and 
Gendry wouldn’t even try. Yesterday Gendry had caught a frog and shared it with 
Lommy, and, a few days before, Hot Pie had found blackberries and stripped the 
bush bare, but mostly they had been living on water and acorns. Kurz had told 
them how to use rocks

and make a kind of acorn paste. It tasted
awful.
She wished the poacher hadn’t died. He’d known more about the woods than all 
the rest of them together, but he’d taken an arrow through the shoulder pulling 
in the ladder at the towerhouse. Tarber had packed it with mud and moss from 
the lake, and for a day or two Kurz swore the wound was nothing, even though 
the flesh of his throat was turning dark while angry red welts crept up his jaw 
and down his chest. Then one morning he couldn’t find the strength to get up, 
and by the next he was dead.
They buried him under a mound of stones, and Cutjack had claimed his sword and 
hunting horn, while Tarber helped himself to bow and boots and knife. They’d 
taken it all when they left. At first they thought the two had just gone 
hunting, that they’d soon return with game and feed them all. But they waited 
and waited, until finally Gendry made them move on. Maybe Tarber and Cutjack 
figured they would stand a better chance without a gaggle of orphan boys to 
herd along. They probably would too, but that didn’t stop her hating them for 
leaving.
Beneath her tree, Hot Pie barked like a dog. Kurz had told them to use animal 
sounds to signal to each other. An old poacher’s trick, he’d said, but he’d 
died before he could teach them how to make the sounds right. Hot Pie’s bird 
calls were awful. His dog was better, but not much.
Arya hopped from the high branch to one beneath it, her hands out for balance. 
A water dancer never falls. Lightfoot, her toes curled tight around 
the branch, she walked a few feet,

hopped down to a larger limb, then swung hand over hand through the tangle of 
leaves until she reached the trunk. The bark was rough beneath her fingers, 
against her toes. She descended quickly, jumping down the final six feet, 
rolling when she landed.
Gendry gave her a hand to pull her up. “You were up there a long time. What 
could you see?”
“A fishing village, just a little place, north along the shore. Twenty-six 
thatch roofs and one slate, I counted. I saw part of a wagon. Someone’s 
there.”
At the sound of her voice, Weasel came creeping out from the bushes. Lommy had 
named her that. He said she looked like a weasel, which wasn’t true, but they 
couldn’t keep on calling her the crying girl after she finally stopped crying. 
Her mouth was filthy. Arya hoped she hadn’t been eating mud again.
“Did you see people?” asked Gendry.
“Mostly just roofs,” Arya admitted, “but some chimneys were smoking, and I 
heard a horse.” The Weasel put her arms around her leg, clutching tight. 
Sometimes she did that now.
“If there’s people, there’s food,” Hot Pie said, too loudly. Gendry was 
always telling him to be more quiet, but it never did any good. “Might be 
they’d give us some.”
“Might be they’d kill us too,” Gendry said.
“Not if we yielded,” Hot Pie said hopefully.
“Now you sound like Lommy.”
Lommy Greenhands sat propped up between two thick roots at the foot of an oak. 
A spear had taken him through his left calf

during the fight at the holdfast. By the end of the next day, he had to limp 
along one-legged with an arm around Gendry, and now he couldn’t even do 
that. They’d hacked branches off trees to make a litter for him, but 
it was slow, hard work carrying him along, and he whimpered every time they 
jounced him.
“We have to yield,” he said. “That’s what Yoren should have done. He should 
have opened the gates like they said.”
Arya was sick of Lommy going on about how Yoren should have yielded. It was all 
he talked about when they carried him, that and his leg and his empty 
belly.
Hot Pie agreed. “They told Yoren to open the gates, they told him in 
the king’s name. You have to do what they tell you in the king’s name. It was 
that stinky old man’s fault. If he’d of yielded, they would have left us 
be.”
Gendry frowned. “Knights and lordlings, they take each other captive and pay 
ransoms, but they don’t care if the likes of you yield or not.” He turned to 
Arya. “What else did you see?”
“If it’s a fishing village, they’d sell us fish, I bet,” said Hot Pie. The 
lake teemed with fresh fish, but they had nothing to catch them with. Arya had 
tried to use her hands, the way she’d seen Koss do, but fish were quicker than 
pigeons and the water played tricks on her eyes.
“I don’t know about fish.” Arya tugged at the Weasel’s matted hair, thinking 
it might be best to hack it off. “There’s crows down by the water. Something’s 
dead there.”
“Fish, washed up on shore,” Hot Pie said. “If the crows eat

it, I bet we could.”
“We should catch some crows, we could eat them,” said Lommy. “We 
could make a fire and roast them like chickens.”
Gendry looked fierce when he scowled. His beard had grown in thick and black as 
briar. “I said, no fires.”
“Lommy’s hungry,” Hot Pie whined, “and I am too.”
“We’re all hungry,” said Arya.
“You’re not,” Lommy spat from the ground. “Worm 
breath.”
Arya could have kicked him in his wound. “I said I’d dig worms for 
you too, if you wanted.”
Lommy made a disgusted face. “If it wasn’t for my leg, I’d hunt us some 
boars.”
“Some boars,” she mocked. “You need a boarspear to hunt boars, and horses 
and dogs, and men to flush the boar from its lair.” Her father had hunted boar 
in the wolfswood with Robb and Jon. Once he even took Bran, but never Arya, 
even though she was older. Septa Mordane said boar hunting was not for ladies, 
and Mother only promised that when she was older she might have her own hawk. 
She was older now, but if she had a hawk she’d eat it.
“What do you know about hunting boars?” said Hot Pie.
“More than you.”
Gendry was in no mood to hear it. “Quiet, both of you, I need to think what to 
do.” He always looked pained when he tried to think, like it hurt him 
something fierce.
“Yield,” Lommy said.
“I told you to shut up about the yielding. We don’t even

know who’s in there. Maybe we can steal some food.”
“Lommy could steal, if it wasn’t for his leg,” said Hot Pie. “He was a thief 
in the city.”
“A bad thief,” Arya said, “or he wouldn’t have got caught.”
Gendry squinted up at the sun. “Evenfall will be the best time to sneak in. 
I’ll go scout come dark.”
“No, I’ll go,” Arya said. “You’re too noisy.”
Gendry got that look on his face. “We’ll both go.”
“Arry should go,” said Lommy. “He’s sneakier than you are.”
“We’ll both go, I said.”
“But what if you don’t come back? Hot Pie can’t carry me by himself, you know 
he can’t . . .”
“And there’s wolves,” Hot Pie said. “I heard them last night, when I had the 
watch. They sounded close.”
Arya had heard them too. She’d been asleep in the branches of an elm, but the 
howling had woken her. She’d sat awake for a good hour, listening to them, 
prickles creeping up her spine.
“And you won’t even let us have a fire to keep them off,” Hot Pie said. 
“It’s not right, leaving us for the wolves.”
“No one is leaving you,” Gendry said in disgust. “Lommy has his spear if the 
wolves come, and you’ll be with him. We’re just going to go see, that’s all; 
we’re coming back.”
“Whoever it is, you should yield to them,” Lommy whined. “I need some potion 
for my leg, it hurts bad.”
“If we see any leg potion, we’ll bring it,” Gendry said. “Arry, let’s go, I 
want to get near before the sun is down. Hot

Pie, you keep Weasel here, I don’t want her following.”
“Last time she kicked me.”
“I’ll kick you if you don’t keep her here.” Without waiting for an 
answer, Gendry donned his steel helm and walked off.
Arya had to scamper to keep up. Gendry was five years older and a foot taller 
than she was, and long of leg as well. For a while he said nothing, just plowed 
on through the trees with an angry look on his face, making too much noise. But 
finally he stopped and said, “I think Lommy’s going to die.”
She was not surprised. Kurz had died of his wound, and he’d been a lot stronger 
than Lommy. Whenever it was Arya’s turn to help carry him, she could feel how 
warm his skin was, and smell the stink off his leg. “Maybe we could find a 
maester . . .”
“You only find maesters in castles, and even if we found one, he wouldn’t 
dirty his hands on the likes of Lommy.” Gendry ducked under a low-hanging 
limb.
“That’s not true.” Maester Luwin would have helped anyone who came to him, 
she was certain.
“He’s going to die, and the sooner he does it, the better for the rest of us. 
We should just leave him, like he says. If it was you or me hurt, you know he’d 
leave us.” They scrambled down a steep cut and up the other side, using roots 
for handholds. “I’m sick of carrying him, and I’m sick of all his talk about 
yielding too. If he could stand up, I’d knock his teeth in. Lommy’s no use to 
anyone. That crying girl’s no use either.”
“You leave Weasel alone, she’s just scared and hungry is

all.” Arya glanced back, but the girl was not following for once. Hot Pie must 
have grabbed her, like Gendry had told him.
“She’s no use,” Gendry repeated stubbornly. “Her and Hot Pie and Lommy, 
they’re slowing us down, and they’re going to get us killed. You’re the only 
one of the bunch who’s good for anything. Even if you are a girl.”
Arya froze in her steps. “I’m not a girl!”
“Yes you are. Do you think I’m as stupid as they are?”
“No, you’re stupider. The Night’s Watch doesn’t take girls, everyone knows 
that.”
“That’s true. I don’t know why Yoren brought you, but he must have had some 
reason. You’re still a girl.”
“I am not!”
“Then pull out your cock and take a piss. Go on.”
“I don’t need to take a piss. If I wanted to I could.”
“Liar. You can’t take out your cock because you don’t have one. I never 
noticed before when there were thirty of us, but you always go off in the woods 
to make your water. You don’t see Hot Pie doing that, nor me neither. If you’re 
not a girl, you must be some eunuch.”
“You’re the eunuch.”
“You know I’m not.” Gendry smiled. “You want me to take out my cock and 
prove it? I don’t have anything to hide.”
“Yes you do,” Arya blurted, desperate to escape the subject of the cock she 
didn’t have. “Those gold cloaks were after you at the inn, and you won’t tell 
us why.”“I wish I knew. I think Yoren knew, but he never told me. Why did you 
think they were after you, though?”
Arya bit her lip. She remembered what Yoren had said, the day he had hacked off 
her hair. This lot, half o’ them would turn you over to the queen quick as 
spit for a pardon and maybe a few silvers. The other half’d do the same, only 
they’d rape you first. Only Gendry was different, the queen wanted him 
too. “I’ll tell you if you’ll tell me,” she said warily.
“I would if I knew, Arry . . . is that really what you’re 
called, or do you have some girl’s name?”
Arya glared at the gnarled root by her feet. She realized that the pretense was 
done. Gendry knew, and she had nothing in her pants to convince him otherwise. 
She could draw Needle and kill him where he stood, or else trust him. She 
wasn’t certain she’d be able to kill him, even if she tried; he had his own 
sword, and he was a lot stronger. All that was left was the truth. 
“Lommy and Hot Pie can’t know,” she said.
“They won’t,” he swore. “Not from me.”
“Arya.” She raised her eyes to his. “My name is Arya. Of House 
Stark.”
“Of House . . .” It took him a moment before he said, “The 
King’s Hand was named Stark. The one they killed for a traitor.”
“He was never a traitor. He was my father.”
Gendry’s eyes widened. “So that’s why you 
thought . . .”
She nodded. “Yoren was taking me home to Winterfell.”
“I . . . you’re highborn then, a . . . you’ll 
be a lady . . .”Arya looked down at her ragged clothes and bare feet, all cracked and 
callused. She saw the dirt under her nails, the scabs on her elbows, the 
scratches on her hands. Septa Mordane wouldn’t even know me, I bet. Sansa 
might, but she’d pretend not to. “My mother’s a lady, and my sister, but 
I never was.”
“Yes you were. You were a lord’s daughter and you lived in a castle, didn’t 
you? And you . . . gods be good, I never . . .” 
All of a sudden Gendry seemed uncertain, almost afraid. “All that about cocks, 
I never should have said that. And I been pissing in front of you and 
everything, I . . . I beg your pardon, m’lady.”
“Stop that!” Arya hissed. Was he mocking her?
“I know my courtesies, m’lady,” Gendry said, stubborn as ever. “Whenever 
highborn girls came into the shop with their fathers, my master told me I was 
to bend the knee, and speak only when they spoke to me, and call them 
m’lady.”
“If you start calling me m’lady, even Hot Pie is going to notice. 
And you better keep on pissing the same way too.”
“As m’lady commands.”
Arya slammed his chest with both hands. He tripped over a stone and sat down 
with a thump. “What kind of lord’s daughter are you?” he said, 
laughing.
“This kind.” She kicked him in the side, but it only made him laugh 
harder. “You laugh all you like. I’m going to see who’s in the 
village.” The sun had already fallen below the trees; dusk would be on them in 
no time at all. For once it was Gendry who had to hurry after. “You smell 
that?” she asked.He sniffed the air. “Rotten fish?”
“You know it’s not.”
“We better be careful. I’ll go around west, see if there’s some road. There 
must be if you saw a wagon. You take the shore. If you need help, bark like a 
dog.”
“That’s stupid. If I need help, I’ll shout help.” She darted away, 
bare feet silent in the grass. When she glanced back over her shoulder, he was 
watching her with that pained look on his face that meant he was thinking. 
He’s probably thinking that he shouldn’t be letting m’lady go stealing 
food. Arya just knew he was going to be stupid now.
The smell grew stronger as she got closer to the village. It did not smell like 
rotten fish to her. This stench was ranker, fouler. She wrinkled her 
nose.
Where the trees began to thin, she used the undergrowth, slipping from bush to 
bush quiet as a shadow. Every few yards she stopped to listen. The third time, 
she heard horses, and a man’s voice as well. And the smell got worse. Dead 
man’s stink, that’s what it is. She had smelled it before, with Yoren and 
the others.
A dense thicket of brambles grew south of the village. By the time she reached 
it, the long shadows of sunset had begun to fade, and the lantern bugs were 
coming out. She could see thatched roofs just beyond the hedge. She crept along 
until she found a gap and squirmed through on her belly, keeping well hidden 
until she saw what made the smell.
Beside the gently lapping waters of Gods Eye, a long gibbet

of raw green wood had been thrown up, and things that had once been men dangled 
there, their feet in chains, while crows pecked at their flesh and flapped from 
corpse to corpse. For every crow there were a hundred flies. When the wind blew 
off the lake, the nearest corpse twisted on its chain, ever so slightly. The 
crows had eaten most of its face, and something else had been at it as well, 
something much larger. Throat and chest had been torn apart, and glistening 
green entrails and ribbons of ragged flesh dangled from where the belly had 
been opened. One arm had been ripped right off the shoulder; Arya saw the bones 
a few feet away, gnawed and cracked, picked clean of meat.
She made herself look at the next man and the one beyond him and the one beyond 
him, telling herself she was hard as a stone. Corpses all, so savaged 
and decayed that it took her a moment to realize they had been stripped before 
they were hanged. They did not look like naked people; they hardly looked like 
people at all. The crows had eaten their eyes, and sometimes their faces. Of 
the sixth in the long row, nothing remained but a single leg, still tangled in 
its chains, swaying with each breeze.
Fear cuts deeper than swords. Dead men could not hurt her, but 
whoever had killed them could. Well beyond the gibbet, two men in mail hauberks 
stood leaning on their spears in front of the long low building by the water, 
the one with the slate roof. A pair of tall poles had been driven into the 
muddy ground in front of it, banners drooping from each staff. One looked red 
and one paler, white or yellow maybe, but both were limp and with the dusk

settling, she could not even be certain that red one was Lannister crimson. 
I don’t need to see the lion, I can see all the dead people, who else 
would it be but Lannisters?
Then there was a shout.
The two spearmen turned at the cry, and a third man came into view, shoving a 
captive before him. It was growing too dark to make out faces, but the prisoner 
was wearing a shiny steel helm, and when Arya saw the horns she knew it was 
Gendry. You stupid stupid stupid STUPID! she thought. If he’d been 
here she would have kicked him again.
The guards were talking loudly, but she was too far away to make out the words, 
especially with the crows gabbling and flapping closer to hand. One of the 
spearmen snatched the helm off Gendry’s head and asked him a question, but he 
must not have liked the answer, because he smashed him across the face with the 
butt of his spear and knocked him down. The one who’d captured him gave him a 
kick, while the second spearman was trying on the bull’s-head helm. Finally 
they pulled him to his feet and marched him off toward the storehouse. When 
they opened the heavy wooden doors, a small boy darted out, but one of the 
guards grabbed his arm and flung him back inside. Arya heard sobbing from 
inside the building, and then a shriek so loud and full of pain that it made 
her bite her lip.
The guards shoved Gendry inside with the boy and barred the doors behind them. 
Just then, a breath of wind came sighing off the lake, and the banners stirred 
and lifted. The one on the

tall staff bore the golden lion, as she’d feared. On the other, three sleek 
black shapes ran across a field as yellow as butter. Dogs, she thought. Arya 
had seen those dogs before, but where?
It didn’t matter. The only thing that mattered was that they had Gendry. Even 
if he was stubborn and
stupid, she had to get him out. She wondered 
if they knew that the queen wanted him.
One of the guards took off his helm and donned Gendry’s instead. It made her 
angry to see him wearing it, but she knew there was nothing she could do to 
stop him. She thought she heard more screams from inside the windowless 
storehouse, muffled by the masonry, but it was hard to be certain.
She stayed long enough to see the guard changed, and much more besides. Men 
came and went. They led their horses down to the stream to drink. A hunting 
party returned from the wood, carrying a deer’s carcass slung from a pole. She 
watched them clean and gut it and build a cookfire on the far side of the 
stream, and the smell of cooking meat mingled queerly with the stench of 
corruption. Her empty belly roiled and she thought she might retch. The 
prospect of food brought other men out of the houses, near all of them wearing 
bits of mail or boiled leather. When the deer was cooked, the choicest portions 
were carried to one of the houses.
She thought that the dark might let her crawl close and free Gendry, but the 
guards kindled torches off the cookfire. A squire brought meat and bread to the 
two guarding the storehouse, and later two more men joined them and they all 
passed a skin of wine

from hand to hand. When it was empty the others left, but the two guards 
remained, leaning on their spears.
Arya’s arms and legs were stiff when she finally wriggled out from under the 
briar into the dark of the wood. It was a black night, with a thin sliver of 
moon appearing and disappearing as the clouds blew past. Silent as a 
shadow, she told herself as she moved through the trees. In this darkness 
she dared not run, for fear of tripping on some unseen root or losing her way. 
On her left Gods Eye lapped calmly against its shores. On her right a wind 
sighed through the branches, and leaves rustled and stirred. Far off, she heard 
the howling of wolves.
Lommy and Hot Pie almost shit themselves when she stepped out of the trees 
behind them. “Quiet,” she told them, putting an arm around Weasel when the 
little girl came running up.
Hot Pie stared at her with big eyes. “We thought you left us.” He had his 
shortsword in hand, the one Yoren had taken off the gold cloak. “I was scared 
you was a wolf.”
“Where’s the Bull?” asked Lommy.
“They caught him,” Arya whispered. “We have to get him out. Hot Pie, you got 
to help. We’ll sneak up and kill the guards, and then I’ll open the 
door.”
Hot Pie and Lommy exchanged a look. “How many?”
“I couldn’t count,” Arya admitted. “Twenty at least, but only two on the 
door.”
Hot Pie looked as if he were going to cry. “We can’t fight 
twenty.”“You only need to fight one. I’ll do the other and we’ll get 
Gendry out and run.”
“We should yield,” Lommy said. “Just go in and yield.”
Arya shook her head stubbornly.
“Then just leave him, Arry,” Lommy pleaded. “They don’t know about the rest 
of us. If we hide, they’ll go away, you know they will. It’s not our fault 
Gendry’s captured.”
“You’re stupid, Lommy,” Arya said angrily. “You’ll die if we don’t 
get Gendry out. Who’s going to carry you?”
“You and Hot Pie.”
“All the time, with no one else to help? We’ll never do it. Gendry was the 
strong one. Anyhow, I don’t care what you say, I’m going back for him.” She 
looked at Hot Pie. “Are you coming?”
Hot Pie glanced at Lommy, at Arya, at Lommy again. “I’ll come,” he said 
reluctantly.
“Lommy, you keep Weasel here.”
He grabbed the little girl by the hand and pulled her close. “What if the 
wolves come?”
“Yield,” Arya suggested.
Finding their way back to the village seemed to take hours. Hot Pie kept 
stumbling in the dark and losing his way, and Arya had to wait for him and 
double back. Finally she took him by the hand and led him along through the 
trees. “Just be quiet and follow.” When they could make out the first faint 
glow of the village fires against the sky, she said, “There’s dead men hanging 
on the other side of the hedge, but they’re nothing to be scared

of, just remember fear cuts deeper than swords. We have to go real quiet and 
slow.” Hot Pie nodded.
She wriggled under the briar first and waited for him on the far side, crouched 
low. Hot Pie emerged pale and panting, face and arms bloody with long 
scratches. He started to say something, but Arya put a finger to his lips. On 
hands and knees, they crawled along the gibbet, beneath the swaying dead. Hot 
Pie never once looked up, nor made a sound.
Until the crow landed on his back, and he gave a muffled gasp. “Who’s 
there?” a voice boomed suddenly from the dark.
Hot Pie leapt to his feet. “I yield!” He threw away his sword as 
dozens of crows rose shrieking and complaining to flap about the corpses. Arya 
grabbed his leg and tried to drag him back down, but he wrenched loose and ran 
forward, waving his arms. “I yield, I yield.”
She bounced up and drew Needle, but by then men were all around her. Arya 
slashed at the nearest, but he blocked her with a steel-clad arm, and someone 
else slammed into her and dragged her to the ground, and a third man wrenched 
the sword from her grasp. When she tried to bite, her teeth snapped shut on 
cold dirty chainmail. “Oho, a fierce one,” the man said, laughing. The blow 
from his iron-clad fist near knocked her head off.
They talked over her as she lay hurting, but Arya could not seem to understand 
the words. Her ears rang. When she tried to crawl off, the earth moved beneath 
her. They took Needle. The shame of that hurt worse than the pain, 
and the pain hurt a lot.

Jon had given her that sword. Syrio had taught her to use it.
Finally someone grabbed the front of her jerkin, yanked her to her knees. Hot 
Pie was kneeling too, before the tallest man Arya had ever seen, a monster from 
one of Old Nan’s stories. She never saw where the giant had come from. Three 
black dogs raced across his faded yellow surcoat, and his face looked as hard 
as if it had been cut from stone. Suddenly Arya knew where she had seen those 
dogs before. The night of the tourney at King’s Landing, all the knights had 
hung their shields outside their pavilions. “That one belongs to the Hound’s 
brother,” Sansa had confided when they passed the black dogs on the yellow 
field. “He’s even bigger than Hodor, you’ll see. They call him the 
Mountain That Rides.”
Arya let her head droop, only half aware of what was going on around her. Hot 
Pie was yielding some more. The Mountain said, “You’ll lead us to these 
others,” and walked off. Next she was stumbling past the dead men on their 
gibbet, while Hot Pie told their captors he’d bake them pies and tarts if they 
didn’t hurt him. Four men went with them. One carried a torch, one a longsword; 
two had spears.
They found Lommy where they’d left him, under the oak. “I yield,” he called 
out at once when he saw them. He’d flung away his own spear and raised his 
hands, splotchy green with old dye. “I yield. Please.”
The man with the torch searched around under the trees. “Are you the last? 
Baker boy said there was a girl.”
“She ran off when she heard you coming,” Lommy said. “You

made a lot of noise.” And Arya thought, Run, Weasel, run as far as you 
can, run and hide and never come back.
“Tell us where we can find that whoreson Dondarrion, and there’ll be a hot 
meal in it for you.”
“Who?” said Lommy blankly.
“I told you, this lot don’t know no more than those cunts in the village. 
Waste o’ bloody time.”
One of the spearmen drifted over to Lommy. “Something wrong with your leg, 
boy?”
“It got hurt.”
“Can you walk?” He sounded concerned.
“No,” said Lommy. “You got to carry me.”
“Think so?” The man lifted his spear casually and drove the point through the 
boy’s soft throat. Lommy never even had time to yield again. He jerked once, 
and that was all. When the man pulled his spear loose, blood sprayed out in a 
dark fountain. “Carry him, he says,” he muttered, chuckling.

Fear cuts deeper than swords, Arya would tell herself, but that 
did not make the fear go away. It was as much a part of her days as stale bread 
and the blisters on her toes after a long day of walking the hard, rutted 
road.
She had thought she had known what it meant to be afraid, but she learned 
better in that storehouse beside the Gods Eye. Eight days she had lingered 
there before the Mountain gave the command to march, and every day she had seen 
someone die.The Mountain would come into the storehouse after he had broken his fast 
and pick one of the prisoners for questioning. The village folk would never 
look at him. Maybe they thought that if they did not notice him, he would not 
notice them . . . but he saw them anyway and picked whom he 
liked. There was no place to hide, no tricks to play, no way to be 
safe.
One girl shared a soldier’s bed three nights running; the Mountain picked her 
on the fourth day, and the soldier said nothing.
A smiley old man mended their clothing and babbled about his son, off serving 
in the gold cloaks at King’s Landing. “A king’s man, he is,” he would say, 
“a good king’s man like me, all for Joffrey.” He said it so often the other 
captives began to call him All-for-Joffrey whenever the guards weren’t 
listening. All-for-Joffrey

was picked on the fifth day.
A young mother with a pox-scarred face offered to freely tell them all she knew 
if they’d promise not to hurt her daughter. The Mountain heard her out; the 
next morning he picked her daughter, to be certain she’d held nothing 
back.
The ones chosen were questioned in full view of the other captives, so they 
could see the fate of rebels and traitors. A man the others called the Tickler 
asked the questions. His face was so ordinary and his garb so plain that Arya 
might have thought him one of the villagers before she had seen him at his 
work. “Tickler makes them howl so hard they piss themselves,” old 
stoop-shoulder Chiswyck told them. He was the man she’d tried to bite, who’d 
called her a fierce little thing and smashed her head with a mailed fist. 
Sometimes he helped the Tickler. Sometimes others did that. Ser Gregor Clegane 
himself would stand motionless, watching and listening, until the victim 
died.
The questions were always the same. Was there gold hidden in the village? 
Silver, gems? Was there more food? Where was Lord Beric Dondarrion? Which of 
the village folk had aided him? When he rode off, where did he go? How many men 
were with them? How many knights, how many bowmen, how many men-at-arms? How 
were they armed? How many were horsed? How many were wounded? What other enemy 
had they seen? How many? When? What banners did they fly? Where did they go? 
Was there gold hidden in the village? Silver, gems? Where was Lord Beric 
Dondarrion? How many men were with him? By the third day, Arya could have asked

the questions herself.
They found a little gold, a little silver, a great sack of copper pennies, and 
a dented goblet set with garnets that two soldiers almost came to blows over. 
They learned that Lord Beric had ten starvelings with him, or else a hundred 
mounted knights; that he had ridden west, or north, or south; that he had 
crossed the lake in a boat; that he was strong as an aurochs or weak from the 
bloody flux. No one ever survived the Tickler’s questioning; no man, no woman, 
no child. The strongest lasted past evenfall. Their bodies were hung beyond the 
fires for the wolves.
By the time they marched, Arya knew she was no water dancer. Syrio Forel would 
never have let them knock him down and take his sword away, nor stood by when 
they killed Lommy Greenhands. Syrio would never have sat silent in that 
storehouse nor shuffled along meekly among the other captives. The direwolf was 
the sigil of the Starks, but Arya felt more a lamb, surrounded by a herd of 
other sheep. She hated the villagers for their sheepishness, almost as much as 
she hated herself.
The Lannisters had taken everything: father, friends, home, hope, courage. One 
had taken Needle, while another had broken her wooden stick sword over his 
knee. They had even taken her stupid secret. The storehouse had been big enough 
for her to creep off and make her water in some corner when no one was looking, 
but it was different on the road. She held it as long as she could, but finally 
she had to squat by a bush and skin down her breeches in front of all of them. 
It was that or wet herself.

Hot Pie gaped at her with big moon eyes, but no one else even troubled to look. 
Girl sheep or boy sheep, Ser Gregor and his men did not seem to care.
Their captors permitted no chatter. A broken lip taught Arya to hold her 
tongue. Others never learned at all. One boy of three would not stop calling 
for his father, so they smashed his face in with a spiked mace. Then the boy’s 
mother started screaming and Raff the Sweetling killed her as well.
Arya watched them die and did nothing. What good did it do you to be brave? One 
of the women picked for questioning had tried to be brave, but she had died 
screaming like all the rest. There were no brave people on that march, only 
scared and hungry ones. Most were women and children. The few men were very old 
or very young; the rest had been chained to that gibbet and left for the wolves 
and the crows. Gendry was only spared because he’d admitted to forging the 
horned helm himself; smiths, even apprentice smiths, were too valuable to 
kill.
They were being taken to serve Lord Tywin Lannister at Harrenhal, the Mountain 
told them. “You’re traitors and rebels, so thank your gods that Lord Tywin’s 
giving you this chance. It’s more than you’d get from the outlaws. Obey, serve, 
and live.”
“It’s not just, it’s not,” she heard one wizened old woman complain to 
another when they had bedded down for the night. “We never did no treason, the 
others come in and took what they wanted, same as this bunch.”
“Lord Beric did us no hurt, though,” her friend whispered.

“And that red priest with him, he paid for all they took.”
“Paid? He took two of my chickens and gave me a bit of paper with a mark on 
it. Can I eat a bit of raggy old paper, I ask you? Will it give me eggs?” She 
looked about to see that no guards were near, and spat three times. “There’s 
for the Tullys and there’s for the Lannisters and there’s for the 
Starks.”
“It’s a sin and a shame,” an old man hissed. “When the old king was still 
alive, he’d not have stood for this.”
“King Robert?” Arya asked, forgetting herself.
“King Aerys, gods grace him,” the old man said, too loudly. A guard 
came sauntering over to shut them up. The old man lost both his teeth, and 
there was no more talk that night.
Besides his captives, Ser Gregor was bringing back a dozen pigs, a cage of 
chickens, a scrawny milk cow, and nine wagons of salt fish. The Mountain and 
his men had horses, but the captives were all afoot, and those too weak to keep 
up were killed out of hand, along with anyone foolish enough to flee. The 
guards took women off into the bushes at night, and most seemed to expect it 
and went along meekly enough. One girl, prettier than the others, was made to 
go with four or five different men every night, until finally she hit one with 
a rock. Ser Gregor made everyone watch while he took off her head with a sweep 
of his massive two-handed greatsword. “Leave the body for the wolves,” he 
commanded when the deed was done, handing the sword to his squire to be 
cleaned.
Arya glanced sidelong at Needle, sheathed at the hip of a black-bearded, 
balding man-at-arms called Polliver. It’s good

that they took it away, she thought. Otherwise she would have tried to 
stab Ser Gregor, and he would have cut her right in half, and the wolves would 
eat her too.
Polliver was not so bad as some of the others, even though he’d stolen Needle. 
The night she was caught, the Lannister men had been nameless strangers with 
faces as alike as their nasal helms, but she’d come to know them all. You had 
to know who was lazy and who was cruel, who was smart and who was stupid. You 
had to learn that even though the one they called Shitmouth had the foulest 
tongue she’d ever heard, he’d give you an extra piece of bread if you asked, 
while jolly old Chiswyck and soft-spoken Raff would just give you the back of 
their hand.
Arya watched and listened and polished her hates the way Gendry had once 
polished his horned helm. Dunsen wore those bull’s horns now, and she hated him 
for it. She hated Polliver for Needle, and she hated old Chiswyck who thought 
he was funny. And Raff the Sweetling, who’d driven his spear through Lommy’s 
throat, she hated even more. She hated Ser Amory Lorch for Yoren, and she hated 
Ser Meryn Trant for Syrio, the Hound for killing the butcher’s boy Mycah, and 
Ser Ilyn and Prince Joffrey and the queen for the sake of her father and Fat 
Tom and Desmond and the rest, and even for Lady, Sansa’s wolf. The Tickler was 
almost too scary to hate. At times she could almost forget he was still with 
them; when he was not asking questions, he was just another soldier, quieter 
than most, with a face like a thousand other men.
Every night Arya would say their names. “Ser Gregor,” she’d

whisper to her stone pillow. “Dunsen, Polliver, Chiswyck, Raff the Sweetling. 
The Tickler and the Hound. Ser Amory, Ser Ilyn, Ser Meryn, King Joffrey, Queen 
Cersei.” Back in Winterfell, Arya had prayed with her mother in the sept and 
with her father in the godswood, but there were no gods on the road to 
Harrenhal, and her names were the only prayer she cared to remember.
Every day they marched, and every night she said her names, until finally the 
trees thinned and gave way to a patchwork landscape of rolling hills, 
meandering streams, and sunlit fields, where the husks of burnt holdfasts 
thrust up black as rotten teeth. It was another long day’s march before they 
glimpsed the towers of Harrenhal in the distance, hard beside the blue waters 
of the lake.
It would be better once they got to Harrenhal, the captives told each other, 
but Arya was not so certain. She remembered Old Nan’s stories of the castle 
built on fear. Harren the Black had mixed human blood in the mortar, Nan used 
to say, dropping her voice so the children would need to lean close to hear, 
but Aegon’s dragons had roasted Harren and all his sons within their great 
walls of stone. Arya chewed her lip as she walked along on feet grown hard with 
callus. It would not be much longer, she told herself; those towers could not 
be more than a few miles off.
Yet they walked all that day and most of the next before at last they reached 
the fringes of Lord Tywin’s army, encamped west of the castle amidst the 
scorched remains of a town. Harrenhal was deceptive from afar, because it was 
so huge. Its colossal

curtain walls rose beside the lake, sheer and sudden as mountain cliffs, while 
atop their battlements the rows of wood-and-iron scorpions looked as small as 
the bugs for which they were named.
The stink of the Lannister host reached Arya well before she could make out the 
devices on the banners that sprouted along the lakeshore, atop the pavilions of 
the westermen. From the smell, Arya could tell that Lord Tywin had been here 
some time. The latrines that ringed the encampment were overflowing and 
swarming with flies, and she saw faint greenish fuzz on many of the sharpened 
stakes that protected the perimeters.
Harrenhal’s gatehouse, itself as large as Winterfell’s Great Keep, was as 
scarred as it was massive, its stones fissured and discolored. From outside, 
only the tops of five immense towers could be seen beyond the walls. The 
shortest of them was half again as tall as the highest tower in Winterfell, but 
they did not soar the way a proper tower did. Arya thought they looked like 
some old man’s gnarled, knuckly fingers groping after a passing cloud. She 
remembered Nan telling how the stone had melted and flowed like candlewax down 
the steps and in the windows, glowing a sullen searing red as it sought out 
Harren where he hid. Arya could believe every word; each tower was more 
grotesque and misshapen than the last, lumpy and runneled and 
cracked.
“I don’t want to go there,” Hot Pie squeaked as Harrenhal opened its gates to 
them. “There’s ghosts in there.”
Chiswyck heard him, but for once he only smiled. “Baker boy, here’s your 
choice. Come join the ghosts, or be one.”Hot Pie went in with the rest of them.
In the echoing stone-and-timber bathhouse, the captives were stripped and made 
to scrub and scrape themselves raw in tubs of scalding hot water. Two fierce 
old women supervised the process, discussing them as bluntly as if they were 
newly acquired donkeys. When Arya’s turn came round, Goodwife Amabel clucked in 
dismay at the sight of her feet, while Goodwife Harra felt the callus on her 
fingers that long hours of practice with Needle had earned her. “Got those 
churning
butter, I’ll wager,” she said. “Some farmer’s whelp, are you? Well, 
never you mind, girl, you have a chance to win a higher place in this world if 
you work hard. If you won’t work hard, you’ll be beaten. And what do they call 
you?”
Arya dared not say her true name, but Arry was no good either, it was a boy’s 
name and they could see she was no boy. “Weasel,” she said, naming the first 
girl she could think of. “Lommy called me Weasel.”
“I can see why,” sniffed Goodwife Amabel. “That hair is a fright and a nest 
for lice as well. We’ll have it off, and then you’re for the 
kitchens.”
“I’d sooner tend the horses.” Arya liked horses, and maybe if she was in the 
stables she’d be able to steal one and escape.
Goodwife Harra slapped her so hard that her swollen lip broke open all over 
again. “And keep that tongue to yourself or you’ll get worse. No one asked 
your views.”
The blood in her mouth had a salty metal tang to it. Arya dropped her gaze and 
said nothing. If I still had Needle, she

wouldn’t dare hit me, she thought sullenly.
“Lord Tywin and his knights have grooms and squires to tend their horses, they 
don’t need the likes of you,” Goodwife Amabel said. “The kitchens are snug 
and clean, and there’s always a warm fire to sleep by and plenty to eat. You 
might have done well there, but I can see you’re not a clever girl. Harra, I 
believe we should give this one to Weese.”
“If you think so, Amabel.” They gave her a shift of grey roughspun wool and a 
pair of ill-fitting shoes, and sent her off.
Weese was understeward for the Wailing Tower, a squat man with a fleshy 
carbuncle of a nose and a nest of angry red boils near one corner of his plump 
lips. Arya was one of six sent to him. He looked them all over with a gimlet 
eye. “The Lannisters are generous to those as serve them well, an honor none 
of your sort deserve, but in war a man makes do with what’s to hand. Work hard 
and mind your place and might be one day you’ll rise as high as me. If you 
think to presume on his lordship’s kindness, though, you’ll find me 
waiting after m’lord has gone, y’see.” He strutted up and down before them, 
telling them how they must never look the highborn in the eye, nor speak until 
spoken to, nor get in his lordship’s way. “My nose never lies,” he boasted. 
“I can smell defiance, I can smell pride, I can smell disobedience. I catch a 
whiff of any such stinks, you’ll answer for it. When I sniff you, all I want to 
smell is fear.”

Whatever names Harren the Black had meant to give his towers were long 
forgotten. They were called the Tower of Dread, the Widow’s Tower, the Wailing 
Tower, the Tower of Ghosts, and Kingspyre Tower. Arya slept in a shallow niche 
in the cavernous vaults beneath the Wailing Tower, on a bed of straw. She had 
water to wash in whenever she liked, a chunk of soap. The work was hard, but no 
harder than walking miles every day. Weasel did not need to find worms and bugs 
to eat, as Arry had; there was bread every day, and barley stews with bits of 
carrot and turnip, and once a fortnight even a bite of meat.Hot Pie ate even better; he was where he belonged, in the kitchens, a 
round stone building with a domed roof that was a world unto itself. Arya took 
her meals at a trestle table in the undercroft with Weese and his other 
charges, but sometimes she would be chosen to help fetch their food, and she 
and Hot Pie could steal a moment to talk. He could never remember 
that she was now Weasel and kept calling her Arry, even though he knew she 
was a girl. Once 
he tried to slip her a hot apple tart, but he made such a clumsy job of it that 
two of the cooks saw. They took the tart away and beat him with a big wooden 
spoon.
Gendry had been sent to the forge; Arya seldom saw him. As for those she served 
with, she did not even want to know their

names. That only made it hurt worse when they died. Most of them were older 
than she was and content to let her alone.
Harrenhal was vast, much of it far gone in decay. Lady Whent had held the 
castle as bannerman to House Tully, but she’d used only the lower thirds of two 
of the five towers, and let the rest go to ruin. Now she was fled, and the 
small household she’d left could not begin to tend the needs of all the 
knights, lords, and highborn prisoners Lord Tywin had brought, so the 
Lannisters must forage for servants as well as for plunder and provender. The 
talk was that Lord Tywin planned to restore Harrenhal to glory, and make it his 
new seat once the war was done.
Weese used Arya to run messages, draw water, and fetch food, and sometimes to 
serve at table in the Barracks Hall above the armory, where the men-at-arms 
took their meals. But most of her work was cleaning. The ground floor of the 
Wailing Tower was given over to storerooms and granaries, and two floors above 
housed part of the garrison, but the upper stories had not been occupied for 
eighty years. Now Lord Tywin had commanded that they be made fit for habitation 
again. There were floors to be scrubbed, grime to be washed off windows, broken 
chairs and rotted beds to be carried off. The topmost story was infested with 
nests of the huge black bats that House Whent had used for its sigil, and there 
were rats in the cellars as well . . . and ghosts, some said, 
the spirits of Harren the Black and his sons.
Arya thought that was stupid. Harren and his sons had died in Kingspyre Tower, 
that was why it had that name, so why should

they cross the yard to haunt her? The Wailing Tower only wailed when the wind 
blew from the north, and that was just the sound the air made blowing through 
the cracks in the stones where they had fissured from the heat. If there 
were ghosts in Harrenhal, they never troubled her. It was the living 
men she feared, Weese and Ser Gregor Clegane and Lord Tywin Lannister himself, 
who kept his apartments in Kingspyre Tower, still the tallest and mightiest of 
all, though lopsided beneath the weight of the slagged stone that made it look 
like some giant half-melted black
candle.
She wondered what Lord Tywin would do if she marched up to him and confessed to 
being Arya Stark, but she knew she’d never get near enough to talk to him, and 
anyhow he’d never believe her if she did, and afterward Weese would beat her 
bloody.
In his own small strutting way, Weese was nearly as scary as Ser Gregor. The 
Mountain swatted men like flies, but most of the time he did not 
even seem to know the fly was there. Weese always knew 
you were there, and what 
you were doing, and sometimes what you were thinking. He would hit at the 
slightest provocation, and he had a dog who was near as 
bad as he was, an ugly 
spotted bitch that smelled worse than any dog Arya had ever known. Once she saw 
him set the dog on a latrine boy who’d 
annoyed him. She tore a big chunk out of 
the boy’s calf while Weese laughed.
It took him only three days to earn the place of honor in her nightly prayers. 
“Weese,” she would whisper, first of all. “Dunsen, Chiswyck, Polliver, Raff 
the Sweetling. The Tickler and

the Hound. Ser Gregor, Ser Amory, Ser Ilyn, Ser Meryn, King Joffrey, Queen 
Cersei.” If she let herself forget even one of them, how would she ever find 
him again to kill him?
On the road Arya had felt like a sheep, but Harrenhal turned her into a mouse. 
She was grey as a mouse in her scratchy wool shift, and like a mouse she kept 
to the crannies and crevices and dark holes of the castle, scurrying out of the 
way of the mighty.
Sometimes she thought they were all mice within those thick walls, 
even the knights and the great lords. The size of the castle made even Gregor 
Clegane seem small. Harrenhal covered thrice as much ground as Winterfell, and 
its buildings were so much larger they could scarcely be compared. Its stables 
housed a thousand horses, its godswood covered twenty acres, its kitchens were 
as large as Winterfell’s Great Hall, and its own great hall, grandly named the 
Hall of a Hundred Hearths even though it only had thirty and some (Arya had 
tried to count them, twice, but she came up with thirty-three once and 
thirty-five the other time) was so cavernous that Lord Tywin could have feasted 
his entire host, though he never did. Walls, doors, halls, steps, everything 
was built to an inhuman scale that made Arya remember the stories Old Nan used 
to tell of the giants who lived beyond the Wall.
And as lords and ladies never notice the little grey mice under their feet, 
Arya heard all sorts of secrets just by keeping her ears open as she went about 
her duties. Pretty Pia from the buttery was a slut who was working her way 
through every knight in the castle. The wife of the gaoler was with child, but 
the real

father was either Ser Alyn Stackspear or a singer called Whitesmile Wat. Lord 
Lefford made mock of ghosts at table, but always kept a candle burning by his 
bed. Ser Dunaver’s squire Jodge could not hold his water when he slept. The 
cooks despised Ser Harys Swyft and spit in all his food. Once she even 
overheard Maester Tothmure’s serving girl confiding to her brother about some 
message that said Joffrey was a bastard and not the rightful king at all. 
“Lord Tywin told him to burn the letter and never speak such filth again,” 
the girl whispered.
King Robert’s brothers Stannis and Renly had joined the fighting, she heard. 
“And both of them kings now,” Weese said. “Realm’s got more kings than a 
castle’s got rats.” Even Lannister men questioned how long Joffrey would hold 
the Iron Throne. “The lad’s got no army but them gold cloaks, and he’s ruled 
by a eunuch, a dwarf, and a woman,” she heard a lordling mutter in his cups. 
“What good will the likes of them be if it comes to battle?” There was always 
talk of Beric Dondarrion. A fat archer once said the Bloody Mummers had slain 
him, but the others only laughed. “Lorch killed the man at Rushing Falls, and 
the Mountain’s slain him twice. Got me a silver stag says he don’t stay dead 
this time neither.”
Arya did not know who Bloody Mummers were until a fortnight later, when the 
queerest company of men she’d ever seen arrived at Harrenhal. Beneath the 
standard of a black goat with bloody horns rode copper men with bells in their 
braids; lancers astride striped black-and-white horses; bowmen with powdered 
cheeks; squat

hairy men with shaggy shields; brown-skinned men in feathered cloaks; a wispy 
fool in green-and-pink motley; swordsmen with fantastic forked beards dyed 
green and purple and silver; spearmen with colored scars that covered their 
cheeks; a slender man in septon’s robes, a fatherly one in maester’s grey, and 
a sickly one whose leather cloak was fringed with long blond hair.
At their head was a man stick-thin and very tall, with a drawn emaciated face 
made even longer by the ropy black beard that grew from his pointed chin nearly 
to his waist. The helm that hung from his saddle horn was black steel, 
fashioned in the shape of a goat’s head. About his neck he wore a chain made of 
linked coins of many different sizes, shapes, and metals, and his horse was one 
of the strange black-and-white ones.
“You don’t want to know that lot, Weasel,” Weese said when he saw her looking 
at the goat-helmed man. Two of his drinking friends were with him, men-at-arms 
in service to Lord Lefford.
“Who are they?” she asked.
One of the soldiers laughed. “The Footmen, girl. Toes of the Goat. Lord 
Tywin’s Bloody Mummers.”
“Pease for wits. You get her flayed, you can scrub the bloody 
steps,” said Weese. “They’re sellswords, Weasel girl. Call themselves the 
Brave Companions. Don’t use them other names where they can hear, or they’ll 
hurt you bad. The goat-helm’s their captain, Lord Vargo Hoat.”
“He’s no fucking lord,” said the second soldier. “I heard Ser Amory say so. 
He’s just some sellsword with a mouth full of

slobber and a high opinion of hisself.”
“Aye,” said Weese, “but she better call him lord if she wants to 
keep all her parts.”
Arya looked at Vargo Hoat again. How many monsters does Lord Tywin 
have?
The Brave Companions were housed in the Widow’s Tower, so Arya need not serve 
them. She was glad of that; on the very night they arrived, fighting broke out 
between the sellswords and some Lannister men. Ser Harys Swyft’s squire was 
stabbed to death and two of the Bloody Mummers were wounded. The next morning 
Lord Tywin hanged them both from the gatehouse walls, along with one of Lord 
Lydden’s archers. Weese said the archer had started all the trouble by taunting 
the sellswords over Beric Dondarrion. After the hanged men had stopped kicking, 
Vargo Hoat and Ser Harys embraced and kissed and swore to love each other 
always as Lord Tywin looked on. Arya thought it was funny the way Vargo Hoat 
lisped and slobbered, but she knew better than to laugh.
The Bloody Mummers did not linger long at Harrenhal, but before they rode out 
again, Arya heard one of them saying how a northern army under Roose Bolton had 
occupied the ruby ford of the Trident. “If he crosses, Lord Tywin will smash 
him again like he did on the Green Fork,” a Lannister bowmen said, but his 
fellows jeered him down. “Bolton’ll never cross, not till the Young Wolf 
marches from Riverrun with his wild northmen and all them wolves.”
Arya had not known her brother was so near. Riverrun was much closer than 
Winterfell, though she was not certain where it

lay in relation to Harrenhal. I could find out somehow, I know I could, if 
only I could get away. When she thought of seeing Robb’s face again Arya 
had to bite her lip. And I want to see Jon too, and Bran and Rickon, and 
Mother. Even Sansa . . . I’ll kiss her and beg her pardons like 
a proper lady, she’ll like that.
From the courtyard talk she’d learned that the upper chambers of the Tower of 
Dread housed three dozen captives taken during some battle on the Green Fork of 
the Trident. Most had been given freedom of the castle in return for their 
pledge not to attempt escape. They vowed not to escape, Arya told 
herself, but they never swore not to help me 
escape.
The captives ate at their own table in the Hall of a Hundred Hearths, and could 
often be seen about the grounds. Four brothers took their exercise together 
every day, fighting with staves and wooden shields in the Flowstone Yard. Three 
of them were Freys of the Crossing, the fourth their bastard brother. They were 
only there a short time, though; one morning two other brothers arrived under a 
peace banner with a chest of gold, and ransomed them from the knights who’d 
captured them. The six Freys all left together.
No one ransomed the northmen, though. One fat lordling haunted the kitchens, 
Hot Pie told her, always looking for a morsel. His mustache was so bushy that 
it covered his mouth, and the clasp that held his cloak was a 
silver-and-sapphire trident. He belonged to Lord Tywin, but the fierce, bearded 
young man who liked to walk the battlements alone in a black cloak patterned 
with white suns had been taken by some hedge knight who meant to

get rich off him. Sansa would have known who he was, and the fat one too, but 
Arya had never taken much interest in titles and sigils. Whenever Septa Mordane 
had gone on about the history of this house and that house, she was inclined to 
drift and dream and wonder when the lesson would be done.
She did remember Lord Cerwyn, though. His lands had been close to 
Winterfell, so he and his son Cley had often visited. Yet as fate would have 
it, he was the only captive who was never seen; he was abed in a tower cell, 
recovering from a wound. For days and days Arya tried to work out how she might 
steal past the door guards to see him. If he knew her, he would be honor bound 
to help her. A lord would have gold for a certainty, they all did; perhaps he 
would pay some of Lord Tywin’s own sellswords to take her to Riverrun. Father 
had always said that most sellswords would betray anyone for enough 
gold.
Then one morning she spied three women in the cowled grey robes of the silent 
sisters loading a corpse into their wagon. The body was sewn into a cloak of 
the finest silk, decorated with a battle-axe sigil. When Arya asked who it was, 
one of the guards told her that Lord Cerwyn had died. The words felt like a 
kick in the belly. He could never have helped you anyway, she thought 
as the sisters drove the wagon through the gate. He couldn’t even help 
himself, you stupid mouse.
After that it was back to scrubbing and scurrying and listening at doors. Lord 
Tywin would soon march on Riverrun, she heard. Or he would drive south to 
Highgarden, no one would ever

expect that. No, he must defend King’s Landing, Stannis was the greatest 
threat. He’d sent Gregor Clegane and Vargo Hoat to destroy Roose Bolton and 
remove the dagger from his back. He’d sent ravens to the Eyrie, he meant to wed 
the Lady Lysa Arryn and win the Vale. He’d bought a ton of silver to forge 
magic swords that would slay the Stark wargs. He was writing Lady Stark to make 
a peace, the Kingslayer would soon be freed.
Though ravens came and went every day, Lord Tywin himself spent most of his 
days behind closed doors with his war council. Arya caught glimpses of him, but 
always from afar—once walking the walls in the company of three maesters 
and the fat captive with the bushy mustache, once riding out with his lords 
bannermen to visit the encampments, but most often standing in an arch of the 
covered gallery watching men at practice in the yard below. He stood with his 
hands locked together on the gold pommel of his longsword. They said Lord Tywin 
loved gold most of all; he even shit gold, she heard one squire jest. 
The Lannister lord was strong-looking for an old man, with stiff golden 
whiskers and a bald head. There was something in his face that reminded Arya of 
her own father, even though they looked nothing alike. He has a lord’s 
face, that’s all, she told herself. She remembered hearing her lady mother 
tell Father to put on his lord’s face and go deal with some matter. Father had 
laughed at that. She could not imagine Lord Tywin ever laughing at 
anything.
One afternoon, while she was waiting her turn to draw a pail of water from the 
well, she heard the hinges of the east gate

groaning. A party of men rode under the portcullis at a walk. When she spied 
the manticore crawling across the shield of their leader, a stab of hate shot 
through her.
In the light of day, Ser Amory Lorch looked less frightening than he had by 
torchlight, but he still had the pig’s eyes she recalled. One of the women said 
that his men had ridden all the way around the lake chasing Beric Dondarrion 
and slaying rebels. We weren’t rebels, Arya thought. We were the 
Night’s Watch; the Night’s Watch takes no side. Ser Amory had fewer men 
than she remembered, though, and many wounded. I hope their wounds fester. 
I hope they all die.
Then she saw the three near the end of the column.
Rorge had donned a black halfhelm with a broad iron nasal that made it hard to 
see that he did not have a nose. Biter rode ponderously beside him on a 
destrier that looked ready to collapse under his weight. Half-healed burns 
covered his body, making him even more hideous than before.
But Jaqen H’ghar still smiled. His garb was still ragged and filthy, but he had 
found time to wash and brush his hair. It streamed down across his shoulders, 
red and white and shiny, and Arya heard the girls giggling to each other in 
admiration.
I should have let the fire have them. Gendry said to, I should have 
listened. If she hadn’t thrown them that axe they’d all be dead. For a 
moment she was afraid, but they rode past her without a flicker of interest. 
Only Jaqen H’ghar so much as glanced in her direction, and his eyes passed 
right over her. He

does not know me, she thought. Arry was a fierce little boy with a 
sword, and I’m just a grey mouse girl with a pail.
She spent the rest of that day scrubbing steps inside the Wailing Tower. By 
evenfall her hands were raw and bleeding and her arms so sore they trembled 
when she lugged the pail back to the cellar. Too tired even for food, Arya 
begged Weese’s pardons and crawled into her straw to sleep. “Weese,” she 
yawned. “Dunsen, Chiswyck, Polliver, Raff the Sweetling. The Tickler and the 
Hound. Ser Gregor, Ser Amory, Ser Ilyn, Ser Meryn, King Joffrey, Queen 
Cersei.” She thought she might add three more names to her prayer, but she was 
too tired to decide tonight.
Arya was dreaming of wolves running wild through the wood when a strong hand 
clamped down over her mouth like smooth warm stone, solid and unyielding. She 
woke at once, squirming and struggling. “A girl says nothing,” a voice 
whispered close behind her ear. “A girl keeps her lips closed, no one hears, 
and friends may talk in secret. Yes?”
Heart pounding, Arya managed the tiniest of nods.
Jaqen H’ghar took his hand away. The cellar was black as pitch and she could 
not see his face, even inches away. She could smell him, though; his 
skin smelled clean and soapy, and he had scented his hair. “A boy becomes a 
girl,” he murmured.
“I was always a girl. I didn’t think you saw me.”
“A man sees. A man knows.”
She remembered that she hated him. “You scared me. You’re one of 
them now, I should have let you burn. What are you doing

here? Go away or I’ll yell for Weese.”
“A man pays his debts. A man owes three.”
“Three?”
“The Red God has his due, sweet girl, and only death may pay for life. This 
girl took three that were his. This girl must give three in their places. Speak 
the names, and a man will do the rest.”
He wants to help me, Arya realized with a rush of hope that made her 
dizzy. “Take me to Riverrun, it’s not far, if we stole some horses we 
could—”
He laid a finger on her lips. “Three lives you shall have of me. No more, no 
less. Three and we are done. So a girl must ponder.” He kissed her hair 
softly. “But not too long.”
By the time Arya lit her stub of a candle, only a faint smell remained of him, 
a whiff of ginger and cloves lingering in the air. The woman in the next niche 
rolled over on her straw and complained of the light, so Arya blew it out. When 
she closed her eyes, she saw faces swimming before her. Joffrey and his mother, 
Ilyn Payne and Meryn Trant and Sandor Clegane . . . but they 
were in King’s Landing hundreds of miles away, and Ser Gregor had lingered only 
a few nights before departing again for more foraging, taking Raff and Chiswyck 
and the Tickler with him. Ser Amory Lorch was here, though, and she hated him 
almost as much. Didn’t she? She wasn’t certain. And there was always 
Weese.
She thought of him again the next morning, when lack of sleep made her yawn. 
“Weasel,” Weese purred, “next time I see

that mouth droop open, I’ll pull out your tongue and feed it to my bitch.” He 
twisted her ear between his fingers to make certain she’d heard, and told her 
to get back to those steps, he wanted them clean down to the third landing by 
nightfall.
As she worked, Arya thought about the people she wanted dead. She pretended she 
could see their faces on the steps, and scrubbed harder to wipe them away. The 
Starks were at war with the Lannisters and she was a Stark, so she should kill 
as many Lannisters as she could, that was what you did in wars. But she didn’t 
think she should trust Jaqen. I should kill them myself. Whenever her 
father had condemned a man to death, he did the deed himself with Ice, his 
greatsword. “If you would take a man’s life, you owe it to him to look him in 
the face and hear his last words,” she’d heard him tell Robb and Jon 
once.
The next day she avoided Jaqen H’ghar, and the day after that. It was not hard. 
She was very small and Harrenhal was very large, full of places where a mouse 
could hide.
And then Ser Gregor returned, earlier than expected, driving a herd of goats 
this time in place of a herd of prisoners. She heard he’d lost four men in one 
of Lord Beric’s night raids, but those Arya hated returned unscathed and took 
up residence on the second floor of the Wailing Tower. Weese saw that they were 
well supplied with drink. “They always have a good thirst, that lot,” he 
grumbled. “Weasel, go up and ask if they’ve got any clothes that need mending, 
I’ll have the women see to it.”
Arya ran up her well-scrubbed steps. No one paid her any

mind when she entered. Chiswyck was seated by the fire with a horn of ale to 
hand, telling one of his funny stories. She dared not interrupt, unless she 
wanted a bloody lip.
“After the Hand’s tourney, it were, before the war come,” Chiswyck was 
saying. “We were on our ways back west, seven of us with Ser Gregor. Raff was 
with me, and young Joss Stilwood, he’d squired for Ser in the lists. Well, we 
come on this pisswater river, running high on account there’d been rains. No 
way to ford, but there’s an alehouse near, so there we repair. Ser rousts the 
brewer and tells him to keep our horns full till the waters fall, and you 
should see the man’s pig eyes shine at the sight o’ silver. So he’s fetching us 
ale, him and his daughter, and poor thin stuff it is, no more’n brown piss, 
which don’t make me any happier, nor Ser neither. And all the time this 
brewer’s saying how glad he is to have us, custom being slow on account o’ them 
rains. The fool won’t shut his yap, not him, though Ser is saying not a word, 
just brooding on the Knight o’ Pansies and that bugger’s trick he played. You 
can see how tight his mouth sits, so me and the other lads we know better’n to 
say a squeak to him, but this brewer he’s got to talk, he even asks how m’lord 
fared in the jousting. Ser just gave him this look.” Chiswyck cackled, quaffed 
his ale, and wiped the foam away with the back of his hand. “Meanwhile, this 
daughter of his has been fetching and pouring, a fat little thing, eighteen or 
so—”
“Thirteen, more like,” Raff the Sweetling drawled.
“Well, be that as it may, she’s not much to look at, but

Eggon’s been drinking and gets to touching her, and might be I did a little 
touching meself, and Raff’s telling young Stilwood that he ought t’ drag the 
girl upstairs and make hisself a man, giving the lad courage as it were. 
Finally Joss reaches up under her skirt, and she shrieks and drops her flagon 
and goes running off to the kitchen. Well, it would have ended right there, 
only what does the old fool do but he goes to Ser and asks him to 
make us leave the girl alone, him being an anointed knight and all 
such.
“Ser Gregor, he wasn’t paying no mind to none of our fun, but now he 
looks, you know how he does, and he commands that the girl be brought 
before him. Now the old man has to drag her out of the kitchen, and no one to 
blame but hisself. Ser looks her over and says, ‘So this is the whore you’re so 
concerned for,’ and this besotted old fool says, ‘My Layna’s no whore, ser,’ 
right to Gregor’s face. Ser, he never blinks, just says, ‘She is now,’ tosses 
the old man another silver, rips the dress off the wench, and takes her right 
there on the table in front of her da, her flopping and wiggling like a rabbit 
and making these noises. The look on the old man’s face, I laughed so hard ale 
was coming out me nose. Then this boy hears the noise, the son I figure, and 
comes rushing up from the cellar, so Raff has to stick a dirk in his belly. By 
then Ser’s done, so he goes back to his drinking and we all have a turn. 
Tobbot, you know how he is, he flops her over and goes in the back way. The 
girl was done fighting by the time I had her, maybe she’d decided she liked it 
after all, though to tell the truth I wouldn’t have minded a little wiggling. 
And

now here’s the best bit . . . when it’s all done, Ser tells the 
old man that he wants his change. The girl wasn’t worth a silver, he 
says . . . and damned if that old man didn’t fetch a fistful of 
coppers, beg m’lord’s pardon, and thank him for the 
custom!”
The men all roared, none louder than Chiswyck himself, who laughed so hard at 
his own story that snot dribbled from his nose down into his scraggy grey 
beard. Arya stood in the shadows of the stairwell and watched him. She crept 
back down to the cellars without saying a word. When Weese found that she 
hadn’t asked about the clothes, he yanked down her breeches and caned her until 
blood ran down her thighs, but Arya closed her eyes and thought of all the 
sayings Syrio had taught her, so she scarcely felt it.
Two nights later, he sent her to the Barracks Hall to serve at table. She was 
carrying a flagon of wine and pouring when she glimpsed Jaqen H’ghar at his 
trencher across the aisle. Chewing her lip, Arya glanced around warily to make 
certain Weese was not in sight. Fear cuts deeper than swords, she 
told herself.
She took a step, and another, and with each she felt less a mouse. She worked 
her way down the bench, filling wine cups. Rorge sat to Jaqen’s right, deep 
drunk, but he took no note of her. Arya leaned close and whispered, 
“Chiswyck,” right in Jaqen’s ear. The Lorathi gave no sign that he had 
heard.
When her flagon was empty, Arya hurried down to the cellars to refill it from 
the cask, and quickly returned to her pouring. No one had died of thirst while 
she was gone, nor even noted her brief absence.Nothing happened the next day, nor the day after, but on the third day 
Arya went to the kitchens with Weese to fetch their dinner. “One of the 
Mountain’s men fell off a wallwalk last night and broke his fool neck,” she 
heard Weese tell a cook.
“Drunk?” the woman asked.
“No more’n usual. Some are saying it was Harren’s ghost flung him down.” He 
snorted to show what he thought of such notions.
It wasn’t Harren, Arya wanted to say, it was me. She had 
killed Chiswyck with a whisper, and she would kill two more before she was 
through. I’m the ghost in Harrenhal, she thought. And that night, 
there was one less name to hate.

Confusion and clangor ruled the castle. Men stood on the beds of wagons 
loading casks of wine, sacks of flour, and bundles of new-fletched arrows. 
Smiths straightened swords, knocked dents from breastplates, and shoed 
destriers and pack mules alike. Mail shirts were tossed in barrels of sand and 
rolled across the lumpy surface of the Flowstone Yard to scour them clean. 
Weese’s women had twenty cloaks to mend, a hundred more to wash. The high and 
humble crowded into the sept together to pray. Outside the walls, tents and 
pavilions were coming down. Squires tossed pails of water over cookfires, while 
soldiers took out their oilstones to give their blades one last good lick. The 
noise was a swelling tide: horses blowing and whickering, lords shouting 
commands, men-at-arms trading curses, camp followers squabbling.Lord Tywin Lannister was marching at last.
Ser Addam Marbrand was the first of the captains to depart, a day before the 
rest. He made a gallant show of it, riding a spirited red courser whose mane 
was the same copper color as the long hair that streamed past Ser Addam’s 
shoulders. The horse was barded in bronze-colored trappings dyed to match the 
rider’s cloak and emblazoned with the burning tree. Some of the castle women 
sobbed to see him go. Weese said he was a great horseman and sword fighter, 
Lord Tywin’s most daring commander.I hope he dies, Arya thought as she watched him ride out the 
gate, his men streaming after him in a double column. I hope they all 
die. They were going to fight Robb, she knew. Listening to the talk as she 
went about her work, Arya had learned that Robb had won some great victory in 
the west. He’d burned Lannisport, some said, or else he meant to burn it. He’d 
captured Casterly Rock and put everyone to the sword, or he was besieging the 
Golden Tooth . . . but something had happened, that 
much was certain.
Weese had her running messages from dawn to dusk. Some of them even took her 
beyond the castle walls, out into the mud and madness of the camp. I could 
flee, she thought as a wagon rumbled past her. I could hop on the 
back of a wagon and hide, or fall in with the camp followers, no one would stop 
me. She might have done it if not for Weese. He’d told them more than once 
what he’d do to anyone who tried to run off on him. “It won’t be no beating, 
oh, no. I won’t lay a finger on you. I’ll just save you for the Qohorik, yes I 
will, I’ll save you for the Crippler. Vargo Hoat his name is, and when he gets 
back he’ll cut off your feet.” Maybe if Weese were dead, Arya 
thought . . . but not when she was with him. He could look at 
you and smell what you were thinking, he always said so.
Weese never imagined she could read, though, so he never bothered to seal the 
messages he gave her. Arya peeked at them all, but they were never anything 
good, just stupid stuff sending this cart to the granary and that one to the 
armory. One was a demand for payment on a gambling debt, but the knight she 
gave it

to couldn’t read. When she told him what it said he tried to hit her, but Arya 
ducked under the blow, snatched a silver-banded drinking horn off his saddle, 
and darted away. The knight roared and came after her, but she slid between two 
wayns, wove through a crowd of archers, and jumped a latrine trench. In his 
mail he couldn’t keep up. When she gave the horn to Weese, he told her that a 
smart little Weasel like her deserved a reward. “I’ve got my eye on a plump 
crisp capon to sup on tonight. We’ll share it, me and you. You’ll like 
that.”
Everywhere she went, Arya searched for Jaqen H’ghar, wanting to whisper another 
name to him before those she hated were all gone out of her reach, but amidst the 
chaos and confusion the Lorathi sellsword was not to be found. He still owed 
her two deaths, and she was worried she would never get them if he rode off to 
battle with the rest. Finally she worked up the courage to ask one of the gate 
guards if he’d gone. “One of Lorch’s men, is he?” the man said. “He won’t be 
going, then. His lordship’s named Ser Amory castellan of
Harrenhal. That whole 
lot’s staying right here, to hold the castle. The Bloody Mummers will be left 
as well, to do the foraging. That goat Vargo Hoat is like to spit, him and 
Lorch have always hated each other.”
The Mountain would be leaving with Lord Tywin, though. He would command the van 
in battle, which meant that Dunsen, Polliver, and Raff would all slip between 
her fingers unless she could find Jaqen and have him kill one of them before 
they left.
“Weasel,” Weese said that afternoon. “Get to the armory and

tell Lucan that Ser Lyonel notched his sword in practice and needs a new one. 
Here’s his mark.” He handed her a square of paper. “Be quick about it now, 
he’s to ride with Ser Kevan Lannister.”
Arya took the paper and ran. The armory adjoined the castle smithy, a long 
high-roofed tunnel of a building with twenty forges built into its walls and 
long stone water troughs for tempering the steel. Half of the forges were at 
work when she entered. The walls rang with the sound of hammers, and burly men 
in leather aprons stood sweating in the sullen heat as they bent over bellows 
and anvils. When she spied Gendry, his bare chest was slick with sweat, but the 
blue eyes under the heavy black hair had the stubborn look she remembered. Arya 
didn’t know that she even wanted to talk to him. It was his fault they’d all 
been caught. “Which one is Lucan?” She thrust out the paper. “I’m to get a 
new sword for Ser Lyonel.”
“Never mind about Ser Lyonel.” He drew her aside by the arm. “Last night Hot 
Pie asked me if I heard you yell Winterfell back at the holdfast, 
when we were all fighting on the wall.”
“I never did!”
“Yes you did. I heard you too.”
“Everyone was yelling stuff,” Arya said defensively. “Hot Pie yelled 
hot pie. He must have yelled it a hundred times.”
“It’s what you yelled that matters. I told Hot Pie he should clean 
the wax out of his ears, that all you yelled was Go to hell! If he 
asks you, you better say the same.”
“I will,” she said, even though she thought go to hell was a

stupid thing to yell. She didn’t dare tell Hot Pie who she really was. 
Maybe I should say Hot Pie’s name to Jaqen.
“I’ll get Lucan,” Gendry said.
Lucan grunted at the writing (though Arya did not think he could read it), and 
pulled down a heavy longsword. “This is too good for that oaf, and you tell 
him I said so,” he said as he gave her the blade.
“I will,” she lied. If she did any such thing, Weese would beat her bloody. 
Lucan could deliver his own insults.
The longsword was a lot heavier than Needle had been, but Arya liked the feel 
of it. The weight of steel in her hands made her feel stronger. Maybe I’m 
not a water dancer yet, but I’m not a mouse either. A mouse couldn’t use a 
sword but I can. The gates were open, soldiers coming and going, drays 
rolling in empty and going out creaking and swaying under their loads. She 
thought about going to the stables and telling them that Ser Lyonel wanted a 
new horse. She had the paper, the stableboys wouldn’t be able to read it any 
better than Lucan had. I could take the horse and the sword and just ride 
out. If the guards tried to stop me I’d show them the paper and say I was 
bringing everything to Ser Lyonel. She had no notion what Ser Lyonel 
looked like or where to find him, though. If they questioned her, they’d know, 
and then Weese . . . Weese . . .
As she chewed her lip, trying not to think about how it would feel to have her 
feet cut off, a group of archers in leather jerkins and iron helms went past, 
their bows slung across their

shoulders. Arya heard snatches of their talk.
“. . . giants I tell you, he’s got giants twenty foot 
tall come down from beyond the Wall, follow him like 
dogs . . .”
“. . . not natural, coming on them so fast, in the night and all. 
He’s more wolf than man, all them Starks are . . .”
“. . . shit on your wolves and giants, the boy’d piss his pants if 
he knew we was coming. He wasn’t man enough to march on Harrenhal, was he? Ran 
t’other way, didn’t he? He’d run now if he knew what was best for 
him.”
“So you say, but might be the boy knows something we don’t, maybe it’s 
us ought to be run . . .”
Yes, Arya thought. Yes, it’s you who ought to run, you and Lord 
Tywin and the Mountain and Ser Addam and Ser Amory and stupid Ser Lyonel 
whoever he is, all of you better run or my brother will kill you, he’s a Stark, 
he’s more wolf than man, and so am I.
“Weasel.” Weese’s voice cracked like a whip. She never saw where he came 
from, but suddenly he was right in front of her. “Give me that. Took you long 
enough.” He snatched the sword from her fingers, and dealt her a stinging slap 
with the back of his hand. “Next time be quicker about it.”
For a moment she had been a wolf again, but Weese’s slap took it all away and 
left her with nothing but the taste of her own blood in her mouth. She’d bitten 
her tongue when he hit her. She hated him for that.
“You want another?” Weese demanded. “You’ll get it too. I’ll have none of 
your insolent looks. Get down to the brewhouse

and tell Tuffleberry that I have two dozen barrels for him, but he better send 
his lads to fetch them or I’ll find someone wants ’em worse.” Arya started 
off, but not quick enough for Weese. “You run if you want to eat 
tonight,” he shouted, his promises of a plump crisp capon already forgotten. 
“And don’t be getting lost again, or I swear I’ll beat you bloody.”
You won’t, Arya thought. You won’t ever again. But she ran. 
The old gods of the north must have been guiding her steps. Halfway to the 
brewhouse, as she passing under the stone bridge that arched between Widow’s 
Tower and Kingspyre, she heard harsh, growling laughter. Rorge came around a 
corner with three other men, the manticore badge of Ser Amory sewn over their 
hearts. When he saw her, he stopped and grinned, showing a mouthful of crooked 
brown teeth under the leather flap he wore sometimes to cover the hole in his 
face. “Yoren’s little cunt,” he called her. “Guess we know why that black 
bastard wanted you on the Wall, don’t we?” He laughed again, and the 
others laughed with him. “Where’s your stick now?” Rorge demanded suddenly, 
the smile gone as quick as it had come. “Seems to me I promised to fuck you 
with it.” He took a step toward her. Arya edged backward. “Not so brave now 
that I’m not in chains, are you?”
“I saved you.” She kept a good yard between them, ready to run 
quick as a snake if he made a grab for her.
“Owe you another fucking for that, seems like. Did Yoren pump your cunny, or 
did he like that tight little ass better?”
“I’m looking for Jaqen,” she said. “There’s a message.”Rorge halted. Something in his eyes . . . could it be 
that he was scared of Jaqen H’ghar? “The bathhouse. Get out of my 
way.”
Arya whirled and ran, swift as a deer, her feet flying over the cobbles all the 
way to the bathhouse. She found Jaqen soaking in a tub, steam rising around him 
as a serving girl sluiced hot water over his head. His long hair, red on one 
side and white on the other, fell down across his shoulders, wet and 
heavy.
She crept up quiet as a shadow, but he opened his eyes all the same. “She 
steals in on little mice feet, but a man hears,” he said. How could he 
hear me? she wondered, and it seemed as if he heard that as well. “The 
scuff of leather on stone sings loud as warhorns to a man with open ears. 
Clever girls go barefoot.”
“I have a message.” Arya eyed the serving girl uncertainly. When she did not 
seem likely to go away, she leaned in until her mouth was almost touching his 
ear. “Weese,” she whispered.
Jaqen H’ghar closed his eyes again, floating languid, half-asleep. “Tell his 
lordship a man shall attend him at his leisure.” His hand moved suddenly, 
splashing hot water at her, and Arya had to leap back to keep from getting 
drenched.
When she told Tuffleberry what Weese had said, the brewer cursed loudly. “You 
tell Weese my lads got duties to attend to, and you tell him he’s a pox-ridden 
bastard too, and the seven hells will freeze over before he gets another horn 
of my ale. I’ll have them barrels within the hour or Lord Tywin will hear of 
it, see if he don’t.”
Weese cursed too when Arya brought back that message, even

though she left out the pox-ridden bastard part. He fumed and threatened, but 
in the end he rounded up six men and sent them off grumbling to fetch the 
barrels down to the brewhouse.
Supper that evening was a thin stew of barley, onion, and carrots, with a wedge 
of stale brown bread. One of the women had taken to sleeping in Weese’s bed, 
and she got a piece of ripe blue cheese as well, and a wing off the capon that 
Weese had spoken of that morning. He ate the rest himself, the grease running 
down in a shiny line through the boils that festered at the corner of his 
mouth. The bird was almost gone when he glanced up from his trencher and saw 
Arya staring. “Weasel, come here.”
A few mouthfuls of dark meat still clung to one thigh. He forgot, but now 
he’s remembered, Arya thought. It made her feel bad for telling Jaqen to 
kill him. She got off the bench and went to the head of the table.
“I saw you looking at me.” Weese wiped his fingers on the front of her shift. 
Then he grabbed her throat with one hand and slapped her with the other. “What 
did I tell you?” He slapped her again, backhand. “Keep those eyes to 
yourself, or next time I’ll spoon one out and feed it to my bitch.” A shove 
sent her stumbling to the floor. Her hem caught on a loose nail in the 
splintered wooden bench and ripped as she fell. “You’ll mend that before you 
sleep,” Weese announced as he pulled the last bit of meat off the capon. When 
he was finished he sucked his fingers noisily, and threw the bones to his ugly 
spotted dog.
“Weese,” Arya whispered that night as she bent over the

tear in her shift. “Dunsen, Polliver, Raff the Sweetling,” she said, calling 
a name every time she pushed the bone needle through the undyed wool. “The 
Tickler and the Hound. Ser Gregor, Ser Amory, Ser Ilyn, Ser Meryn, King 
Joffrey, Queen Cersei.” She wondered how much longer she would have to include 
Weese in her prayer, and drifted off to sleep dreaming that on the morrow, 
when she woke, he’d be dead.
But it was the sharp toe of Weese’s boot that woke her, as ever. The main 
strength of Lord Tywin’s host would ride this day, he told them as they broke 
their fast on oatcakes. “Don’t none of you be thinking how easy it’ll be here 
once m’lord of Lannister is gone,” he warned. “The castle won’t grow no 
smaller, I promise you that, only now there’ll be fewer hands to tend to it. 
You lot of slugabeds are going to learn what work is now, yes you 
are.”
Not from you. Arya picked at her oaten cake. Weese frowned at her, as 
if he smelled her secret. Quickly she dropped her gaze to her food, and dared 
not raise her eyes again.
Pale light filled the yard when Lord Tywin Lannister took his leave of 
Harrenhal. Arya watched from an arched window halfway up the Wailing Tower. His 
charger wore a blanket of enameled crimson scales and gilded crinet and 
chamfron, while Lord Tywin himself sported a thick ermine cloak. His brother 
Ser Kevan looked near as splendid. No less than four standard-bearers went 
before them, carrying huge crimson banners emblazoned with the golden lion. 
Behind the Lannisters came their great lords and captains. Their banners flared 
and flapped, a pageant of color:

red ox and golden mountain, purple unicorn and bantam rooster, brindled boar 
and badger, a silver ferret and a juggler in motley, stars and sunbursts, 
peacock and panther, chevron and dagger, black hood and blue beetle and green 
arrow.
Last of all came Ser Gregor Clegane in his grey plate steel, astride a stallion 
as bad-tempered as his rider. Polliver rode beside him, with the black dog 
standard in his hand and Gendry’s horned helm on his head. He was a tall man, 
but he looked no more than a half-grown boy when he rode in his master’s 
shadow.
A shiver crept up Arya’s spine as she watched them pass under the great iron 
portcullis of Harrenhal. Suddenly she knew that she had made a terrible 
mistake. I’m so stupid, she thought. Weese did not matter, no more 
than Chiswyck had. These were the men who mattered, the ones she 
ought to have killed. Last night she could have whispered any of them dead, if 
only she hadn’t been so mad at Weese for hitting her and lying about the capon. 
Lord Tywin, why didn’t I say Lord Tywin?
Perhaps it was not too late to change her mind. Weese was not killed yet. If 
she could find Jaqen, tell him . . .
Hurriedly, Arya ran down the twisting steps, her chores forgotten. She heard 
the rattle of chains as the portcullis was slowly lowered, its spikes sinking 
deep into the ground . . . and then another sound, a shriek of 
pain and fear.
A dozen people got there before her, though none was coming any too close. Arya 
squirmed between them. Weese was sprawled across the cobbles, his throat a red 
ruin, eyes gaping sightlessly

up at a bank of grey cloud. His ugly spotted dog stood on his chest, lapping at 
the blood pulsing from his neck, and every so often ripping a mouthful of flesh 
out of the dead man’s face.
Finally someone brought a crossbow and shot the spotted dog dead while she was 
worrying at one of Weese’s ears.
“Damnedest thing,” she heard a man say. “He had that bitch dog since she was 
a pup.”
“This place is cursed,” the man with the crossbow said.
“It’s Harren’s ghost, that’s what it is,” said Goodwife Amabel. “I’ll not 
sleep here another night, I swear it.”
Arya lifted her gaze from the dead man and his dead dog. Jaqen H’ghar was 
leaning up against the side of the Wailing Tower. When he saw her looking, he 
lifted a hand to his face and laid two fingers casually against his 
cheek.

There’s ghosts, I know there is.” Hot Pie was kneading bread, his arms 
floured up to his elbows. “Pia saw something in the buttery last 
night.”
Arya made a rude noise. Pia was always seeing things in the buttery. Usually 
they were men. “Can I have a tart?” she asked. “You baked a whole 
tray.”“I need a whole tray. Ser Amory is partial to them.”
She hated Ser Amory. “Let’s spit on them.”
Hot Pie looked around nervously. The kitchens were full of shadows and echoes, 
but the other cooks and scullions were all asleep in the cavernous lofts above 
the ovens. “He’ll know.”
“He will not,” Arya said. “You can’t taste spit.”
“If he does, it’s me they’ll whip.” Hot Pie stopped his kneading. “You 
shouldn’t even be here. It’s the black of night.”
It was, but Arya never minded. Even in the black of night, the kitchens were 
never still; there was always someone rolling dough for the morning bread, 
stirring a kettle with a long wooden spoon, or butchering a hog for Ser Amory’s 
breakfast bacon. Tonight it was Hot Pie.
“If Pinkeye wakes and finds you gone—” Hot Pie said.
“Pinkeye never wakes.” His true name was Mebble, but everyone called him 
Pinkeye for his runny eyes. “Not once he’s

passed out.” Each morning he broke his fast with ale. Each evening he fell 
into a drunken sleep after supper, wine-colored spit running down his chin. 
Arya would wait until she heard him snoring, then creep barefoot up the 
servant’s stair, making no more noise than the mouse she’d been. She carried 
neither candle nor taper. Syrio had told her once that darkness could be her 
friend, and he was right. If she had the moon and the stars to see by, that was 
enough. “I bet we could escape, and Pinkeye wouldn’t even notice I was gone,” 
she told Hot Pie.
“I don’t want to escape. It’s better here than it was in them woods. I don’t 
want to eat no worms. Here, sprinkle some flour on the board.”
Arya cocked her head. “What’s that?”
“What? I don’t—”
“Listen with your ears, not your mouth. That was a warhorn. Two 
blasts, didn’t you hear? And there, that’s the portcullis chains, someone’s 
going out or coming in. Want to go see?” The gates of Harrenhal had not been 
opened since the morning Lord Tywin had marched with his host.
“I’m making the morning bread,” Hot Pie complained. “Anyhow I don’t like it 
when it’s dark, I told you.”
“I’m going. I’ll tell you after. Can I have a tart?”
“No.”
She filched one anyway, and ate it on her way out. It was stuffed with chopped 
nuts and fruit and cheese, the crust flaky and still warm from the oven. Eating 
Ser Amory’s tart made Arya

feel daring. Barefoot surefoot lightfoot, she sang under her breath. 
I am the ghost in Harrenhal.
The horn had stirred the castle from sleep; men were coming out into the ward 
to see what the commotion was about. Arya fell in with the others. A line of ox 
carts were rumbling under the portcullis. Plunder, she knew at once. 
The riders escorting the carts spoke in a babble of queer tongues. Their armor 
glinted pale in the moonlight, and she saw a pair of striped black-and-white 
zorses. The Bloody Mummers. Arya withdrew a little deeper into the 
shadows, and watched as a huge black bear rolled by, caged in the back of a 
wagon. Other carts were loaded down with silver plate, weapons and shields, 
bags of flour, pens of squealing hogs and scrawny dogs and chickens. Arya was 
thinking how long it had been since she’d had a slice off a pork roast when she 
saw the first of the prisoners.
By his bearing and the proud way he held his head, he must have been a lord. 
She could see mail glinting beneath his torn red surcoat. At first Arya took 
him for a Lannister, but when he passed near a torch she saw his device was a 
silver fist, not a lion. His wrists were bound tightly, and a rope around one 
ankle tied him to the man behind him, and him to the man behind him, so the 
whole column had to shuffle along in a lurching lockstep. Many of the captives 
were wounded. If any halted, one of the riders would trot up and give him a 
lick of the whip to get him moving again. She tried to judge how many prisoners 
there were, but lost count before she got to fifty. There were twice

that many at least. Their clothing was stained with mud and blood, and in the 
torchlight it was hard to make out all their badges and sigils, but some of 
those Arya glimpsed she recognized. Twin towers. Sunburst. Bloody man. 
Battle-axe. The battle-axe is for Cerwyn, and the white sun on black is 
Karstark. They’re northmen. My father’s men, and Robb’s. She didn’t like 
to think what that might mean.
The Bloody Mummers began to dismount. Stableboys emerged sleepy from their 
straw to tend their lathered horses. One of the riders was shouting for ale. 
The noise brought Ser Amory Lorch out onto the covered gallery above the ward, 
flanked by two torchbearers. Goat-helmed Vargo Hoat reined up below him. “My 
lord cathellan,” the sellsword said. He had a thick, slobbery voice, as if his 
tongue was too big for his mouth.
“What’s all this, Hoat?” Ser Amory demanded, frowning.
“Captiths. Rooth Bolton thought to croth the river, but my Brafe Companions 
cut his van to pieceth. Killed many, and thent Bolton running. Thith ith their 
lord commander, Glover, and the one behind ith Ther Aenyth Frey.”
Ser Amory Lorch stared down at the roped captives with his little pig eyes. 
Arya did not think he was pleased. Everyone in the castle knew that he and 
Vargo Hoat hated each other. “Very well,” he said. “Ser Cadwyn, take these 
men to the dungeons.”
The lord with the mailed fist on his surcoat raised his eyes. “We were 
promised honorable treatment—” he began.
“Silenth!” Vargo Hoat screamed at him, spraying spittle.Ser Amory addressed the captives. “What Hoat promised you is nothing to 
me. Lord Tywin made me the castellan of Harrenhal, and I shall do 
with you as I please.” He gestured to his guards. “The great cell under the 
Widow’s Tower ought to hold them all. Any who do not care to go are free to die 
here.”
As his men herded off the captives at spearpoint, Arya saw Pinkeye emerge from 
the stairwell, blinking at the torchlight. If he found her missing, he would 
shout and threaten to whip the bloody hide off her, but she was not afraid. He 
was no Weese. He was forever threatening to whip the bloody hide off this one 
or that one, but Arya never actually knew him to hit. Still, it would 
be better if he never saw her. She glanced around. The oxen were being 
unharnessed, the carts unloaded, while the Brave Companions clamored for drink 
and the curious gathered around the caged bear. In the commotion, it was not 
hard to slip off unseen. She went back the way she had come, wanting to be out 
of sight before someone noticed her and thought to put her to work.
Away from the gates and the stables, the great castle was largely deserted. The 
noise dwindled behind her. A swirling wind gusted, drawing a high shivery 
scream from the cracks in the Wailing Tower. Leaves had begun to fall from the 
trees in the godswood, and she could hear them moving through the deserted 
courtyards and between the empty buildings, making a faint skittery sound as 
the wind drove them across the stones. Now that Harrenhal was near empty once 
again, sound did queer things here. Sometimes the stones seemed to drink up 
noise, shrouding the yards

in a blanket of silence. Other times, the echoes had a life of their own, so 
every footfall became the tread of a ghostly army, and every distant voice a 
ghostly feast. The funny sounds were one of the things that bothered Hot Pie, 
but not Arya.
Quiet as a shadow, she flitted across the middle bailey, around the Tower of 
Dread, and through the empty mews, where people said the spirits of dead 
falcons stirred the air with ghostly wings. She could go where she would. The 
garrison numbered no more than a hundred men, so small a troop that they were 
lost in Harrenhal. The Hall of a Hundred Hearths was closed off, along with 
many of the lesser buildings, even the Wailing Tower. Ser Amory Lorch resided 
in the castellan’s chambers in Kingspyre, themselves as spacious as a lord’s, 
and Arya and the other servants had moved to the cellars beneath him so they 
would be close at hand. While Lord Tywin had been in residence, there was 
always a man-at-arms wanting to know your business. But now there were only a 
hundred men left to guard a thousand doors, and no one seemed to know who 
should be where, or care much.
As she passed the armory, Arya heard the ring of a hammer. A deep orange glow 
shone through the high windows. She climbed to the roof and peeked down. Gendry 
was beating out a breastplate. When he worked, nothing existed for him but 
metal, bellows, fire. The hammer was like part of his arm. She watched the play 
of muscles in his chest and listened to the steel music he made. He’s 
strong, she thought. As he took up the long-handled tongs to dip the 
breastplate into the quenching trough, Arya slithered

through the window and leapt down to the floor beside him.
He did not seem surprised to see her. “You should be abed, girl.” The 
breastplate hissed like a cat as he dipped it in the cold water. “What was all 
that noise?”
“Vargo Hoat’s come back with prisoners. I saw their badges. There’s a Glover, 
from Deepwood Motte, he’s my father’s man. The rest too, mostly.” All of a 
sudden, Arya knew why her feet had brought her here. “You have to help me get 
them out.”
Gendry laughed. “And how do we do that?”
“Ser Amory sent them down to the dungeon. The one under the Widow’s Tower, 
that’s just one big cell. You could smash the door open with your 
hammer—”
“While the guards watch and make bets on how many swings it will take me, 
maybe?”
Arya chewed her lips. “We’d need to kill the guards.”
“How are we supposed to do that?”
“Maybe there won’t be a lot of them.”
“If there’s two, that’s too many for you and me. You never learned 
nothing in that village, did you? You try this and Vargo Hoat will cut off your 
hands and feet, the way he does.” Gendry took up the tongs again.
“You’re afraid.”
“Leave me alone, girl.”
“Gendry, there’s a hundred northmen. Maybe more, I couldn’t count 
them all. That’s as many as Ser Amory has. Well, not counting the Bloody 
Mummers. We just have to get them out and we

can take over the castle and escape.”
“Well, you can’t get them out, no more’n you could save Lommy.” Gendry turned 
the breastplate with the tongs to look at it closely. “And if we did escape, 
where would we go?”
“Winterfell,” she said at once. “I’d tell Mother how you helped me, and you 
could stay—”
“Would m’lady permit? Could I shoe your horses for you, and make swords for 
your lordly brothers?”
Sometimes he made her so angry. “You stop that!”
“Why should I wager my feet for the chance to sweat in Winterfell in place of 
Harrenhal? You know old Ben Blackthumb? He came here as a boy. Smithed for Lady 
Whent and her father before her and his father before him, and even for Lord 
Lothston who held Harrenhal before the Whents. Now he smiths for Lord Tywin, 
and you know what he says? A sword’s a sword, a helm’s a helm, and if you reach 
in the fire you get burned, no matter who you’re serving. Lucan’s a fair enough 
master. I’ll stay here.”
“The queen will catch you, then. She didn’t send gold cloaks after Ben 
Blackthumb!”
“Likely it wasn’t even me they wanted.”
“It was too, you know it. You’re somebody.”
“I’m a ‘prentice smith, and one day might be I’ll make a master 
armorer . . . if I don’t run off and lose my feet or 
get myself killed.” He turned away from her, picked up his hammer once more, 
and began to bang.
Arya’s hands curled into helpless fists. “The next helm you

make, put mule’s ears on it in place of bull’s horns!” She had to 
flee, or else she would have started hitting him. He probably wouldn’t 
even feel it if I did. When they find who he is and cut off his stupid 
mulehead, he’ll be sorry he didn’t help. She was better off without him 
anyhow. He was the one who got her caught at the village.
But thinking of the village made her remember the march, and the storeroom, and 
the Tickler. She thought of the little boy who’d been hit in the face with the 
mace, of stupid old All-for-Joffrey, of Lommy Greenhands. I was a sheep, 
and then I was a mouse, I couldn’t do anything but hide. Arya chewed her 
lip and tried to think when her courage had come back. Jaqen made me brave 
again. He made me a ghost instead of a mouse.
She had been avoiding the Lorathi since Weese’s death. Chiswyck had been 
easy, anyone could push a man off the wallwalk, but Weese had raised 
that ugly spotted dog from a pup, and only some dark magic could have turned 
the animal against him. Yoren found Jaqen in a black cell, the same as 
Rorge and Biter, she remembered. Jaqen did something horrible and 
Yoren knew, that’s why he kept him in chains. If the Lorathi was a wizard, 
Rorge and Biter could be demons he called up from some hell, not men at 
all.
Jaqen still owed her one death. In Old Nan’s stories about men who were given 
magic wishes by a grumkin, you had to be especially careful with the third 
wish, because it was the last. Chiswyck and Weese hadn’t been very important. 
The last death has to count, Arya told herself every night when she 
whispered her

names. But now she wondered if that was truly the reason she had hesitated. So 
long as she could kill with a whisper, Arya need not be afraid of 
anyone . . . but once she used up the last death, she would 
only be a mouse again.
With Pinkeye awake, she dared not go back to her bed. Not knowing where else to 
hide, she made for the godswood. She liked the sharp smell of the pines and 
sentinels, the feel of grass and dirt between her toes, and the sound the wind 
made in the leaves. A slow little stream meandered through the wood, and there 
was one spot where it had eaten the ground away beneath a deadfall.
There, beneath rotting wood and twisted splintered branches, she found her 
hidden sword.
Gendry was too stubborn to make one for her, so she had made her own by 
breaking the bristles off a broom. Her blade was much too light and had no 
proper grip, but she liked the sharp jagged splintery end. Whenever she had a 
free hour she stole away to work at the drills Syrio had taught her, moving 
barefoot over the fallen leaves, slashing at branches and whacking down leaves. 
Sometimes she even climbed the trees and danced among the upper branches, her 
toes gripping the limbs as she moved back and forth, teetering a little less 
every day as her balance returned to her. Night was the best time; no one ever 
bothered her at night.
Arya climbed. Up in the 
kingdom of the leaves, she unsheathed and for a time forgot them all, Ser Amory 
and the Mummers and her father’s men alike, losing herself in the feel of rough 
wood beneath the

soles of her feet and the swish of sword through air. A broken branch 
became Joffrey. She struck at it until it fell away. The queen and Ser Ilyn and 
Ser Meryn and the Hound were only leaves, but she killed them all as well, 
slashing them to wet green ribbons. When her arm grew weary, she sat with her 
legs over a high limb to catch her breath in the cool dark air, listening to the 
squeak of bats as they hunted. Through the leafy canopy she could see the 
bone-white branches of the heart tree. It looks just like the one in 
Winterfell from here. If only it had been . . . then when 
she climbed down she would have been home again, and maybe find her father 
sitting under the weirwood where he always sat.
Shoving her sword through her belt, she slipped down branch to branch until she 
was back on the ground. The light of the moon painted the limbs of the weirwood 
silvery white as she made her way toward it, but the five-pointed red leaves 
turned black by night. Arya stared at the face carved into its trunk. It was a 
terrible face, its mouth twisted, its eyes flaring and full of hate. Is that 
what a god looked like? Could gods be hurt, the same as people? I should 
pray, she thought suddenly.
Arya went to her knees. She wasn’t sure how she should begin. She clasped her 
hands together. Help me, you old gods, she prayed silently. Help 
me get those men out of the dungeon so we can kill Ser Amory, and bring me home 
to Winterfell. Make me a water dancer and a wolf and not afraid again, 
ever.
Was that enough? Maybe she should pray aloud if she wanted the old gods to 
hear. Maybe she should pray longer. Sometimes her

father had prayed a long time, she remembered. But the old gods had never 
helped him. Remembering that made her angry. “You should have saved him,” she 
scolded the tree. “He prayed to you all the time. I don’t care if you help me 
or not. I don’t think you could even if you wanted to.”
“Gods are not mocked, girl.”
The voice startled her. She leapt to her feet and drew her wooden sword. Jaqen 
H’ghar stood so still in the darkness that he seemed one of the trees. “A man 
comes to hear a name. One and two and then comes three. A man would have 
done.”
Arya lowered the splintery point toward the ground. “How did you know I was 
here?”
“A man sees. A man hears. A man knows.”
She regarded him suspiciously. Had the gods sent him? “How’d you make the dog 
kill Weese? Did you call Rorge and Biter up from hell? Is Jaqen H’ghar your 
true name?”
“Some men have many names. Weasel. Arry. Arya.”
She backed away from him, until she was pressed against the heart tree. “Did 
Gendry tell?”
“A man knows,” he said again. “My lady of Stark.”
Maybe the gods had sent him in answer to her prayers. “I need you to 
help me get those men out of the dungeons. That Glover and those others, all of 
them. We have to kill the guards and open the cell 
somehow—”
“A girl forgets,” he said quietly. “Two she has had, three were owed. If a 
guard must die, she needs only speak his name.”“But one guard won’t be enough, we need to kill them all to 
open the cell.” Arya bit her lip hard to stop from crying. “I want you to 
save the northmen like I saved you.”
He looked down at her pitilessly. “Three lives were snatched from a god. Three 
lives must be repaid. The gods are not mocked.” His voice was silk and 
steel.
“I never mocked.” She thought for a moment. “The 
name . . . can I name anyone? And you’ll kill 
him?”
Jaqen H’ghar inclined his head. “A man has said.”
“Anyone?” she repeated. “A man, a woman, a little baby, or Lord 
Tywin, or the High Septon, or your father?”
“A man’s sire is long dead, but did he live, and did you know his name, he 
would die at your command.”
“Swear it,” Arya said. “Swear it by the gods.”
“By all the gods of sea and air, and even him of fire, I swear it.” He placed 
a hand in the mouth of the weirwood. “By the seven new gods and the old gods 
beyond count, I swear it.”
He has sworn. “Even if I named the 
king . . .”
“Speak the name, and death will come. On the morrow, at the turn of the moon, 
a year from this day, it will come. A man does not fly like a bird, but one 
foot moves and then another and one day a man is there, and a king dies.” He 
knelt beside her, so they were face-to-face. “A girl whispers if she fears to 
speak aloud. Whisper it now. Is it Joffrey?”
Arya put her lips to his ear. “It’s Jaqen H’ghar.”
Even in the burning barn, with walls of flame towering all

around and him in chains, he had not seemed so distraught as he did now. “A 
girl . . . she makes a jest.”
“You swore. The gods heard you swear.”
“The gods did hear.” There was a knife in his hand suddenly, its blade thin 
as her little finger. Whether it was meant for her or him, Arya could not say. 
“A girl will weep. A girl will lose her only friend.”
“You’re not my friend. A friend would help me.” She stepped away 
from him, balanced on the balls of her feet in case he threw his knife. “I’d 
never kill a friend.”
Jaqen’s smile came and went. “A girl might . . . name another 
name then, if a friend did help?”
“A girl might,” she said. “If a friend did help.”
The knife vanished. “Come.”
“Now?” She had never thought he would act so quickly.
“A man hears the whisper of sand in a glass. A man will not sleep until a girl 
unsays a certain name. Now, evil child.”
I’m not an evil child, she thought, I am a direwolf, and the 
ghost in Harrenhal. She put her broomstick back in its hiding place and 
followed him from the godswood.
Despite the hour, Harrenhal stirred with fitful life. Vargo Hoat’s arrival had 
thrown off all the routines. Ox carts, oxen, and horses had all vanished from 
the yard, but the bear cage was still there. It had been hung from the arched 
span of the bridge that divided the outer and middle wards, suspended on heavy 
chains, a few feet off the ground. A ring of torches bathed the

area in light. Some of the boys from the stables were tossing stones to make 
the bear roar and grumble. Across the ward, light spilled through the door of 
the Barracks Hall, accompanied by the clatter of tankards and men calling for 
more wine. A dozen voices took up a song in a guttural tongue strange to Arya’s 
ears.
They’re drinking and eating before they sleep, she realized. 
Pinkeye would have sent to wake me, to help with the serving. He’ll know 
I’m not abed. But likely he was busy pouring for the Brave Companions and 
those of Ser Amory’s garrison who had joined them. The noise they were making 
would be a good distraction.
“The hungry gods will feast on blood tonight, if a man would do this thing,” 
Jaqen said. “Sweet girl, kind and gentle. Unsay one name and say another and 
cast this mad dream aside.”
“I won’t.”
“Just so.” He seemed resigned. “The thing will be done, but a girl must 
obey. A man has no time for talk.”
“A girl will obey,” Arya said. “What should I do?”
“A hundred men are hungry, they must be fed, the lord commands hot broth. A 
girl must run to the kitchens and tell her pie boy.”
“Broth,” she repeated. “Where will you be?”
“A girl will help make broth, and wait in the kitchens until a man comes for 
her. Go. Run.”
Hot Pie was pulling his loaves from the ovens when she burst into the kitchen, 
but he was no longer alone. They’d woken the cooks to feed Vargo Hoat and his 
Bloody Mummers. Serving men were

carrying off baskets of Hot Pie’s bread and tarts, the chief cook was carving 
cold slices off a ham, spit boys were turning rabbits while the pot girls 
basted them with honey, women were chopping onions and carrots. “What do you 
want, Weasel?” the chief cook asked when he saw her.
“Broth,” she announced. “My lord wants broth.”
He jerked his carving knife at the black iron kettles hung over the flames. 
“What do you think that is? Though I’d soon as piss in it as serve it to that 
goat. Can’t even let a man have a night’s sleep.” He spat. “Well, never you 
mind, run back and tell him a kettle can’t be hurried.”
“I’m to wait here until it’s done.”
“Then stay out of the way. Or better yet, make yourself of use. Run to the 
buttery; his goatship will be wanting butter and cheese. Wake up Pia and tell 
her she’d best be nimble for once, if she wants to keep both of her 
feet.”
She ran as fast as she could. Pia was awake in the loft, moaning under one of 
the Mummers, but she slipped back into her clothes quick enough when she heard 
Arya shout. She filled six baskets with crocks of butter and big wedges of 
stinky cheese wrapped in cloth. “Here, help me with these,” she told 
Arya.
“I can’t. But you better hurry or Vargo Hoat will chop off your foot.” She 
darted off before Pia could grab her. On the way back, she wondered why none of 
the captives had their hands or feet chopped off. Maybe Vargo Hoat was afraid 
to make Robb angry. Though he didn’t seem the sort to be afraid of 
anyone.Hot Pie was stirring the kettles with a long wooden spoon when Arya 
returned to the kitchens. She grabbed up a second spoon and started to help. 
For a moment she thought maybe she should tell him, but then she remembered the 
village and decided not to. He’d only yield again.
Then she heard the ugly sound of Rorge’s voice. “Cook,” he shouted. 
“We’ll take your bloody broth.” Arya let go of the spoon in dismay. I 
never told him to bring them. Rorge wore his iron helmet, with the nasal 
that half hid his missing nose. Jaqen and Biter followed him into the 
kitchen.
“The bloody broth isn’t bloody ready yet,” the cook said. “It needs to 
simmer. We only now put in the onions and—”
“Shut your hole, or I’ll shove a spit up your ass and we’ll baste you for a 
turn or two. I said broth and I said now.”
Hissing, Biter grabbed a handful of half-charred rabbit right off the spit, and 
tore into it with his pointed teeth while honey dripped between his 
fingers.
The cook was beaten. “Take your bloody broth, then, but if the goat asks why 
it tastes so thin, you tell him.”
Biter licked the grease and honey off his fingers as Jaqen H’ghar donned a pair 
of heavy padded mitts. He gave a second pair to Arya. “A weasel will help.” 
The broth was boiling hot, and the kettles were heavy. Arya and Jaqen wrestled 
one between them, Rorge carried one by himself, and Biter grabbed two more, 
hissing in pain when the handles burned his hands. Even so, he did not drop 
them. They lugged the kettles out of the kitchens and across

the ward. Two guards had been posted at the door of the Widow’s Tower. “What’s 
this?” one said to Rorge.
“A pot of boiling piss, want some?”
Jaqen smiled disarmingly. “A prisoner must eat too.”
“No one said nothing about—”
Arya cut him off. “It’s for them, not you.”
The second guard waved them past. “Bring it down, then.”
Inside the door a winding stair led down to the dungeons. Rorge led the way, 
with Jaqen and Arya bringing up the rear. “A girl will stay out of the way,” 
he told her.
The steps opened onto a dank stone vault, long, gloomy, and windowless. A few 
torches burned in sconces at the near end where a group of Ser Amory’s guards 
sat around a scarred wooden table, talking and playing at tiles. Heavy iron 
bars separated them from where the captives were crowded together in the dark. 
The smell of the broth brought many up to the bars.
Arya counted eight guards. They smelled the broth as well. “There’s the 
ugliest serving wench I ever saw,” their captain said to Rorge. “What’s in 
the kettle?”
“Your cock and balls. You want to eat or not?”
One of the guards had been pacing, one standing near the bars, a third sitting 
on the floor with his back to the wall, but the prospect of food drew all of 
them to the table.
“About bloody time they fed us.”
“That onions I smell?”
“So where’s the bread?”“Fuck, we need bowls, cups, spoons—”
“No you don’t.” Rorge heaved the scalding hot broth across the table, full in 
their faces. Jaqen H’ghar did the same. Biter threw his kettles too, swinging 
them underarm so they spun across the dungeon, raining soup. One caught the 
captain in the temple as he tried to rise. He went down like a sack of sand and 
lay still. The rest were screaming in agony, praying, or trying to crawl 
off.
Arya pressed back against the wall as Rorge began to cut throats. Biter 
preferred to grab the men behind the head and under the chin and crack their 
necks with a single twist of his huge pale hands. Only one of the guards 
managed to get a blade out. Jaqen danced away from his slash, drew his own 
sword, drove the man back into a corner with a flurry of blows, and killed him 
with a thrust to the heart. The Lorathi brought the blade to Arya still red 
with heart’s blood and wiped it clean on the front of her shift. “A girl 
should be bloody too. This is her work.”
The key to the cell hung from a hook on the wall above the table. Rorge took it 
down and opened the door. The first man through was the lord with the mailed 
fist on his surcoat. “Well done,” he said. “I am Robett Glover.”
“My lord.” Jaqen gave him a bow.
Once freed, the captives stripped the dead guards of their weapons and darted 
up the steps with steel in hand. Their fellows crowded after them, bare-handed. 
They went swiftly, and with scarcely a word. None of them seemed quite so badly 
wounded as they had when Vargo Hoat had marched them through the gates of

Harrenhal. “This of the soup, that was clever,” the man Glover was saying. 
“I did not expect that. Was it Lord Hoat’s idea?”
Rorge began to laugh. He laughed so hard that snot flew out the hole where his 
nose had been. Biter sat on top of one of the dead men, holding a limp hand as 
he gnawed at the fingers. Bones cracked between his teeth.
“Who are you men?” A crease appeared between Robett Glover’s brows. “You 
were not with Hoat when he came to Lord Bolton’s encampment. Are you of the 
Brave Companions?”
Rorge wiped the snot off his chin with the back of his hand. “We are 
now.”
“This man has the honor to be Jaqen H’ghar, once of the Free City of Lorath. 
This man’s discourteous companions are named Rorge and Biter. A lord will know 
which is Biter.” He waved a hand toward Arya. “And 
here—”
“I’m Weasel,” she blurted, before he could tell who she really was. 
She did not want her name said here, where Rorge might hear, and Biter, and all 
these others she did not know.
She saw Glover dismiss her. “Very well,” he said. “Let’s make an end to this 
bloody business.”
When they climbed back up the winding stair, they found the door guards lying 
in pools of their own blood. Northmen were running across the ward. Arya heard 
shouts. The door of Barracks Hall burst open and a wounded man staggered out 
screaming. Three others ran after him and silenced him with spear and sword. 
There was fighting around the gatehouse as well. Rorge and Biter rushed

off with Glover, but Jaqen H’ghar knelt beside Arya. “A girl does not 
understand?”
“Yes I do,” she said, though she didn’t, not truly.
The Lorathi must have seen it on her face. “A goat has no loyalty. Soon a wolf 
banner is raised here, I think. But first a man would hear a certain name 
unsaid.”
“I take back the name.” Arya chewed her lip. “Do I still have a third 
death?”
“A girl is greedy.” Jaqen touched one of the dead guards and showed her his 
bloody fingers. “Here is three and there is four and eight more lie dead 
below. The debt is paid.”
“The debt is paid,” Arya agreed reluctantly. She felt a little sad. Now she 
was just a mouse again.
“A god has his due. And now a man must die.” A strange smile touched the lips 
of Jaqen H’ghar.
“Die?” she said, confused. What did he mean? “But I unsaid the 
name. You don’t need to die now.”
“I do. My time is done.” Jaqen passed a hand down his face from forehead to 
chin, and where it went he changed. His cheeks grew fuller, his eyes 
closer; his nose hooked, a scar appeared on his right cheek where no scar had 
been before. And when he shook his head, his long straight hair, half red and 
half white, dissolved away to reveal a cap of tight black curls.
Arya’s mouth hung open. “Who are you?” she whispered, too 
astonished to be afraid. “How did you do that? Was it 
hard?”
He grinned, revealing a shiny gold tooth. “No harder than

taking a new name, if you know the way.”
“Show me,” she blurted. “I want to do it too.”
“If you would learn, you must come with me.”
Arya grew hesitant. “Where?”
“Far and away, across the narrow sea.”
“I can’t. I have to go home. To Winterfell.”
“Then we must part,” he said, “for I have duties too.” He lifted her hand 
and pressed a small coin into her palm. “Here.”
“What is it?”
“A coin of great value.”
Arya bit it. It was so hard it could only be iron. “Is it worth enough to buy 
a horse?”
“It is not meant for the buying of horses.”
“Then what good is it?”
“As well ask what good is life, what good is death? If the day comes when you 
would find me again, give that coin to any man from Braavos, and say these 
words to him—valar morghulis.”
“Valar morghulis,” Arya repeated. It wasn’t hard. Her fingers 
closed tight over the coin. Across the yard, she could hear men dying. “Please 
don’t go, Jaqen.”
“Jaqen is as dead as Arry,” he said sadly, “and I have promises to keep. 
Valar morghulis, Arya Stark. Say it again.”
“Valar morghulis,” she said once more, and the stranger in Jaqen’s 
clothes bowed to her and stalked off through the darkness, cloak swirling. She 
was alone with the dead men. They deserved to die, Arya told herself, 
remembering all those Ser Amory Lorch

had killed at the holdfast by the lake.
The cellars under Kingspyre were empty when she returned to her bed of straw. 
She whispered her names to her pillow, and when she was done she added, 
“Valar morghulis,” in a small soft voice, wondering what it 
meant.
Come dawn, Pinkeye and the others were back, all but one boy who’d been killed 
in the fighting for no reason that anyone could say. Pinkeye went up alone to 
see how matters stood by light of day, complaining all the while that his old 
bones could not abide steps. When he returned, he told them that Harrenhal had 
been taken. “Them Bloody Mummers killed some of Ser Amory’s lot in their beds, 
and the rest at table after they were good and drunk. The new lord will be here 
before the day’s out, with his whole host. He’s from the wild north up where 
that Wall is, and they say he’s a hard one. This lord or that lord, there’s 
still work to be done. Any foolery and I’ll whip the skin off your back.” He 
looked at Arya when he said that, but never said a word to her about where she 
had been the night before.
All morning she watched the Bloody Mummers strip the dead of their valuables 
and drag the corpses to the Flowstone Yard, where a pyre was laid to dispose of 
them. Shagwell the Fool hacked the heads off two dead knights and pranced about 
the castle swinging them by the hair and making them talk. “What did you die 
of?” one head asked. “Hot weasel soup,” replied the second.
Arya was set to mopping up dried blood. No one said a word to her beyond the 
usual, but every so often she would notice

people looking at her strangely. Robett Glover and the other men they’d freed 
must have talked about what had happened down in the dungeon, and then Shagwell 
and his stupid talking heads started in about the weasel soup. She would have 
told him to shut up, but she was scared to. The fool was half-mad, and she’d 
heard that he’d once killed a man for not laughing at one of his japes. He 
better shut his mouth or I’ll put him on my list with the rest, she 
thought as she scrubbed at a reddish-brown stain.
It was almost evenfall when the new master of Harrenhal arrived. He had a plain 
face, beardless and ordinary, notable only for his queer pale eyes. Neither 
plump, thin, nor muscular, he wore black ringmail and a spotted pink cloak. The 
sigil on his banner looked like a man dipped in blood. “On your knees for the 
Lord of the Dreadfort!” shouted his squire, a boy no older than Arya, and 
Harrenhal knelt.
Vargo Hoat came forward. “My lord, Harrenhal ith yourth.”
The lord gave answer, but too softly for Arya to hear. Robett Glover and Ser 
Aenys Frey, freshly bathed and clad in clean new doublets and cloaks, came up 
to join them. After some brief talk, Ser Aenys led them over to Rorge and 
Biter. Arya was surprised to see them still here; somehow she would have 
expected them to vanish when Jaqen did. Arya heard the harsh sound of Rorge’s 
voice, but not what he was saying. Then Shagwell pounced on her, dragging her 
out across the yard. “My lord, my lord,” he sang, tugging at her wrist, 
“here’s the weasel who made the soup!”
“Let go,” Arya said, wriggling out of his grasp.The lord regarded her. Only his eyes moved; they were very pale, the 
color of ice. “How old are you, child?”
She had to think for a moment to remember. “Ten.”
“Ten, my lord,” he reminded her. “Are you fond of 
animals?”
“Some kinds. My lord.”
A thin smile twitched across his lips. “But not lions, it would seem. Nor 
manticores.”
She did not know what to say to that, so she said nothing.
“They tell me you are called Weasel. That will not serve. What name did your 
mother give you?”
She bit her lip, groping for another name. Lommy had called her Lumpyhead, 
Sansa used Horseface, and her father’s men once dubbed her Arya Underfoot, but 
she did not think any of those were the sort of name he wanted.
“Nymeria,” she said. “Only she called me Nan for short.”
“You will call me my lord when you speak to me, Nan,” the lord said 
mildly. “You are too young to be a Brave Companion, I think, and of the wrong 
sex. Are you afraid of leeches, child?”
“They’re only leeches. My lord.”
“My squire could take a lesson from you, it would seem. Frequent leechings are 
the secret of a long life. A man must purge himself of bad blood. You will do, 
I think. For so long as I remain at Harrenhal, Nan, you shall be my cupbearer, 
and serve me at table and in chambers.”
This time she knew better than to say that she’d sooner work in the stables. 
“Yes, your lord. I mean, my lord.”The lord waved a hand. “Make her presentable,” he said to no one in 
particular, “and make certain she knows how to pour wine without spilling 
it.” Turning away, he lifted a hand and said, “Lord Hoat, see to those 
banners above the gatehouse.”
Four Brave Companions climbed to the ramparts and hauled down the lion of 
Lannister and Ser Amory’s own black manticore. In their place they raised the 
flayed man of the Dreadfort and the direwolf of Stark. And that evening, a page 
named Nan poured wine for Roose Bolton and Vargo Hoat as they stood on the 
gallery, watching the Brave Companions parade Ser Amory Lorch naked through the 
middle ward. Ser Amory pleaded and sobbed and clung to the legs of his captors, 
until Rorge pulled him loose, and Shagwell kicked him down into the bear 
pit.
The bear is all in black, Arya thought. Like Yoren. She 
filled Roose Bolton’s cup, and did not spill a drop.

The heads had been dipped in tar to slow the rot. Every morning when Arya 
went to the well to draw fresh water for Roose Bolton’s basin, she had to pass 
beneath them. They faced outward, so she never saw their faces, but she liked 
to pretend that one of them was Joffrey’s. She tried to picture how his pretty 
face would look dipped in tar. If I was a crow I could fly down and peck 
off his stupid fat pouty lips.The heads never lacked for attendants. The carrion crows wheeled about 
the gatehouse in raucous unkindness and quarreled upon the ramparts over every 
eye, screaming and cawing at each other and taking to the air whenever a sentry 
passed along the battlements. Sometimes the maester’s ravens joined the feast 
as well, flapping down from the rookery on wide black wings. When the ravens 
came the crows would scatter, only to return the moment the larger birds were 
gone.
Do the ravens remember Maester Tothmure? Arya wondered. Are they 
sad for him? When they quork at him, do they wonder why he doesn’t answer? 
Perhaps the dead could speak to them in some secret tongue the living could not 
hear.
Tothmure had been sent to the axe for dispatching birds to Casterly Rock and 
King’s Landing the night Harrenhal had fallen, Lucan the armorer for making 
weapons for the Lannisters, Goodwife

Harra for telling Lady Whent’s household to serve them, the steward for giving 
Lord Tywin the keys to the treasure vault. The cook was spared (some said 
because he’d made the weasel soup), but stocks were hammered together for 
pretty Pia and the other women who’d shared their favors with Lannister 
soldiers. Stripped and shaved, they were left in the middle ward beside the 
bear pit, free for the use of any man who wanted them.
Three Frey men-at-arms were using them that morning as Arya went to the well. 
She tried not to look, but she could hear the men laughing. The pail was very 
heavy once full. She was turning to bring it back to Kingspyre when Goodwife 
Amabel seized her arm. The water went sloshing over the side onto Amabel’s 
legs. “You did that on purpose,” the woman screeched.
“What do you want?” Arya squirmed in her grasp. Amabel had been half-crazed 
since they’d cut Harra’s head off.
“See there?” Amabel pointed across the yard at Pia. “When this northman 
falls you’ll be where she is.”
“Let me go.” She tried to wrench free, but Amabel only tightened 
her fingers.
“He will fall too, Harrenhal pulls them all down in the end. Lord 
Tywin’s won now, he’ll be marching back with all his power, and then it will be 
his turn to punish the disloyal. And don’t think he won’t know what you did!” 
The old woman laughed. “I may have a turn at you myself. Harra had an old 
broom, I’ll save it for you. The handle’s cracked and 
splintery—”
Arya swung the bucket. The weight of the water made it

turn in her hands, so she didn’t smash Amabel’s head in as she wanted, but 
the woman let go of her anyway when the water came out and drenched her. 
“Don’t ever touch me,” Arya shouted, “or I’ll kill you. 
You get away.”
Sopping, Goodwife Amabel jabbed a thin finger at the flayed man on the front of 
Arya’s tunic. “You think you’re safe with that little bloody man on your teat, 
but you’re not! The Lannisters are coming! See what happens when they get 
here.”
Three-quarters of the water had splashed out on the ground, so Arya had to 
return to the well. If I told Lord Bolton what she said, her head would be 
up next to Harra’s before it got dark, she thought as she drew up the 
bucket again. She wouldn’t, though.
Once, when there had been only half as many heads, Gendry had caught Arya 
looking at them. “Admiring your work?” he asked.
He was angry because he’d liked Lucan, she knew, but it still wasn’t fair. 
“It’s Steelshanks Walton’s work,” she said defensively. “And the Mummers, 
and Lord Bolton.”
“And who gave us all them? You and your weasel soup.”
Arya punched his arm. “It was just hot broth. You hated Ser Amory 
too.”
“I hate this lot worse. Ser Amory was fighting for his lord, but the Mummers 
are sellswords and turncloaks. Half of them can’t even speak the Common Tongue. 
Septon Utt likes little boys, Qyburn does black magic, and your friend Biter 
eats people.”
The worst thing was, she couldn’t even say he was wrong. The Brave Companions 
did most of the foraging for Harrenhal, and

Roose Bolton had given them the task of rooting out Lannisters. Vargo Hoat had 
divided them into four bands, to visit as many villages as possible. He led the 
largest group himself, and gave the others to his most trusted captains. She 
had heard Rorge laughing over Lord Vargo’s way of finding traitors. All he did 
was return to places he had visited before under Lord Tywin’s banner and seize 
those who had helped him. Many had been bought with Lannister silver, so the 
Mummers often returned with bags of coin as well as baskets of heads. “A 
riddle!” Shagwell would shout gleefully. “If Lord Bolton’s goat eats the men 
who fed Lord Lannister’s goat, how many goats are there?”
“One,” Arya said when he asked her.
“Now there’s a weasel clever as a goat!” the fool tittered.
Rorge and Biter were as bad as the others. Whenever Lord Bolton took a meal 
with the garrison, Arya would see them there among the rest. Biter gave off a 
stench like bad cheese, so the Brave Companions made him sit down near the foot 
of the table where he could grunt and hiss to himself and tear his meat apart 
with fingers and teeth. He would sniff at Arya when she passed, but 
it was Rorge who scared her most. He sat up near Faithful Urswyck, but she 
could feel his eyes crawling over her as she went about her duties.
Sometimes she wished she had gone off across the narrow sea with Jaqen H’ghar. 
She still had the stupid coin he’d given her, a piece of iron no larger than a 
penny and rusted along the rim. One side had writing on it, queer words she 
could not read. The

other showed a man’s head, but so worn that all his features had rubbed off. 
He said it was of great value, but that was probably a lie too, like his 
name and even his face. That made her so angry that she threw the coin 
away, but after an hour she got to feeling bad and went and found it again, 
even though it wasn’t worth anything.
She was thinking about the coin as she crossed the Flowstone Yard, struggling 
with the weight of the water in her pail. “Nan,” a voice called out. “Put 
down that pail and come help me.”
Elmar Frey was no older than she was, and short for his age besides. He had 
been rolling a barrel of sand across the uneven stone, and was red-faced from 
exertion. Arya went to help him. Together they pushed the barrel all the way to 
the wall and back again, then stood it upright. She could hear the sand 
shifting around inside as Elmar pried open the lid and pulled out a chainmail 
hauberk. “Do you think it’s clean enough?” As Roose Bolton’s squire, it was 
his task to keep his mail shiny bright.
“You need to shake out the sand. There’s still spots of rust. See?” She 
pointed. “You’d best do it again.”
“You do it.” Elmar could be friendly when he needed help, but afterward he 
would always remember that he was a squire and she was only a serving girl. He 
liked to boast how he was the son of the Lord of the Crossing, not a nephew or 
a bastard or a grandson but a trueborn son, and on account of that he 
was going to marry a princess.
Arya didn’t care about his precious princess, and didn’t

like him giving her commands. “I have to bring m’lord water for his basin. 
He’s in his bedchamber being leeched. Not the regular black leeches but the big 
pale ones.”
Elmar’s eyes got as big as boiled eggs. Leeches terrified him, especially the 
big pale ones that looked like jelly until they filled up with blood. “I 
forgot, you’re too skinny to push such a heavy barrel.”
“I forgot, you’re stupid.” Arya picked up the pail. “Maybe you should get 
leeched too. There’s leeches in the Neck as big as pigs.” She left him there 
with his barrel.
The lord’s bedchamber was crowded when she entered. Qyburn was in attendance, 
and dour Walton in his mail shirt and greaves, plus a dozen Freys, all 
brothers, half brothers, and cousins. Roose Bolton lay abed, naked. Leeches 
clung to the inside of his arms and legs and dotted his pallid chest, long 
translucent things that turned a glistening pink as they fed. Bolton paid them 
no more mind than he did Arya.
“We must not allow Lord Tywin to trap us here at Harrenhal,” Ser Aenys Frey 
was saying as Arya filled the washbasin. A grey stooped giant of a man with 
watery red eyes and huge gnarled hands, Ser Aenys had brought fifteen hundred 
Frey swords south to Harrenhal, yet it often seemed as if he were helpless to 
command even his own brothers. “The castle is so large it requires an army to 
hold it, and once surrounded we cannot feed an army. Nor can we hope 
to lay in sufficient supplies. The country is ash, the villages given over to 
wolves, the harvest burnt or stolen.

Autumn is on us, yet there is no food in store and none being planted. We live 
on forage, and if the Lannisters deny that to us, we will be down to rats and 
shoe leather in a moon’s turn.”
“I do not mean to be besieged here.” Roose Bolton’s voice was so soft that 
men had to strain to hear it, so his chambers were always strangely 
hushed.
“What, then?” demanded Ser Jared Frey, who was lean, balding, and pockmarked. 
“Is Edmure Tully so drunk on his victory that he thinks to give Lord Tywin 
battle in the open field?”
If he does he’ll beat them, Arya thought. He’ll beat them as he 
did on the Red Fork, you’ll see. Unnoticed, she went to stand by 
Qyburn.
“Lord Tywin is many leagues from here,” Bolton said calmly. “He has many 
matters yet to settle at King’s Landing. He will not march on Harrenhal for 
some time.”
Ser Aenys shook his head stubbornly. “You do not know the Lannisters as we do, 
my lord. King Stannis thought that Lord Tywin was a thousand leagues away as 
well, and it undid him.”
The pale man in the bed smiled faintly as the leeches nursed of his blood. “I 
am not a man to be undone, ser.”
“Even if Riverrun marshals all its strength and the Young Wolf wins back from 
the west, how can we hope to match the numbers Lord Tywin can send against us? 
When he comes, he will come with far more power than he commanded on the Green 
Fork. Highgarden has joined itself to Joffrey’s cause, I remind 
you!”
“I had not forgotten.”“I have been Lord Tywin’s captive once,” said Ser Hosteen, a husky man 
with a square face who was said to be the strongest of the Freys. “I have no 
wish to enjoy Lannister hospitality again.”
Ser Harys Haigh, who was a Frey on his mother’s side, nodded vigorously. “If 
Lord Tywin could defeat a seasoned man like Stannis Baratheon, what chance will 
our boy king have against him?” He looked round to his brothers and cousins 
for support, and several of them muttered agreement.
“Someone must have the courage to say it,” Ser Hosteen said. “The war is 
lost. King Robb must be made to see that.”
Roose Bolton studied him with pale eyes. “His Grace has defeated the 
Lannisters every time he has faced them in battle.”
“He has lost the north,” insisted Hosteen Frey. “He has lost 
Winterfell! His brothers are dead . . .”
For a moment Arya forgot to breathe. Dead? Bran and Rickon, dead? What 
does he mean? What does he mean about Winterfell, Joffrey could never take 
Winterfell, never, Robb would never let him. Then she remembered that Robb 
was not at Winterfell. He was away in the west, and Bran was crippled, and 
Rickon only four. It took all her strength to remain still and silent, the way 
Syrio Forel had taught her, to stand there like a stick of furniture. She felt 
tears gathering in her eyes, and willed them away. It’s not true, it can’t 
be true, it’s just some Lannister lie.
“Had Stannis won, all might have been different,” Ronel Rivers said 
wistfully. He was one of Lord Walder’s bastards.“Stannis lost,” Ser Hosteen said bluntly. “Wishing it were otherwise 
will not make it so. King Robb must make his peace with the Lannisters. He must 
put off his crown and bend the knee, little as he may like it.”
“And who will tell him so?” Roose Bolton smiled. “It is a fine thing to have 
so many valiant brothers in such troubled times. I shall think on all you’ve 
said.”
His smile was dismissal. The Freys made their courtesies and shuffled out, 
leaving only Qyburn, Steelshanks Walton, and Arya. Lord Bolton beckoned her 
closer. “I am bled sufficiently. Nan, you may remove the leeches.”
“At once, my lord.” It was best never to make Roose Bolton ask twice. Arya 
wanted to ask him what Ser Hosteen had meant about Winterfell, but she dared 
not. I’ll ask Elmar, she thought. Elmar will tell me. The 
leeches wriggled slowly between her fingers as she plucked them carefully from 
the lord’s body, their pale bodies moist to the touch and distended with blood. 
They’re only leeches, she reminded herself. If I closed my hand, 
they’d squish between my fingers.
“There is a letter from your lady wife.” Qyburn pulled a roll of parchment 
from his sleeve. Though he wore maester’s robes, there was no chain about his 
neck; it was whispered that he had lost it for dabbling in 
necromancy.
“You may read it,” Bolton said.
The Lady Walda wrote from the Twins almost every day, but all the letters were 
the same. “I pray for you morn, noon, and

night, my sweet lord,” she wrote, “and count the days until you share my bed 
again. Return to me soon, and I will give you many trueborn sons to take the 
place of your dear Domeric and rule the Dreadfort after you.” Arya pictured a 
plump pink baby in a cradle, covered with plump pink leeches.
She brought Lord Bolton a damp washcloth to wipe down his soft hairless body. 
“I will send a letter of my own,” he told the onetime maester.
“To the Lady Walda?”
“To Ser Helman Tallhart.”
A rider from Ser Helman had come two days past. Tallhart men had taken the 
castle of the Darrys, accepting the surrender of its Lannister garrison after a 
brief siege.
“Tell him to put the captives to the sword and the castle to the torch, by 
command of the king. Then he is to join forces with Robett Glover and strike 
east toward Duskendale. Those are rich lands, and hardly touched by the 
fighting. It is time they had a taste. Glover has lost a castle, and Tallhart a 
son. Let them take their vengeance on Duskendale.”
“I shall prepare the message for your seal, my lord.”
Arya was glad to hear that the castle of the Darrys would be burned. That was 
where they’d brought her when she’d been caught after her fight with Joffrey, 
and where the queen had made her father kill Sansa’s wolf. It deserves to 
burn. She wished that Robett Glover and Ser Helman Tallhart would come 
back to Harrenhal, though; they had marched too quickly, before she’d been

able to decide whether to trust them with her secret.
“I will hunt today,” Roose Bolton announced as Qyburn helped him into a 
quilted jerkin.
“Is it safe, my lord?” Qyburn asked. “Only three days past, Septon Utt’s men 
were attacked by wolves. They came right into his camp, not five yards from the 
fire, and killed two horses.”
“It is wolves I mean to hunt. I can scarcely sleep at night for the howling.” 
Bolton buckled on his belt, adjusting the hang of sword and dagger. “It’s said 
that direwolves once roamed the north in great packs of a hundred or more, and 
feared neither man nor mammoth, but that was long ago and in another land. It 
is queer to see the common wolves of the south so bold.”
“Terrible times breed terrible things, my lord.”
Bolton showed his teeth in something that might have been a smile. “Are these 
times so terrible, Maester?”
“Summer is gone and there are four kings in the realm.”
“One king may be terrible, but four?” He shrugged. “Nan, my fur cloak.” She 
brought it to him. “My chambers will be clean and orderly upon my return,” he 
told her as she fastened it. “And tend to Lady Walda’s letter.”
“As you say, my lord.”
The lord and maester swept from the room, giving her not so much as a backward 
glance. When they were gone, Arya took the letter and carried it to the hearth, 
stirring the logs with a poker to wake the flames anew. She watched the 
parchment twist, blacken, and flare up. If the Lannisters hurt Bran and 
Rickon,

Robb will kill them every one. He’ll never bend the knee, never, never, never. 
He’s not afraid of any of them. Curls of ash floated up the chimney. Arya 
squatted beside the fire, watching them rise through a veil of hot tears. 
If Winterfell is truly gone, is this my home now? Am I still Arya, or only 
Nan the serving girl, for forever and forever and forever?
She spent the next few hours tending to the lord’s chambers. She swept out the 
old rushes and scattered fresh sweet-smelling ones, laid a fresh fire in the 
hearth, changed the linens and fluffed the featherbed, emptied the chamber pots 
down the privy shaft and scrubbed them out, carried an armload of soiled 
clothing to the washerwomen, and brought up a bowl of crisp autumn pears from 
the kitchen. When she was done with the bedchamber, she went down half a flight 
of stairs to do the same in the great solar, a spare drafty room as large as 
the halls of many a smaller castle. The candles were down to stubs, so Arya 
changed them out. Under the windows was a huge oaken table where the lord wrote 
his letters. She stacked the books, changed the candles, put the quills and 
inks and sealing wax in order.
A large ragged sheepskin was tossed across the papers. Arya had started to roll 
it up when the colors caught her eye: the blue of lakes and rivers, the red 
dots where castles and cities could be found, the green of woods. She spread it 
out instead. THE LANDS OF THE TRIDENT, said the ornate script beneath 
the map. The drawing showed everything from the Neck to the Blackwater Rush. 
There’s Harrenhal at the top of the big lake, she realized, but

where’s Riverrun? Then she saw. It’s not so 
far . . .
The afternoon was still young by the time she was done, so Arya took herself 
off to the godswood. Her duties were lighter as Lord Bolton’s cupbearer than 
they had been under Weese or even Pinkeye, though they required dressing like a 
page and washing more than she liked. The hunt would not return for hours, so 
she had a little time for her needlework.
She slashed at birch leaves till the splintery point of the broken broomstick 
was green and sticky. “Ser Gregor,” she breathed. “Dunsen, Polliver, Raff 
the Sweetling.” She spun and leapt and balanced on the balls of her feet, 
darting this way and that, knocking pinecones flying. “The Tickler,” she 
called out one time, “the Hound,” the next. “Ser Ilyn, Ser Meryn, Queen 
Cersei.” The bole of an oak loomed before her, and she lunged to drive her 
point through it, grunting “Joffrey, Joffrey, Joffrey.” Her arms and legs 
were dappled by sunlight and the shadows of leaves. A sheen of sweat covered 
her skin by the time she paused. The heel of her right foot was bloody where
she’d skinned it, so she stood one-legged before the heart tree and raised her 
sword in salute. “Valar morghulis,” she told the old gods of the 
north. She liked how the words sounded when she said them.
As Arya crossed the yard to the bathhouse, she spied a raven circling down 
toward the rookery, and wondered where it had come from and what message it 
carried. Might be it’s from Robb, come to say it wasn’t true about Bran 
and Rickon. She chewed on her lip, hoping. If I had wings I could fly 
back to Winterfell and

see for myself. And if it was true, I’d just fly away, fly up past the moon and 
the shining stars, and see all the things in Old Nan’s stories, dragons and sea 
monsters and the Titan of Braavos, and maybe I wouldn’t ever fly back unless I 
wanted to.
The hunting party returned near evenfall with nine dead wolves. Seven were 
adults, big grey-brown beasts, savage and powerful, their mouths drawn back 
over long yellow teeth by their dying snarls. But the other two had only been 
pups. Lord Bolton gave orders for the skins to be sewn into a blanket for his 
bed. “Cubs still have that soft fur, my lord,” one of his men pointed out. 
“Make you a nice warm pair of gloves.”
Bolton glanced up at the banners waving above the gatehouse towers. “As the 
Starks are wont to remind us, winter is coming. Have it done.” When he saw 
Arya looking on, he said, “Nan, I’ll want a flagon of hot spice wine, I took a 
chill in the woods. See that it doesn’t get cold. I’m of a mind to sup alone. 
Barley bread, butter, and boar.”
“At once, my lord.” That was always the best thing to say.
Hot Pie was making oatcakes when she entered the kitchen. Three other cooks 
were boning fish, while a spit boy turned a boar over the flames. “My lord 
wants his supper, and hot spice wine to wash it down,” Arya announced, “and 
he doesn’t want it cold.” One of the cooks washed his hands, took out a 
kettle, and filled it with a heavy, sweet red. Hot Pie was told to crumble in 
the spices as the wine heated. Arya went to help.
“I can do it,” he said sullenly. “I don’t need you to show me how to spice 
wine.”He hates me too, or else he’s scared of me. She backed away, 
more sad than angry. When the food was ready, the cooks covered it with a 
silver cover and wrapped the flagon in a thick towel to keep it warm. Dusk was 
settling outside. On the walls the crows muttered round the heads like 
courtiers round a king. One of the guards held the door to Kingspyre. “Hope 
that’s not weasel soup,” he jested.
Roose Bolton was seated by the hearth reading from a thick leatherbound book 
when she entered. “Light some candles,” he commanded her as he turned a page. 
“It grows gloomy in here.”
She placed the food at his elbow and did as he bid her, filling the room with 
flickering light and the scent of cloves. Bolton turned a few more pages with 
his finger, then closed the book and placed it carefully in the fire. He 
watched the flames consume it, pale eyes shining with reflected light. The old 
dry leather went up with a whoosh, and the yellow pages stirred as 
they burned, as if some ghost were reading them. “I will have no further need 
of you tonight,” he said, never looking at her.
She should have gone, silent as a mouse, but something had hold of her. “My 
lord,” she asked, “will you take me with you when you leave 
Harrenhal?”
He turned to stare at her, and from the look in his eyes it was as if his 
supper had just spoken to him. “Did I give you leave to question me, 
Nan?”
“No, my lord.” She lowered her eyes.
“You should not have spoken, then. Should you?”“No. My lord.”
For a moment he looked amused. “I will answer you, just this once. I mean to 
give Harrenhal to Lord Vargo when I return to the north. You will remain here, 
with him.”
“But I don’t—” she started.
He cut her off. “I am not in the habit of being questioned by servants, Nan. 
Must I have your tongue out?”
He would do it as easily as another man might cuff a dog, she knew. “No, my 
lord.”
“Then I’ll hear no more from you?”
“No, my lord.”
“Go, then. I shall forget this insolence.”
Arya went, but not to her bed. When she stepped out into the darkness of the 
yard, the guard on the door nodded at her and said, “Storm coming. Smell the 
air?” The wind was gusting, flames swirling off the torches mounted atop the 
walls beside the rows of heads. On her way to the godswood, she passed the 
Wailing Tower where once she had lived in fear of Weese. The Freys had taken it 
for their own since Harrenhal’s fall. She could hear angry voices coming from a 
window, many men talking and arguing all at once. Elmar was sitting on the 
steps outside, alone.
“What’s wrong?” Arya asked him when she saw the tears shining on his 
cheeks.
“My princess,” he sobbed. “We’ve been dishonored, Aenys says. There was a 
bird from the Twins. My lord father says I’ll need to marry someone else, or be 
a septon.”A stupid princess, she thought, that’s nothing to cry 
over. “My brothers might be dead,” she confided.
Elmar gave her a scornful look. “No one cares about a serving girl’s 
brothers.”
It was hard not to hit him when he said that. “I hope your princess dies,” 
she said, and ran off before he could grab her.
In the godswood she found her broomstick sword where she had left it, and 
carried it to the heart tree. There she knelt. Red leaves rustled. Red eyes 
peered inside her. The eyes of the gods. “Tell me what to do, you 
gods,” she prayed.
For a long moment there was no sound but the wind and the water and the creak 
of leaf and limb. And then, far far off, beyond the godswood and the haunted 
towers and the immense stone walls of Harrenhal, from somewhere out in the 
world, came the long lonely howl of a wolf. Gooseprickles rose on Arya’s skin, 
and for an instant she felt dizzy. Then, so faintly, it seemed as if she heard 
her father’s voice. “When the snows fall and the white winds blow, the lone 
wolf dies, but the pack survives,” he said.
“But there is no pack,” she whispered to the weirwood. Bran and Rickon were 
dead, the Lannisters had Sansa, Jon had gone to the Wall. “I’m not even me 
now, I’m Nan.”
“You are Arya of Winterfell, daughter of the north. You told me you could be 
strong. You have the wolf blood in you.”
“The wolf blood.” Arya remembered now. “I’ll be as strong as Robb. I said I 
would.” She took a deep breath, then lifted the broomstick in both hands and 
brought it down across her knee.

It broke with a loud crack, and she threw the pieces aside. I am 
a direwolf, and done with wooden teeth.
That night she lay in her narrow bed upon the scratchy straw, listening to the 
voices of the living and the dead whisper and argue as she waited for the moon 
to rise. They were the only voices she trusted anymore. She could hear the 
sound of her own breath, and the wolves as well, a great pack of them now. 
They are closer than the one I heard in the godswood, she thought. 
They are calling to me.
Finally she slipped from under the blanket, wriggled into a tunic, and padded 
barefoot down the stairs. Roose Bolton was a cautious man, and the entrance to 
Kingspyre was guarded day and night, so she had to slip out of a narrow cellar 
window. The yard was still, the great castle lost in haunted dreams. Above, the 
wind keened through the Wailing Tower.
At the forge she found the fires extinguished and the doors closed and barred. 
She crept in a window, as she had once before. Gendry shared a mattress with 
two other apprentice smiths. She crouched in the loft for a long time before 
her eyes adjusted enough for her to be sure that he was the one on the end. 
Then she put a hand over his mouth and pinched him. His eyes opened. He could 
not have been very deeply asleep. “Please,” she whispered. She took 
her hand off his mouth and pointed.
For a moment she did not think he understood, but then he slid out from under 
the blankets. Naked, he padded across the room, shrugged into a loose roughspun 
tunic, and climbed down from

the loft after her. The other sleepers did not stir. “What do you want now?” 
Gendry said in a low angry voice.
“A sword.”
“Blackthumb keeps all the blades locked up, I told you that a hundred times. 
Is this for Lord Leech?”
“For me. Break the lock with your hammer.”
“They’ll break my hand,” he grumbled. “Or worse.”
“Not if you run off with me.”
“Run, and they’ll catch you and kill you.”
“They’ll do you worse. Lord Bolton is giving Harrenhal to the Bloody Mummers, 
he told me so.”
Gendry pushed black hair out of his eyes. “So?”
She looked right at him, fearless. “So when Vargo Hoat’s the lord, he’s going 
to cut off the feet of all the servants to keep them from running away. The 
smiths too.”
“That’s only a story,” he said scornfully.
“No, it’s true, I heard Lord Vargo say so,” she lied. “He’s going to cut one 
foot off everyone. The left one. Go to the kitchens and wake Hot Pie, he’ll do 
what you say. We’ll need bread or oatcakes or something. You get the swords and 
I’ll do the horses. We’ll meet near the postern in the east wall, behind the 
Tower of Ghosts. No one ever comes there.”
“I know that gate. It’s guarded, same as the rest.”
“So? You won’t forget the swords?”
“I never said I’d come.”
“No. But if you do, you won’t forget the swords?”He frowned. “No,” he said at last. “I guess I won’t.”
Arya reentered Kingspyre the same way she had left it, and stole up the winding 
steps listening for footfalls. In her cell, she stripped to the skin and 
dressed herself carefully, in two layers of smallclothes, warm stockings, and 
her cleanest tunic. It was Lord Bolton’s livery. On the breast was sewn his 
sigil, the flayed man of the Dreadfort. She tied her shoes, threw a wool cloak 
over her skinny shoulders, and knotted it under her throat. Quiet as a shadow, 
she moved back down the stairs. Outside the lord’s solar she paused to listen 
at the door, easing it open slowly when she heard only silence.
The sheepskin map was on the table, beside the remains of Lord Bolton’s supper. 
She rolled it up tight and thrust it through her belt. He’d left his dagger on 
the table as well, so she took that too, just in case Gendry lost his 
courage.
A horse neighed softly as she slipped into the darkened stables. The grooms 
were all asleep. She prodded one with her toe until he sat up groggily and 
said, “Eh? Whas?”
“Lord Bolton requires three horses saddled and bridled.”
The boy got to his feet, pushing straw from his hair. “Wha, at this hour? 
Horses, you say?” He blinked at the sigil on her tunic. “Whas he want horses 
for, in the dark?”
“Lord Bolton is not in the habit of being questioned by servants.” She 
crossed her arms.
The stableboy was still looking at the flayed man. He knew what it meant. 
“Three, you say?”“One two three. Hunting horses. Fast and surefoot.” Arya helped him 
with the bridles and saddles, so he would not need to wake any of the others. 
She hoped they would not hurt him afterward, but she knew they probably 
would.
Leading the horses across the castle was the worst part. She stayed in the 
shadow of the curtain wall whenever she could, so the sentries walking their 
rounds on the ramparts above would have needed to look almost straight down to 
see her. And if they do, what of it? I’m my lord’s own cupbearer. It 
was a chill dank autumn night. Clouds were blowing in from the west, hiding the 
stars, and the Wailing Tower screamed mournfully at every gust of wind. It 
smells like rain. Arya did not know whether that would be good or bad for 
their escape.
No one saw her, and she saw no one, only a grey and white cat creeping along 
atop the godswood wall. It stopped and spit at her, waking memories of the Red 
Keep and her father and Syrio Forel. “I could catch you if I wanted,” she 
called to it softly, “but I have to go, cat.” The cat hissed again and ran 
off.
The Tower of Ghosts was the most ruinous of Harrenhal’s five immense towers. It 
stood dark and desolate behind the remains of a collapsed sept where only rats 
had come to pray for near three hundred years. It was there she waited to see 
if Gendry and Hot Pie would come. It seemed as though she waited a long time. 
The horses nibbled at the weeds that grew up between the broken stones while 
the clouds swallowed the last of the stars. Arya took out the dagger and 
sharpened it to keep her hands busy. Long smooth

strokes, the way Syrio had taught her. The sound calmed her.
She heard them coming long before she saw them. Hot Pie was breathing heavily, 
and once he stumbled in the dark, barked his shin, and cursed loud enough to 
wake half of Harrenhal. Gendry was quieter, but the swords he was carrying rang 
together as he moved. “Here I am.” She stood. “Be quiet or they’ll hear 
you.”
The boys picked their way toward her over tumbled stones. Gendry was wearing 
oiled chainmail under his cloak, she saw, and he had his blacksmith’s hammer 
slung across his back. Hot Pie’s red round face peered out from under a hood. 
He had a sack of bread dangling from his right hand and a big wheel of cheese 
under his left arm. “There’s a guard on that postern,” said Gendry quietly. 
“I told you there would be.”
“You stay here with the horses,” said Arya. “I’ll get rid of him. Come quick 
when I call.”
Gendry nodded. Hot Pie said, “Hoot like an owl when you want us to 
come.”
“I’m not an owl,” said Arya. “I’m a wolf. I’ll howl.”
Alone, she slid through the shadow of the Tower of Ghosts. She walked fast, to 
keep ahead of her fear, and it felt as though Syrio Forel walked beside her, 
and Yoren, and Jaqen H’ghar, and Jon Snow. She had not taken the sword Gendry 
had brought her, not yet. For this the dagger would be better. It was good and 
sharp. This postern was the least of Harrenhal’s gates, a narrow door of stout 
oak studded with iron nails, set in an angle of the wall beneath a defensive 
tower. Only one man was set to guard it, but

she knew there would be sentries up in that tower as well, and others nearby 
walking the walls. Whatever happened, she must be quiet as a shadow. He 
must not call out. A few scattered raindrops had begun to fall. She felt 
one land on her brow and run slowly down her nose.
She made no effort to hide, but approached the guard openly, as if Lord Bolton 
himself had sent her. He watched her come, curious as to what might bring a 
page here at this black hour. When she got closer, she saw that he was a 
northman, very tall and thin, huddled in a ragged fur cloak. That was bad. She 
might have been able to trick a Frey or one of the Brave Companions, but the 
Dreadfort men had served Roose Bolton their whole life, and they knew him 
better than she did. If I tell him I am Arya Stark and command him to 
stand aside . . . No, she dare not. He was a northman, but 
not a Winterfell man. He belonged to Roose Bolton.
When she reached him she pushed back her cloak so he would see the flayed man 
on her breast. “Lord Bolton sent me.”
“At this hour? Why for?”
She could see the gleam of steel under the fur, and she did not know if she was 
strong enough to drive the point of the dagger through chainmail. His 
throat, it must be his throat, but he’s too tall, I’ll never reach it. For 
a moment she did not know what to say. For a moment she was a little girl 
again, and scared, and the rain on her face felt like tears.
“He told me to give all his guards a silver piece, for their good service.” 
The words seemed to come out of nowhere.“Silver, you say?” He did not believe her, but he wanted to; 
silver was silver, after all. “Give it over, then.”
Her fingers dug down beneath her tunic and came out clutching the coin Jaqen 
had given her. In the dark the iron could pass for tarnished silver. She held 
it out . . . and let it slip through her fingers.
Cursing her softly, the man went to a knee to grope for the coin in the dirt, 
and there was his neck right in front of her. Arya slid her dagger out and drew 
it across his throat, as smooth as summer silk. His blood covered her hands in 
a hot gush and he tried to shout but there was blood in his mouth as 
well.
“Valar morghulis,” she whispered as he died.
When he stopped moving, she picked up the coin. Outside the walls of Harrenhal, 
a wolf howled long and loud. She lifted the bar, set it aside, and pulled open 
the heavy oak door. By the time Hot Pie and Gendry came up with the horses, the 
rain was falling hard. “You killed him!” Hot Pie gasped.
“What did you think I would do?” Her fingers were sticky with blood, and the 
smell was making her mare skittish. It’s no matter, she thought, 
swinging up into the saddle. The rain will wash them clean 
again.

The sky was as black as the walls of Harrenhal behind them, and the rain fell soft and steady, muffling the sound of their horses’ hooves and running down their faces.
They rode north, away from the lake, following a rutted farm road across the torn fields and into the woods and streams. Arya took the lead, kicking her stolen horse to a brisk heedless trot until the trees closed in around her. Hot Pie and Gendry followed as best they could. Wolves howled off in the distance, and she could hear Hot Pie’s heavy breathing. No one spoke. From time to time Arya glanced over her shoulder, to make sure the two boys had not fallen too far behind, and to see if they were being pursued.
They would be, she knew. She had stolen three horses from the stables and a map and a dagger from Roose Bolton’s own solar, and killed a guard on the postern gate, slitting his throat when he knelt to pick up the worn iron coin that Jaqen H’ghar had given her. Someone would find him lying dead in his own blood, and then the hue and cry would go up. They would wake Lord Bolton and search Harrenhal from crenel to cellar, and when they did they would find the map and the dagger missing, along with some swords from the armory, bread and cheese from the kitchens, a baker boy, a ’prentice smith, and a cupbearer called Nan . . . or Weasel, or Arry, depending on who you asked.
The Lord of the Dreadfort would not come after them himself. Roose Bolton would stay abed, his pasty flesh dotted with leeches, giving commands in his whispery soft voice. His man Walton might lead the hunt, the one they called Steelshanks for the greaves he always wore on his long legs. Or perhaps it would be slobbery Vargo Hoat and his sellswords, who named themselves the Brave Companions. Others called them Bloody Mummers (though never to their faces), and sometimes the Footmen, for Lord Vargo’s habit of cutting off the hands and feet of men who displeased him.
If they catch us, he’ll cut off our hands and feet, Arya thought, and then Roose Bolton will peel the skin off us. She was still dressed in her page’s garb, and on the breast over her heart was sewn Lord Bolton’s sigil, the flayed man of the Dreadfort.
Every time she looked back, she half expected to see a blaze of torches pouring out the distant gates of Harrenhal or rushing along the tops of its huge high walls, but there was nothing. Harrenhal slept on, until it was lost in darkness and hidden behind the trees.
When they crossed the first stream, Arya turned her horse aside and led them off the road, following the twisting course of the water for a quarter-mile before finally scrambling out and up a stony bank. If the hunters brought dogs, that might throw them off the scent, she hoped. They could not stay on the road. There is death on the road, she told herself, death on all the roads.
Gendry and Hot Pie did not question her choice. She had the map, after all, and Hot Pie seemed almost as terrified of her as of the men who might be coming after them. He had seen the guard she’d killed. It’s better if he’s scared of me, she told herself. That way he’ll do like I say, instead of something stupid.
She should be more frightened herself, she knew. She was only ten, a skinny girl on a stolen horse with a dark forest ahead of her and men behind who would gladly cut off her feet. Yet somehow she felt calmer than she ever had in Harrenhal. The rain had washed the guard’s blood off her fingers, she wore a sword across her back, wolves were prowling through the dark like lean grey shadows, and Arya Stark was unafraid. Fear cuts deeper than swords, she whispered under her breath, the words that Syrio Forel had taught her, and Jaqen’s words too, valar morghulis.
The rain stopped and started again and stopped once more and started, but they had good cloaks to keep the water off. Arya kept them moving at a slow steady pace. It was too black beneath the trees to ride any faster; the boys were no horsemen, neither one, and the soft broken ground was treacherous with half-buried roots and hidden stones. They crossed another road, its deep ruts filled with runoff, but Arya shunned it. Up and down the rolling hills she took them, through brambles and briars and tangles of underbrush, along the bottoms of narrow gullies where branches heavy with wet leaves slapped at their faces as they passed.
Gendry’s mare lost her footing in the mud once, going down hard on her hindquarters and spilling him from the saddle, but neither horse nor rider was hurt, and Gendry got that stubborn look on his face and mounted right up again. Not long after, they came upon three wolves devouring the corpse of a fawn. When Hot Pie’s horse caught the scent, he shied and bolted. Two of the wolves fled as well, but the third raised his head and bared his teeth, prepared to defend his kill. “Back off,” Arya told Gendry. “Slow, so you don’t spook him.” They edged their mounts away, until the wolf and his feast were no longer in sight. Only then did she swing about to ride after Hot Pie, who was clinging desperately to the saddle as he crashed through the trees.
Later they passed through a burned village, threading their way carefully between the shells of blackened hovels and past the bones of a dozen dead men hanging from a row of apple trees. When Hot Pie saw them he began to pray, a thin whispered plea for the Mother’s mercy, repeated over and over. Arya looked up at the fleshless dead in their wet rotting clothes and said her own prayer. Ser Gregor, it went, Dunsen, Polliver, Raff the Sweetling. The Tickler and the Hound. Ser Ilyn, Ser Meryn, King Joffrey, Queen Cersei. She ended it with valar morghulis, touched Jaqen’s coin where it nestled under her belt, and then reached up and plucked an apple from among the dead men as she rode beneath them. It was mushy and overripe, but she ate it worms and all.
That was the day without a dawn. Slowly the sky lightened around them, but they never saw the sun. Black turned to grey, and colors crept timidly back into the world. The soldier pines were dressed in somber greens, the broadleafs in russets and faded golds already beginning to brown. They stopped long enough to water the horses and eat a cold, quick breakfast, ripping apart a loaf of the bread that Hot Pie had stolen from the kitchens and passing chunks of hard yellow cheese from hand to hand.
“Do you know where we’re going?” Gendry asked her.
“North,” said Arya.
Hot Pie peered around uncertainly. “Which way is north?”
She used her cheese to point. “That way.”
“But there’s no sun. How do you know?”
“From the moss. See how it grows mostly on one side of the trees? That’s south.”
“What do we want with the north?” Gendry wanted to know.
“The Trident.” Arya unrolled the stolen map to show them. “See? Once we reach the Trident, all we need to do is follow it upstream till we come to Riverrun, here.” Her finger traced the path. “It’s a long way, but we can’t get lost so long as we keep to the river.”
Hot Pie blinked at the map. “Which one is Riverrun?”
Riverrun was painted as a castle tower, in the fork between the flowing blue lines of two rivers, the Tumblestone and the Red Fork. “There.” She touched it. “Riverrun, it reads.”
“You can read writing?” he said to her, wonderingly, as if she’d said she could walk on water.
She nodded. “We’ll be safe once we reach Riverrun.”
“We will? Why?”
Because Riverrun is my grandfather’s castle, and my brother Robb will be there, she wanted to say. She bit her lip and rolled up the map. “We just will. But only if we get there.” She was the first one back in the saddle. It made her feel bad to hide the truth from Hot Pie, but she did not trust him with her secret. Gendry knew, but that was different. Gendry had his own secret, though even he didn’t seem to know what it was.
That day Arya quickened their pace, keeping the horses to a trot as long as she dared, and sometimes spurring to a gallop when she spied a flat stretch of field before them. That was seldom enough, though; the ground was growing hillier as they went. The hills were not high, nor especially steep, but there seemed to be no end of them, and they soon grew tired of climbing up one and down the other, and found themselves following the lay of the land, along streambeds and through a maze of shallow wooded valleys where the trees made a solid canopy overhead.
From time to time she sent Hot Pie and Gendry on while she doubled back to try to confuse their trail, listening all the while for the first sign of pursuit. Too slow, she thought to herself, chewing her lip, we’re going too slow, they’ll catch us for certain. Once, from the crest of a ridge, she spied dark shapes crossing a stream in the valley behind them, and for half a heartbeat she feared that Roose Bolton’s riders were on them, but when she looked again she realized they were only a pack of wolves. She cupped her hands around her mouth and howled down at them, “Ahooooooooo, ahooooooooo.” When the largest of the wolves lifted its head and howled back, the sound made Arya shiver.
By midday Hot Pie had begun to complain. His arse was sore, he told them, and the saddle was rubbing him raw inside his legs, and besides he had to get some sleep. “I’m so tired I’m going to fall off the horse.”
Arya looked at Gendry. “If he falls off, who do you think will find him first, the wolves or the Mummers?”
“The wolves,” said Gendry. “Better noses.”
Hot Pie opened his mouth and closed it. He did not fall off his horse. The rain began again a short time later. They still had not seen so much as a glimpse of the sun. It was growing colder, and pale white mists were threading between the pines and blowing across the bare burned fields.
Gendry was having almost as bad a time of it as Hot Pie, though he was too stubborn to complain. He sat awkwardly in the saddle, a determined look on his face beneath his shaggy black hair, but Arya could tell he was no horseman. I should have remembered, she thought to herself. She had been riding as long as she could remember, ponies when she was little and later horses, but Gendry and Hot Pie were city-born, and in the city smallfolk walked. Yoren had given them mounts when he took them from King’s Landing, but sitting on a donkey and plodding up the kingsroad behind a wagon was one thing. Guiding a hunting horse through wild woods and burned fields was something else.
She would make much better time on her own, Arya knew, but she could not leave them. They were her pack, her friends, the only living friends that remained to her, and if not for her they would still be safe at Harrenhal, Gendry sweating at his forge and Hot Pie in the kitchens. If the Mummers catch us, I’ll tell them that I’m Ned Stark’s daughter and sister to the King in the North. I’ll command them to take me to my brother, and to do no harm to Hot Pie and Gendry. They might not believe her, though, and even if they did . . . Lord Bolton was her brother’s bannerman, but he frightened her all the same. I won’t let them take us, she vowed silently, reaching back over her shoulder to touch the hilt of the sword that Gendry had stolen for her. I won’t.
Late that afternoon, they emerged from beneath the trees and found themselves on the banks of a river. Hot Pie gave a whoop of delight. “The Trident! Now all we have to do is go upstream, like you said. We’re almost there!”
Arya chewed her lip. “I don’t think this is the Trident.” The river was swollen by the rain, but even so it couldn’t be much more than thirty feet across. She remembered the Trident as being much wider. “It’s too little to be the Trident,” she told them, “and we didn’t come far enough.”
“Yes we did,” Hot Pie insisted. “We rode all day, and hardly stopped at all. We must have come a long way.”
“Let’s have a look at that map again,” said Gendry.
Arya dismounted, took out the map, unrolled it. The rain pattered against the sheepskin and ran off in rivulets. “We’re someplace here, I think,” she said, pointing, as the boys peered over her shoulders.
“But,” said Hot Pie, “that’s hardly any ways at all. See, Harrenhal’s there by your finger, you’re almost touching it. And we rode all day!”
“There’s miles and miles before we reach the Trident,” she said. “We won’t be there for days. This must be some different river, one of these, see.” She showed him some of the thinner blue lines the mapmaker had painted in, each with a name painted in fine script beneath it. “The Darry, the Greenapple, the Maiden . . . here, this one, the Little Willow, it might be that.”
Hot Pie looked from the line to the river. “It doesn’t look so little to me.”
Gendry was frowning as well. “The one you’re pointing at runs into that other one, see.”
“The Big Willow,” she read.
“The Big Willow, then. See, and the Big Willow runs into the Trident, so we could follow the one to the other, but we’d need to go downstream, not up. Only if this river isn’t the Little Willow, if it’s this other one here . . .”
“Rippledown Rill,” Arya read.
“See, it loops around and flows down toward the lake, back to Harrenhal.” He traced the line with a finger.
Hot Pie’s eyes grew wide. “No! They’ll kill us for sure.”
“We have to know which river this is,” declared Gendry, in his stubbornest voice. “We have to know.”
“Well, we don’t.” The map might have names written beside the blue lines, but no one had written a name on the riverbank. “We won’t go up or downstream,” she decided, rolling up the map. “We’ll cross and keep going north, like we were.”
“Can horses swim?” asked Hot Pie. “It looks deep, Arry. What if there are snakes?”
“Are you sure we’re going north?” asked Gendry. “All these hills . . . if we got turned around . . .”
“The moss on the trees—”
He pointed to a nearby tree. “That tree’s got moss on three sides, and that next one has no moss at all. We could be lost, just riding around in a circle.”
“We could be,” said Arya, “but I’m going to cross the river anyway. You can come or you can stay here.” She climbed back into the saddle, ignoring the both of them. If they didn’t want to follow, they could find Riverrun on their own, though more likely the Mummers would just find them.
She had to ride a good half mile along the bank before she finally found a place where it looked as though it might be safe to cross, and even then her mare was reluctant to enter the water. The river, whatever its name, was running brown and fast, and the deep part in the middle came up past the horse’s belly. Water filled her boots, but she pressed in her heels all the same and climbed out on the far bank. From behind she heard splashing, and a mare’s nervous whinny. They followed, then. Good. She turned to watch as the boys struggled across and emerged dripping beside her. “It wasn’t the Trident,” she told them. “It wasn’t.”
The next river was shallower and easier to ford. That one wasn’t the Trident either, and no one argued with her when she told them they would cross it.
Dusk was settling as they stopped to rest the horses once more and share another meal of bread and cheese. “I’m cold and wet,” Hot Pie complained. “We’re a long way from Harrenhal now, for sure. We could have us a fire—”
“NO!” Arya and Gendry both said, at the exact same instant. Hot Pie quailed a little. Arya gave Gendry a sideways look. He said it with me, like Jon used to do, back in Winterfell. She missed Jon Snow the most of all her brothers.
“Could we sleep at least?” Hot Pie asked. “I’m so tired, Arry, and my arse is sore. I think I’ve got blisters.”
“You’ll have more than that if you’re caught,” she said. “We’ve got to keep going. We’ve got to.”
“But it’s almost dark, and you can’t even see the moon.”
“Get back on your horse.”
Plodding along at a slow walking pace as the light faded around them, Arya found her own exhaustion weighing heavy on her. She needed sleep as much as Hot Pie, but they dare not. If they slept, they might open their eyes to find Vargo Hoat standing over them with Shagwell the Fool and Faithful Urswyck and Rorge and Biter and Septon Utt and all his other monsters.
Yet after a while the motion of her horse became as soothing as the rocking of a cradle, and Arya found her eyes growing heavy. She let them close, just for an instant, then snapped them wide again. I can’t go to sleep, she screamed at herself silently, I can’t, I can’t. She knuckled at her eye and rubbed it hard to keep it open, clutching the reins tightly and kicking her mount to a canter. But neither she nor the horse could sustain the pace, and it was only a few moments before they fell back to a walk again, and a few more until her eyes closed a second time. This time they did not open quite so quickly.
When they did, she found that her horse had come to a stop and was nibbling at a tuft of grass, while Gendry was shaking her arm. “You fell asleep,” he told her.
“I was just resting my eyes.”
“You were resting them a long while, then. Your horse was wandering in a circle, but it wasn’t till she stopped that I realized you were sleeping. Hot Pie’s just as bad, he rode into a tree limb and got knocked off, you should have heard him yell. Even that didn’t wake you up. You need to stop and sleep.”
“I can keep going as long as you can.” She yawned.
“Liar,” he said. “You keep going if you want to be stupid, but I’m stopping. I’ll take the first watch. You sleep.”
“What about Hot Pie?”
Gendry pointed. Hot Pie was already on the ground, curled up beneath his cloak on a bed of damp leaves and snoring softly. He had a big wedge of cheese in one fist, but it looked as though he had fallen asleep between bites.
It was no good arguing, Arya realized; Gendry had the right of it. The Mummers will need to sleep too, she told herself, hoping it was true. She was so weary it was a struggle even to get down from the saddle, but she remembered to hobble her horse before finding a place beneath a beech tree. The ground was hard and damp. She wondered how long it would be before she slept in a bed again, with hot food and a fire to warm her. The last thing she did before closing her eyes was unsheathe her sword and lay it down beside her. “Ser Gregor,” she whispered, yawning. “Dunsen, Polliver, Raff the Sweetling. The Tickler and . . . the Tickler . . . the Hound . . .”
Her dreams were red and savage. The Mummers were in them, four at least, a pale Lyseni and a dark brutal axeman from Ib, the scarred Dothraki horse lord called Iggo and a Dornishman whose name she never knew. On and on they came, riding through the rain in rusting mail and wet leather, swords and axe clanking against their saddles. They thought they were hunting her, she knew with all the strange sharp certainty of dreams, but they were wrong. She was hunting them.
She was no little girl in the dream; she was a wolf, huge and powerful, and when she emerged from beneath the trees in front of them and bared her teeth in a low rumbling growl, she could smell the rank stench of fear from horse and man alike. The Lyseni’s mount reared and screamed in terror, and the others shouted at one another in mantalk, but before they could act the other wolves came hurtling from the darkness and the rain, a great pack of them, gaunt and wet and silent.
The fight was short but bloody. The hairy man went down as he unslung his axe, the dark one died stringing an arrow, and the pale man from Lys tried to bolt. Her brothers and sisters ran him down, turning him again and again, coming at him from all sides, snapping at the legs of his horse and tearing the throat from the rider when he came crashing to the earth.
Only the belled man stood his ground. His horse kicked in the head of one of her sisters, and he cut another almost in half with his curved silvery claw as his hair tinkled softly.
Filled with rage, she leapt onto his back, knocking him head-first from his saddle. Her jaws locked on his arm as they fell, her teeth sinking through the leather and wool and soft flesh. When they landed she gave a savage jerk with her head and ripped the limb loose from his shoulder. Exulting, she shook it back and forth in her mouth, scattering the warm red droplets amidst the cold black rain.

She was grubbing for vegetables in a dead man’s garden when she heard the singing. 
Arya stiffened, still as stone, listening, the three stringy carrots in her hand suddenly forgotten. She thought of the Bloody Mummers and Roose Bolton’s men, and a shiver of fear went down her back. It’s not fair, not when we finally found the Trident, not when we thought we were almost safe.
Only why would the Mummers be singing?
The song came drifting up the river from somewhere beyond the little rise to the east. “Off to Gulltown to see the fair maid, heigh-ho, heigh-ho . . .”
Arya rose, carrots dangling from her hand. It sounded like the singer was coming up the river road. Over among the cabbages, Hot Pie had heard it too, to judge by the look on his face. Gendry had gone to sleep in the shade of the burned cottage, and was past hearing anything.
“I’ll steal a sweet kiss with the point of my blade, heigh-ho, heigh-ho.” She thought she heard a woodharp too, beneath the soft rush of the river.
“Do you hear?” Hot Pie asked in a hoarse whisper, as he hugged an armful of cabbages. “Someone’s coming.”
“Go wake Gendry,” Arya told him. “Just shake him by the shoulder, don’t make a lot of noise.” Gendry was easy to wake, unlike Hot Pie, who needed to be kicked and shouted at.
“I’ll make her my love and we’ll rest in the shade, heigh-ho, heigh-ho.” The song swelled louder with every word.
Hot Pie opened his arms. The cabbages fell to the ground with soft thumps. “We have to hide.”
Where? The burned cottage and its overgrown garden stood hard beside the banks of the Trident. There were a few willows growing along the river’s edge and reed beds in the muddy shallows beyond, but most of the ground hereabouts was painfully open. I knew we should never have left the woods, she thought. They’d been so hungry, though, and the garden had been too much a temptation. The bread and cheese they had stolen from Harrenhal had given out six days ago, back in the thick of the woods. “Take Gendry and the horses behind the cottage,” she decided. There was part of one wall still standing, big enough, maybe, to conceal two boys and three horses. If the horses don’t whinny, and that singer doesn’t come poking around the garden.
“What about you?”
“I’ll hide by the tree. He’s probably alone. If he bothers me, I’ll kill him. Go!”
Hot Pie went, and Arya dropped her carrots and drew the stolen sword from over her shoulder. She had strapped the sheath across her back; the longsword was made for a man grown, and it bumped against the ground when she wore it on her hip. It’s too heavy besides, she thought, missing Needle the way she did every time she took this clumsy thing in her hand. But it was a sword and she could kill with it, that was enough.
Lightfoot, she moved to the big old willow that grew beside the bend in the road and went to one knee in the grass and mud, within the veil of trailing branches. You old gods, she prayed as the singer’s voice grew louder, you tree gods, hide me, and make him go past. Then a horse whickered, and the song broke off suddenly. He’s heard, she knew, but maybe he’s alone, or if he’s not, maybe they’ll be as scared of us as we are of them.
“Did you hear that?” a man’s voice said. “There’s something behind that wall, I would say.”
“Aye,” replied a second voice, deeper. “What do you think it might be, Archer?”
Two, then. Arya bit her lip. She could not see them from where she knelt, on account of the willow. But she could hear.
“A bear.” A third voice, or the first one again?
“A lot of meat on a bear,” the deep voice said. “A lot of fat as well, in fall. Good to eat, if it’s cooked up right.”
“Could be a wolf. Maybe a lion.”
“With four feet, you think? Or two?”
“Makes no matter. Does it?”
“Not so I know. Archer, what do you mean to do with all them arrows?”
“Drop a few shafts over the wall. Whatever’s hiding back there will come out quick enough, watch and see.”
“What if it’s some honest man back there, though? Or some poor woman with a little babe at her breast?”
“An honest man would come out and show us his face. Only an outlaw would skulk and hide.”
“Aye, that’s so. Go on and loose your shafts, then.”
Arya sprang to her feet. “Don’t!” She showed them her sword. There were three, she saw. Only three. Syrio could fight more than three, and she had Hot Pie and Gendry to stand with her, maybe. But they’re boys, and these are men.
They were men afoot, travel-stained and mud-specked. She knew the singer by the woodharp he cradled against his jerkin, as a mother might cradle a babe. A small man, fifty from the look of him, he had a big mouth, a sharp nose, and thinning brown hair. His faded greens were mended here and there with old leather patches, and he wore a brace of throwing knives on his hip and a woodman’s axe slung across his back.
The man beside him stood a good foot taller, and had the look of a soldier. A longsword and dirk hung from his studded leather belt, rows of overlapping steel rings were sewn onto his shirt, and his head was covered by a black iron halfhelm shaped like a cone. He had bad teeth and a bushy brown beard, but it was his hooded yellow cloak that drew the eye. Thick and heavy, stained here with grass and there with blood, frayed along the bottom and patched with deerskin on the right shoulder, the greatcloak gave the big man the look of some huge yellow bird.
The last of the three was a youth as skinny as his longbow, if not quite as tall. Red-haired and freckled, he wore a studded brigantine, high boots, fingerless leather gloves, and a quiver on his back. His arrows were fletched with grey goose feathers, and six of them stood in the ground before him, like a little fence.
The three men looked at her, standing there in the road with her blade in hand. Then the singer idly plucked a string. “Boy,” he said, “put up that sword now, unless you’re wanting to be hurt. It’s too big for you, lad, and besides, Anguy here could put three shafts through you before you could hope to reach us.”
“He could not,” Arya said, “and I’m a girl.”
“So you are.” The singer bowed. “My pardons.”
“You go on down the road. Just walk right past here, and you keep on singing, so we’ll know where you are. Go away and leave us be and I won’t kill you.”
The freckle-faced archer laughed. “Lem, she won’t kill us, did you hear?”
“I heard,” said Lem, the big soldier with the deep voice.
“Child,” said the singer, “put up that sword, and we’ll take you to a safe place and get some food in that belly. There are wolves in these parts, and lions, and worse things. No place for a little girl to be wandering alone.”
“She’s not alone.” Gendry rode out from behind the cottage wall, and behind him Hot Pie, leading her horse. In his chainmail shirt with a sword in his hand, Gendry looked almost a man grown, and dangerous. Hot Pie looked like Hot Pie. “Do like she says, and leave us be,” warned Gendry.
“Two and three,” the singer counted, “and is that all of you? And horses too, lovely horses. Where did you steal them?”
“They’re ours.” Arya watched them carefully. The singer kept distracting her with his talk, but it was the archer who was the danger. If he should pull an arrow from the ground . . . 
“Will you give us your names like honest men?” the singer asked the boys.
“I’m Hot Pie,” Hot Pie said at once.
“Aye, and good for you.” The man smiled. “It’s not every day I meet a lad with such a tasty name. And what would your friends be called, Mutton Chop and Squab?”
Gendry scowled down from his saddle. “Why should I tell you my name? I haven’t heard yours.”
“Well, as to that, I’m Tom of Sevenstreams, but Tom Sevenstrings is what they call me, or Tom o’ Sevens. This great lout with the brown teeth is Lem, short for Lemoncloak. It’s yellow, you see, and Lem’s a sour sort. And young fellow me lad over there is Anguy, or Archer as we like to call him.”
“Now who are you?” demanded Lem, in the deep voice that Arya had heard through the branches of the willow.
She was not about to give up her true name as easy as that. “Squab, if you want,” she said. “I don’t care.”
The big man laughed. “A squab with a sword,” he said. “Now there’s something you don’t often see.”
“I’m the Bull,” said Gendry, taking his lead from Arya. She could not blame him for preferring Bull to Mutton Chop.
Tom Sevenstrings strummed his harp. “Hot Pie, Squab, and the Bull. Escaped from Lord Bolton’s kitchen, did you?”
“How did you know?” Arya demanded, uneasy.
“You bear his sigil on your chest, little one.”
She had forgotten that for an instant. Beneath her cloak, she still wore her fine page’s doublet, with the flayed man of the Dreadfort sewn on her breast. “Don’t call me little one!”
“Why not?” said Lem. “You’re little enough.”
“I’m bigger than I was. I’m not a child.” Children didn’t kill people, and she had.
“I can see that, Squab. You’re none of you children, not if you were Bolton’s.”
“We never were.” Hot Pie never knew when to keep quiet. “We were at Harrenhal before he came, that’s all.”
“So you’re lion cubs, is that the way of it?” said Tom.
“Not that either. We’re nobody’s men. Whose men are you?”
Anguy the Archer said, “We’re king’s men.”
Arya frowned. “Which king?”
“King Robert,” said Lem, in his yellow cloak.
“That old drunk?” said Gendry scornfully. “He’s dead, some boar killed him, everyone knows that.”
“Aye, lad,” said Tom Sevenstrings, “and more’s the pity.” He plucked a sad chord from his harp.
Arya didn’t think they were king’s men at all. They looked more like outlaws, all tattered and ragged. They didn’t even have horses to ride. King’s men would have had horses.
But Hot Pie piped up eagerly. “We’re looking for Riverrun,” he said. “How many days’ ride is it, do you know?”
Arya could have killed him. “You be quiet, or I’ll stuff rocks in your big stupid mouth.”
“Riverrun is a long way upstream,” said Tom. “A long hungry way. Might be you’d like a hot meal before you set out? There’s an inn not far ahead kept by some friends of ours. We could share some ale and a bite of bread, instead of fighting one another.”
“An inn?” The thought of hot food made Arya’s belly rumble, but she didn’t trust this Tom. Not everyone who spoke you friendly was really your friend. “It’s near, you say?”
“Two miles upstream,” said Tom. “A league at most.”
Gendry looked as uncertain as she felt. “What do you mean, friends?” he asked warily.
“Friends. Have you forgotten what friends are?”
“Sharna is the innkeep’s name,” Tom put in. “She has a sharp tongue and a fierce eye, I’ll grant you that, but her heart’s a good one, and she’s fond of little girls.”
“I’m not a little girl,” she said angrily. “Who else is there? You said friends.”
“Sharna’s husband, and an orphan boy they took in. They won’t harm you. There’s ale, if you think you’re old enough. Fresh bread and maybe a bit of meat.” Tom glanced toward the cottage. “And whatever you stole from Old Pate’s garden besides.”
“We never stole,” said Arya.
“Are you Old Pate’s daughter, then? A sister? A wife? Tell me no lies, Squab. I buried Old Pate myself, right there under that willow where you were hiding, and you don’t have his look.” He drew a sad sound from his harp. “We’ve buried many a good man this past year, but we’ve no wish to bury you, I swear it on my harp. Archer, show her.”
The archer’s hand moved quicker than Arya would have believed. His shaft went hissing past her head within an inch of her ear and buried itself in the trunk of the willow behind her. By then the bowman had a second arrow notched and drawn. She’d thought she understood what Syrio meant by quick as a snake and smooth as summer silk, but now she knew she hadn’t. The arrow thrummed behind her like a bee. “You missed,” she said.
“More fool you if you think so,” said Anguy. “They go where I send them.”
“That they do,” agreed Lem Lemoncloak.
There were a dozen steps between the archer and the point of her sword. We have no chance, Arya realized, wishing she had a bow like his, and the skill to use it. Glumly, she lowered her heavy longsword till the point touched the ground. “We’ll come see this inn,” she conceded, trying to hide the doubt in her heart behind bold words. “You walk in front and we’ll ride behind, so we can see what you’re doing.”
Tom Sevenstrings bowed deeply and said, “Before, behind, it makes no matter. Come along, lads, let’s show them the way. Anguy, best pull up those arrows, we won’t be needing them here.”
Arya sheathed her sword and crossed the road to where her friends sat on their horses, keeping her distance from the three strangers. “Hot Pie, get those cabbages,” she said as she vaulted into her saddle. “And the carrots too.”
For once he did not argue. They set off as she had wanted, walking their horses slowly down the rutted road a dozen paces behind the three on foot. But before very long, somehow they were riding right on top of them. Tom Sevenstrings walked slowly, and liked to strum his woodharp as he went. “Do you know any songs?” he asked them. “I’d dearly love someone to sing with, that I would. Lem can’t carry a tune, and our longbow lad only knows marcher ballads, every one of them a hundred verses long.”
“We sing real songs in the marches,” Anguy said mildly.
“Singing is stupid,” said Arya. “Singing makes noise. We heard you a long way off. We could have killed you.”
Tom’s smile said he did not think so. “There are worse things than dying with a song on your lips.”
“If there were wolves hereabouts, we’d know it,” groused Lem. “Or lions. These are our woods.”
“You never knew we were there,” said Gendry.
“Now, lad, you shouldn’t be so certain of that,” said Tom. “Sometimes a man knows more than he says.”
Hot Pie shifted his seat. “I know the song about the bear,” he said. “Some of it, anyhow.”
Tom ran his fingers down his strings. “Then let’s hear it, pie boy.” He threw back his head and sang, “A bear there was, a bear, a bear! All black and brown, and covered with hair . . .”
Hot Pie joined in lustily, even bouncing in his saddle a little on the rhymes. Arya stared at him in astonishment. He had a good voice and he sang well. He never did anything well, except bake, she thought to herself.
A small brook flowed into the Trident a little farther on. As they waded across, their singing flushed a duck from among the reeds. Anguy stopped where he stood, unslung his bow, notched an arrow, and brought it down. The bird fell in the shallows not far from the bank. Lem took off his yellow cloak and waded in knee-deep to retrieve it, complaining all the while. “Do you think Sharna might have lemons down in that cellar of hers?” said Anguy to Tom as they watched Lem splash around, cursing. “A Dornish girl once cooked me duck with lemons.” He sounded wistful.
Tom and Hot Pie resumed their song on the other side of the brook, with the duck hanging from Lem’s belt beneath his yellow cloak. Somehow the singing made the miles seem shorter. It was not very long at all until the inn appeared before them, rising from the riverbank where the Trident made a great bend to the north. Arya squinted at it suspiciously as they neared. It did not look like an outlaws’ lair, she had to admit; it looked friendly, even homey, with its whitewashed upper story and slate roof and the smoke curling up lazy from its chimney. Stables and other outbuildings surrounded it, and there was an arbor in back, and apple trees, a small garden. The inn even had its own dock, thrusting out into the river, and . . . 
“Gendry,” she called, her voice low and urgent. “They have a boat. We could sail the rest of the way up to Riverrun. It would be faster than riding, I think.”
He looked dubious. “Did you ever sail a boat?”
“You put up the sail,” she said, “and the wind pushes it.”
“What if the wind is blowing the wrong way?”
“Then there’s oars to row.”
“Against the current?” Gendry frowned. “Wouldn’t that be slow? And what if the boat tips over and we fall into the water? It’s not our boat anyway, it’s the inn’s.”
We could take it. Arya chewed her lip and said nothing. They dismounted in front of stables. There were no other horses to be seen, but Arya noticed fresh manure in many of the stalls. “One of us should watch the horses,” she said, wary.
Tom overheard her. “There’s no need for that, Squab. Come eat, they’ll be safe enough.”
“I’ll stay,” Gendry said, ignoring the singer. “You can come get me after you’ve had some food.”
Nodding, Arya set off after Hot Pie and Lem. Her sword was still in its sheath across her back, and she kept a hand close to the hilt of the dagger she had stolen from Roose Bolton, in case she didn’t like whatever they found within.
The painted sign above the door showed a picture of some old king on his knees. Inside was the common room, where a very tall ugly woman with a knobby chin stood with her hands on her hips, glaring. “Don’t just stand there, boy,” she snapped. “Or are you a girl? Either one, you’re blocking my door. Get in or get out. Lem, what did I tell you about my floor? You’re all mud.”
“We shot a duck.” Lem held it out like a peace banner.
The woman snatched it from his hand. “Anguy shot a duck, is what you’re meaning. Get your boots off, are you deaf or just stupid?” She turned away. “Husband!” she called loudly. “Get up here, the lads are back. Husband!”
Up the cellar steps came a man in a stained apron, grumbling. He was a head shorter than the woman, with a lumpy face and loose yellowish skin that still showed the marks of some pox. “I’m here, woman, quit your bellowing. What is it now?”
“Hang this,” she said, handing him the duck.
Anguy shuffled his feet. “We were thinking we might eat it, Sharna. With lemons. If you had some.”
“Lemons. And where would we get lemons? Does this look like Dorne to you, you freckled fool? Why don’t you hop out back to the lemon trees and pick us a bushel, and some nice olives and pomegranates too.” She shook a finger at him. “Now, I suppose I could cook it with Lem’s cloak, if you like, but not till it’s hung for a few days. You’ll eat rabbit, or you won’t eat. Roast rabbit on a spit would be quickest, if you’ve got a hunger. Or might be you’d like it stewed, with ale and onions.”
Arya could almost taste the rabbit. “We have no coin, but we brought some carrots and cabbages we could trade you.”
“Did you now? And where would they be?”
“Hot Pie, give her the cabbages,” Arya said, and he did, though he approached the old woman as gingerly as if she were Rorge or Biter or Vargo Hoat.
The woman gave the vegetables a close inspection, and the boy a closer one. “Where is this hot pie?”
“Here. Me. It’s my name. And she’s . . . ah . . . Squab.”
“Not under my roof. I give my diners and my dishes different names, so as to tell them apart. Husband!”
Husband had stepped outside, but at her shout he hurried back. “The duck’s hung. What is it now, woman?”
“Wash these vegetables,” she commanded. “The rest of you, sit down while I start the rabbits. The boy will bring you drink.” She looked down her long nose at Arya and Hot Pie. “I am not in the habit of serving ale to children, but the cider’s run out, there’s no cows for milk, and the river water tastes of war, with all the dead men drifting downstream. If I served you a cup of soup full of dead flies, would you drink it?”
“Arry would,” said Hot Pie. “I mean, Squab.”
“So would Lem,” offered Anguy with a sly smile.
“Never you mind about Lem,” Sharna said. “It’s ale for all.” She swept off toward the kitchen.
Anguy and Tom Sevenstrings took the table near the hearth while Lem was hanging his big yellow cloak on a peg. Hot Pie plopped down heavily on a bench at the table by the door, and Arya wedged herself in beside him.
Tom unslung his harp. “A lonely inn on a forest road,” he sang, slowly picking out a tune to go with the words. “The innkeep’s wife was plain as a toad.”
“Shut up with that now or we won’t be getting no rabbit,” Lem warned him. “You know how she is.”
Arya leaned close to Hot Pie. “Can you sail a boat?” she asked. Before he could answer, a thickset boy of fifteen or sixteen appeared with tankards of ale. Hot Pie took his reverently in both hands, and when he sipped he smiled wider than Arya had ever seen him smile. “Ale,” he whispered, “and rabbit.”
“Well, here’s to His Grace,” Anguy the Archer called out cheerfully, lifting a toast. “Seven save the king!”
“All twelve o’ them,” Lem Lemoncloak muttered. He drank, and wiped the foam from his mouth with the back of his hand.
Husband came bustling in through the front door, with an apron full of washed vegetables. “There’s strange horses in the stable,” he announced, as if they hadn’t known.
“Aye,” said Tom, setting the woodharp aside, “and better horses than the three you gave away.”
Husband dropped the vegetables on a table, annoyed. “I never gave them away. I sold them for a good price, and got us a skiff as well. Anyways, you lot were supposed to get them back.”
I knew they were outlaws, Arya thought, listening. Her hand went under the table to touch the hilt of her dagger, and make sure it was still there. If they try to rob us, they’ll be sorry.
“They never came our way,” said Lem.
“Well, I sent them. You must have been drunk, or asleep.”
“Us? Drunk?” Tom drank a long draught of ale. “Never.”
“You could have taken them yourself,” Lem told Husband.
“What, with only the boy here? I told you twice, the old woman was up to Lambswold helping that Fern birth her babe. And like as not it was one o’ you planted the bastard in the poor girl’s belly.” He gave Tom a sour look. “You, I’d wager, with that harp o’ yours, singing all them sad songs just to get poor Fern out of her smallclothes.”
“If a song makes a maid want to slip off her clothes and feel the good warm sun kiss her skin, why, is that the singer’s fault?” asked Tom. “And ’twas Anguy she fancied, besides. ‘Can I touch your bow?’ I heard her ask him. ‘Ooohh, it feels so smooth and hard. Could I give it a little pull, do you think?’”
Husband snorted. “You and Anguy, makes no matter which. You’re as much to blame as me for them horses. They was three, you know. What can one man do against three?”
“Three,” said Lem scornfully, “but one a woman and t’other in chains, you said so yourself.”
Husband made a face. “A big woman, dressed like a man. And the one in chains . . . I didn’t fancy the look of his eyes.”
Anguy smiled over his ale. “When I don’t fancy a man’s eyes, I put an arrow through one.”
Arya remembered the shaft that had brushed by her ear. She wished she knew how to shoot arrows.
Husband was not impressed. “You be quiet when your elders are talking. Drink your ale and mind your tongue, or I’ll have the old woman take a spoon to you.”
“My elders talk too much, and I don’t need you to tell me to drink my ale.” He took a big swallow, to show that it was so.
Arya did the same. After days of drinking from brooks and puddles, and then the muddy Trident, the ale tasted as good as the little sips of wine her father used to allow her. A smell was drifting out from the kitchen that made her mouth water, but her thoughts were still full of that boat. Sailing it will be harder than stealing it. If we wait until they’re all asleep . . . 
The serving boy reappeared with big round loaves of bread. Arya broke off a chunk hungrily and tore into it. It was hard to chew, though, sort of thick and lumpy, and burned on the bottom.
Hot Pie made a face as soon as he tasted it. “That’s bad bread,” he said. “It’s burned, and tough besides.”
“It’s better when there’s stew to sop up,” said Lem.
“No, it isn’t,” said Anguy, “but you’re less like to break your teeth.”
“You can eat it or go hungry,” said Husband. “Do I look like some bloody baker? I’d like to see you make better.”
“I could,” said Hot Pie. “It’s easy. You kneaded the dough too much, that’s why it’s so hard to chew.” He took another sip of ale, and began talking lovingly of breads and pies and tarts, all the things he loved. Arya rolled her eyes.
Tom sat down across from her. “Squab,” he said, “or Arry, or whatever your true name might be, this is for you.” He placed a dirty scrap of parchment on the wooden tabletop between them.
She looked at it suspiciously. “What is it?”
“Three golden dragons. We need to buy those horses.”
Arya looked at him warily. “They’re our horses.”
“Meaning you stole them yourselves, is that it? No shame in that, girl. War makes thieves of many honest folk.” Tom tapped the folded parchment with his finger. “I’m paying you a handsome price. More than any horse is worth, if truth be told.”
Hot Pie grabbed the parchment and unfolded it. “There’s no gold,” he complained loudly. “It’s only writing.”
“Aye,” said Tom, “and I’m sorry for that. But after the war, we mean to make that good, you have my word as a king’s man.”
Arya pushed back from the table and got to her feet. “You’re no king’s men, you’re robbers.”
“If you’d ever met a true robber, you’d know they do not pay, not even in paper. It’s not for us we take your horses, child, it’s for the good of the realm, so we can get about more quickly and fight the fights that need fighting. The king’s fights. Would you deny the king?”
They were all watching her; the Archer, big Lem, Husband with his sallow face and shifty eyes. Even Sharna, who stood in the door to the kitchen squinting. They are going to take our horses no matter what I say, she realized. We’ll need to walk to Riverrun, unless . . . “We don’t want paper.” Arya slapped the parchment out of Hot Pie’s hand. “You can have our horses for that boat outside. But only if you show us how to work it.”
Tom Sevenstrings stared at her a moment, and then his wide homely mouth quirked into a rueful grin. He laughed aloud. Anguy joined in, and then they were all laughing, Lem Lemoncloak, Sharna and Husband, even the serving boy, who had stepped out from behind the casks with a crossbow under one arm. Arya wanted to scream at them, but instead she started to smile . . . 
“Riders!” Gendry’s shout was shrill with alarm. The door burst open and there he was. “Soldiers,” he panted. “Coming down the river road, a dozen of them.”
Hot Pie leapt up, knocking over his tankard, but Tom and the others were unpertubed. “There’s no cause for spilling good ale on my floor,” said Sharna. “Sit back down and calm yourself, boy, there’s rabbit coming. You too, girl. Whatever harm’s been done you, it’s over and it’s done and you’re with king’s men now. We’ll keep you safe as best we can.”
Arya’s only answer was to reach over her shoulder for her sword, but before she had it halfway drawn Lem grabbed her wrist. “We’ll have no more of that, now.” He twisted her arm until her hand opened. His fingers were hard with callus and fearsomely strong. Again! Arya thought. It’s happening again, like it happened in the village, with Chiswyck and Raff and the Mountain That Rides. They were going to steal her sword and turn her back into a mouse. Her free hand closed around her tankard, and she swung it at Lem’s face. The ale sloshed over the rim and splashed into his eyes, and she heard his nose break and saw the spurt of blood. When he roared his hands went to his face, and she was free. “Run!” she screamed, bolting.
But Lem was on her again at once, with his long legs that made one of his steps equal to three of hers. She twisted and kicked, but he yanked her off her feet effortlessly and held her dangling while the blood ran down his face.
“Stop it, you little fool,” he shouted, shaking her back and forth. “Stop it now!” Gendry moved to help her, until Tom Sevenstrings stepped in front of him with a dagger.
By then it was too late to flee. She could hear horses outside, and the sound of men’s voices. A moment later a man came swaggering through the open door, a Tyroshi even bigger than Lem with a great thick beard, bright green at the ends but growing out grey. Behind came a pair of crossbowmen helping a wounded man between them, and then others . . . 
A more ragged band Arya had never seen, but there was nothing ragged about the swords, axes, and bows they carried. One or two gave her curious glances as they entered, but no one said a word. A one-eyed man in a rusty pothelm sniffed the air and grinned, while an archer with a head of stiff yellow hair was shouting for ale. After them came a spearman in a lion-crested helm, an older man with a limp, a Braavosi sellsword, a . . . 
“Harwin?” Arya whispered. It was! Under the beard and the tangled hair was the face of Hullen’s son, who used to lead her pony around the yard, ride at quintain with Jon and Robb, and drink too much on feast days. He was thinner, harder somehow, and at Winterfell he had never worn a beard, but it was him—her father’s man. “Harwin!” Squirming, she threw herself forward, trying to wrench free of Lem’s iron grip. “It’s me,” she shouted, “Harwin, it’s me, don’t you know me, don’t you?” The tears came, and she found herself weeping like a baby, just like some stupid little girl. “Harwin, it’s me!”
Harwin’s eyes went from her face to the flayed man on her doublet. “How do you know me?” he said, frowning suspiciously. “The flayed man . . . who are you, some serving boy to Lord Leech?”
For a moment she did not know how to answer. She’d had so many names. Had she only dreamed Arya Stark? “I’m a girl,” she sniffed. “I was Lord Bolton’s cupbearer but he was going to leave me for the goat, so I ran off with Gendry and Hot Pie. You have to know me! You used to lead my pony, when I was little.”
His eyes went wide, “Gods be good,” he said in a choked voice. “Arya Underfoot? Lem, let go of her.”
“She broke my nose.” Lem dumped her unceremoniously to the floor. “Who in seven hells is she supposed to be?”
“The Hand’s daughter.” Harwin went to one knee before her. “Arya Stark, of Winterfell.”

The rains came and went, but there was more grey sky than blue, and all the streams were running high. On the morning of the third day, Arya noticed that the moss was growing mostly on the wrong side of the trees. “We’re going the wrong way,” she said to Gendry, as they rode past an especially mossy elm. “We’re going south. See how the moss is growing on the trunk?”
He pushed thick black hair from eyes and said, “We’re following the road, that’s all. The road goes south here.”
We’ve been going south all day, she wanted to tell him. And yesterday too, when we were riding along that streambed. But she hadn’t been paying close attention yesterday, so she couldn’t be certain. “I think we’re lost,” she said in a low voice. “We shouldn’t have left the river. All we had to do was follow it.”
“The river bends and loops,” said Gendry. “This is just a shorter way, I bet. Some secret outlaw way. Lem and Tom and them have been living here for years.”
That was true. Arya bit her lip. “But the moss . . .”
“The way it’s raining, we’ll have moss growing from our ears before long,” Gendry complained.
“Only from our south ear,” Arya declared stubbornly. There was no use trying to convince the Bull of anything. Still, he was the only true friend she had, now that Hot Pie had left them.
“Sharna says she needs me to bake bread,” he’d told her, the day they rode. “Anyhow I’m tired of rain and saddlesores and being scared all the time. There’s ale here, and rabbit to eat, and the bread will be better when I make it. You’ll see, when you come back. You will come back, won’t you? When the war’s done?” He remembered who she was then, and added, “My lady,” reddening.
Arya didn’t know if the war would ever be done, but she had nodded. “I’m sorry I beat you that time,” she said. Hot Pie was stupid and craven, but he’d been with her all the way from King’s Landing and she’d gotten used to him. “I broke your nose.”
“You broke Lem’s too.” Hot Pie grinned. “That was good.”
“Lem didn’t think so,” Arya said glumly. Then it was time to go. When Hot Pie asked if he might kiss milady’s hand, she punched his shoulder. “Don’t call me that. You’re Hot Pie, and I’m Arry.”
“I’m not Hot Pie here. Sharna just calls me Boy. The same as she calls the other boy. It’s going to be confusing.”
She missed him more than she thought she would, but Harwin made up for it some. She had told him about his father Hullen, and how she’d found him dying by the stables in the Red Keep, the day she fled. “He always said he’d die in a stable,” Harwin said, “but we all thought some bad-tempered stallion would be his death, not a pack of lions.” Arya told of Yoren and their escape from King’s Landing as well, and much that had happened since, but she left out the stableboy she’d stabbed with Needle, and the guard whose throat she’d cut to get out of Harrenhal. Telling Harwin would be almost like telling her father, and there were some things that she could not bear having her father know.
Nor did she speak of Jaqen H’ghar and the three deaths he’d owed and paid. The iron coin he’d given her Arya kept tucked away beneath her belt, but sometimes at night she would take it out and remember how his face had melted and changed when he ran his hand across it. “Valar morghulis,” she would say under her breath. “Ser Gregor, Dunsen, Polliver, Raff the Sweetling. The Tickler and the Hound. Ser Ilyn, Ser Meryn, Queen Cersei, King Joffrey.”
Only six Winterfell men remained of the twenty her father had sent west with Beric Dondarrion, Harwin told her, and they were scattered. “It was a trap, milady. Lord Tywin sent his Mountain across the Red Fork with fire and sword, hoping to draw your lord father. He planned for Lord Eddard to come west himself to deal with Gregor Clegane. If he had he would have been killed, or taken prisoner and traded for the Imp, who was your lady mother’s captive at the time. Only the Kingslayer never knew Lord Tywin’s plan, and when he heard about his brother’s capture he attacked your father in the streets of King’s Landing.”
“I remember,” said Arya. “He killed Jory.” Jory had always smiled at her, when he wasn’t telling her to get from underfoot.
“He killed Jory,” Harwin agreed, “and your father’s leg was broken when his horse fell on him. So Lord Eddard couldn’t go west. He sent Lord Beric instead, with twenty of his own men and twenty from Winterfell, me among them. There were others besides. Thoros and Ser Raymun Darry and their men, Ser Gladden Wylde, a lord named Lothar Mallery. But Gregor was waiting for us at the Mummer’s Ford, with men concealed on both banks. As we crossed he fell upon us from front and rear.
“I saw the Mountain slay Raymun Darry with a single blow so terrible that it took Darry’s arm off at the elbow and killed the horse beneath him too. Gladden Wylde died there with him, and Lord Mallery was ridden down and drowned. We had lions on every side, and I thought I was doomed with the rest, but Alyn shouted commands and restored order to our ranks, and those still ahorse rallied around Thoros and cut our way free. Six score we’d been that morning. By dark no more than two score were left, and Lord Beric was gravely wounded. Thoros drew a foot of lance from his chest that night, and poured boiling wine into the hole it left.
“Every man of us was certain his lordship would be dead by daybreak. But Thoros prayed with him all night beside the fire, and when dawn came, he was still alive, and stronger than he’d been. It was a fortnight before he could mount a horse, but his courage kept us strong. He told us that our war had not ended at the Mummer’s Ford, but only begun there, and that every man of ours who’d fallen would be avenged tenfold.
“By then the fighting had passed by us. The Mountain’s men were only the van of Lord Tywin’s host. They crossed the Red Fork in strength and swept up into the riverlands, burning everything in their path. We were so few that all we could do was harry their rear, but we told each other that we’d join up with King Robert when he marched west to crush Lord Tywin’s rebellion. Only then we heard that Robert was dead, and Lord Eddard as well, and Cersei Lannister’s whelp had ascended the Iron Throne.
“That turned the whole world on its head. We’d been sent out by the King’s Hand to deal with outlaws, you see, but now we were the outlaws, and Lord Tywin was the Hand of the King. There was some wanted to yield then, but Lord Beric wouldn’t hear of it. We were still king’s men, he said, and these were the king’s people the lions were savaging. If we could not fight for Robert, we would fight for them, until every man of us was dead. And so we did, but as we fought something queer happened. For every man we lost, two showed up to take his place. A few were knights or squires, of gentle birth, but most were common men—fieldhands and fiddlers and innkeeps, servants and shoemakers, even two septons. Men of all sorts, and women too, children, dogs . . .”
“Dogs?” said Arya.
“Aye.” Harwin grinned. “One of our lads keeps the meanest dogs you’d ever want to see.”
“I wish I had a good mean dog,” said Arya wistfully. “A lion-killing dog.” She’d had a direwolf once, Nymeria, but she’d thrown rocks at her until she fled, to keep the queen from killing her. Could a direwolf kill a lion? she wondered.
It rained again that afternoon, and long into the evening. Thankfully the outlaws had secret friends all over, so they did not need to camp out in the open or seek shelter beneath some leaky bower, as she and Hot Pie and Gendry had done so often.
That night they sheltered in a burned, abandoned village. At least it seemed to be abandoned, until Jack-Be-Lucky blew two short blasts and two long ones on his hunting horn. Then all sorts of people came crawling out of the ruins and up from secret cellars. They had ale and dried apples and some stale barley bread, and the outlaws had a goose that Anguy had brought down on the ride, so supper that night was almost a feast.
Arya was sucking the last bit of meat off a wing when one of the villagers turned to Lem Lemoncloak and said, “There were men through here not two days past, looking for the Kingslayer.”
Lem snorted. “They’d do better looking in Riverrun. Down in the deepest dungeons, where it’s nice and damp.” His nose looked like a squashed apple, red and raw and swollen, and his mood was foul.
“No,” another villager said. “He’s escaped.”
The Kingslayer. Arya could feel the hair on the back of her neck prickling. She held her breath to listen.
“Could that be true?” Tom o’ Sevens said.
“I’ll not believe it,” said the one-eyed man in the rusty pothelm. The other outlaws called him Jack-Be-Lucky, though losing an eye didn’t seem very lucky to Arya. “I’ve had me a taste o’ them dungeons. How could he escape?”
The villagers could only shrug at that. Greenbeard stroked his thick grey-and-green whiskers and said, “The wolves will drown in blood if the Kingslayer’s loose again. Thoros must be told. The Lord of Light will show him Lannister in the flames.”
“There’s a fine fire burning here,” said Anguy, smiling.
Greenbeard laughed, and cuffed the archer’s ear. “Do I look a priest to you, Archer? When Pello of Tyrosh peers into the fire, the cinders singe his beard.”
Lem cracked his knuckles and said, “Wouldn’t Lord Beric love to capture Jaime Lannister, though . . .”
“Would he hang him, Lem?” one of the village women asked. “It’d be half a shame to hang a man as pretty as that one.”
“A trial first!” said Anguy. “Lord Beric always gives them a trial, you know that.” He smiled. “Then he hangs them.”
There was laughter all around. Then Tom drew his fingers across the strings of his woodharp and broke into soft song.The brothers of the Kingswood,they were an outlaw band.The forest was their castle,but they roamed across the land.No man’s gold was safe from them,nor any maiden’s hand.Oh, the brothers of the Kingswood,that fearsome outlaw band . . . 
Warm and dry in a corner between Gendry and Harwin, Arya listened to the singing for a time, then closed her eyes and drifted off to sleep. She dreamt of home; not Riverrun, but Winterfell. It was not a good dream, though. She was alone outside the castle, up to her knees in mud. She could see the grey walls ahead of her, but when she tried to reach the gates every step seemed harder than the one before, and the castle faded before her, until it looked more like smoke than granite. And there were wolves as well, gaunt grey shapes stalking through the trees all around her, their eyes shining. Whenever she looked at them, she remembered the taste of blood.
The next morning they left the road to cut across the fields. The wind was gusting, sending dry brown leaves swirling around the hooves of their horses, but for once it did not rain. When the sun came out from behind a cloud, it was so bright Arya had to pull her hood forward to keep it out of her eyes.
She reined up very suddenly. “We are going the wrong way!”
Gendry groaned. “What is it, moss again?”
“Look at the sun,” she said. “We’re going south!” Arya rummaged in her saddlebag for the map, so she could show them. “We should never have left the Trident. See.” She unrolled the map on her leg. All of them were looking at her now. “See, there’s Riverrun, between the rivers.”
“As it happens,” said Jack-Be-Lucky, “we know where Riverrun is. Every man o’ us.”
“You’re not going to Riverrun,” Lem told her bluntly.
I was almost there, Arya thought. I should have let them take our horses. I could have walked the rest of the way. She remembered her dream then, and bit her lip.
“Ah, don’t look so hurt, child,” said Tom Sevenstrings. “No harm will come to you, you have my word on that.”
“The word of a liar!”
“No one lied,” said Lem. “We made no promises. It’s not for us to say what’s to be done with you.”
Lem was not the leader, though, no more than Tom; that was Greenbeard, the Tyroshi. Arya turned to face him. “Take me to Riverrun and you’ll be rewarded,” she said desperately.
“Little one,” Greenbeard answered, “a peasant may skin a common squirrel for his pot, but if he finds a gold squirrel in his tree he takes it to his lord, or he will wish he did.”
“I’m not a squirrel,” Arya insisted.
“You are.” Greenbeard laughed. “A little gold squirrel who’s off to see the lightning lord, whether she wills it or not. He’ll know what’s to be done with you. I’ll wager he sends you back to your lady mother, just as you wish.”
Tom Sevenstrings nodded. “Aye, that’s like Lord Beric. He’ll do right by you, see if he don’t.”
Lord Beric Dondarrion. Arya remembered all she’d heard at Harrenhal, from the Lannisters and the Bloody Mummers alike. Lord Beric the wisp o’ the wood. Lord Beric who’d been killed by Vargo Hoat and before that by Ser Amory Lorch, and twice by the Mountain That Rides. If he won’t send me home maybe I’ll kill him too. “Why do I have to see Lord Beric?” she asked quietly.
“We bring him all our highborn captives,” said Anguy.
Captive. Arya took a breath to still her soul. Calm as still water. She glanced at the outlaws on their horses, and turned her horse’s head. Now, quick as a snake, she thought, as she slammed her heels into the courser’s flank. Right between Greenbeard and Jack-Be-Lucky she flew, and caught one glimpse of Gendry’s startled face as his mare moved out of her way. And then she was in the open field, and running.
North or south, east or west, that made no matter now. She could find the way to Riverrun later, once she’d lost them. Arya leaned forward in the saddle and urged the horse to a gallop. Behind her the outlaws were cursing and shouting at her to come back. She shut her ears to the calls, but when she glanced back over her shoulder four of them were coming after her, Anguy and Harwin and Greenbeard racing side by side with Lem farther back, his big yellow cloak flapping behind him as he rode. “Swift as a deer,” she told her mount. “Run, now, run.”
Arya dashed across brown weedy fields, through waist-high grass and piles of dry leaves that flurried and flew when her horse galloped past. There were woods to her left, she saw. I can lose them there. A dry ditch ran along one side of the field, but she leapt it without breaking stride, and plunged in among the stand of elm and yew and birch trees. A quick peek back showed Anguy and Harwin still hard on her heels. Greenbeard had fallen behind, though, and she could not see Lem at all. “Faster,” she told her horse, “you can, you can.”
Between two elms she rode, and never paused to see which side the moss was growing on. She leapt a rotten log and swung wide around a monstrous deadfall, jagged with broken branches. Then up a gentle slope and down the other side, slowing and speeding up again, her horse’s shoes striking sparks off the flintstones underfoot. At the top of the hill she glanced back. Harwin had pushed ahead of Anguy, but both were coming hard. Greenbeard had fallen further back and seemed to be flagging.
A stream barred her way. She splashed down into it, through water choked with wet brown leaves. Some clung to her horse’s legs as they climbed the other side. The undergrowth was thicker here, the ground so full of roots and rocks that she had to slow, but she kept as good a pace as she dared. Another hill before her, this one steeper. Up she went, and down again. How big are these woods? she wondered. She had the faster horse, she knew that, she had stolen one of Roose Bolton’s best from the stables at Harrenhal, but his speed was wasted here. I need to find the fields again. I need to find a road. Instead she found a game trail. It was narrow and uneven, but it was something. She raced along it, branches whipping at her face. One snagged her hood and yanked it back, and for half a heartbeat she feared they had caught her. A vixen burst from the brush as she passed, startled by the fury of her flight. The game trail brought her to another stream. Or was it the same one? Had she gotten turned around? There was no time to puzzle it out, she could hear their horses crashing through the trees behind her. Thorns scratched at her face like the cats she used to chase in King’s Landing. Sparrows exploded from the branches of an alder. But the trees were thinning now, and suddenly she was out of them. Broad level fields stretched before her, all weeds and wild wheat, sodden and trampled. Arya kicked her horse back to a gallop. Run, she thought, run for Riverrun, run for home. Had she lost them? She took one quick look, and there was Harwin six yards back and gaining. No, she thought, no, he can’t, not him, it isn’t fair.
Both horses were lathered and flagging by the time he came up beside her, reached over, and grabbed her bridle. Arya was breathing hard herself then. She knew the fight was done. “You ride like a northman, milady,” Harwin said when he’d drawn them to a halt. “Your aunt was the same. Lady Lyanna. But my father was master of horse, remember.”
The look she gave him was full of hurt. “I thought you were my father’s man.”
“Lord Eddard’s dead, milady. I belong to the lightning lord now, and to my brothers.”
“What brothers?” Old Hullen had fathered no other sons that Arya could remember.
“Anguy, Lem, Tom o’ Sevens, Jack and Greenbeard, all of them. We mean your brother Robb no ill, milady . . . but it’s not him we fight for. He has an army all his own, and many a great lord to bend the knee. The smallfolk have only us.” He gave her a searching look. “Can you understand what I am telling you?”
“Yes.” That he was not Robb’s man, she understood well enough. And that she was his captive. I could have stayed with Hot Pie. We could have taken the little boat and sailed it up to Riverrun. She had been better off as Squab. No one would take Squab captive, or Nan, or Weasel, or Arry the orphan boy. I was a wolf, she thought, but now I’m just some stupid little lady again.
“Will you ride back peaceful now,” Harwin asked her, “or must I tie you up and throw you across your horse?”
“I’ll ride peaceful,” she said sullenly. For now.

The small square keep was half a ruin, and so too the great grey knight who lived there. He was so old he did not understand their questions. No matter what was said to him, he would only smile and mutter, “I held the bridge against Ser Maynard. Red hair and a black temper, he had, but he could not move me. Six wounds I took before I killed him. Six!”
The maester who cared for him was a young man, thankfully. After the old knight had drifted to sleep in his chair, he took them aside and said, “I fear you seek a ghost. We had a bird, ages ago, half a year at least. The Lannisters caught Lord Beric near the Gods Eye. He was hanged.”
“Aye, hanged he was, but Thoros cut him down before he died.” Lem’s broken nose was not so red or swollen as it had been, but it was healing crooked, giving his face a lopsided look. “His lordship’s a hard man to kill, he is.”
“And a hard man to find, it would seem,” the maester said. “Have you asked the Lady of the Leaves?”
“We shall,” said Greenbeard.
The next morning, as they crossed the little stone bridge behind the keep, Gendry wondered if this was the bridge the old man had fought over. No one knew. “Most like it is,” said Jack-Be-Lucky. “Don’t see no other bridges.”
“You’d know for certain if there was a song,” said Tom Sevenstrings. “One good song, and we’d know who Ser Maynard used to be and why he wanted to cross this bridge so bad. Poor old Lychester might be as far famed as the Dragonknight if he’d only had sense enough to keep a singer.”
“Lord Lychester’s sons died in Robert’s Rebellion,” grumbled Lem. “Some on one side, some on t’other. He’s not been right in the head since. No bloody song’s like to help any o’ that.”
“What did the maester mean, about asking the Lady of the Leaves?” Arya asked Anguy as they rode.
The archer smiled. “Wait and see.”
Three days later, as they rode through a yellow wood, Jack-Be-Lucky unslung his horn and blew a signal, a different one than before. The sounds had scarcely died away when rope ladders unrolled from the limbs of trees. “Hobble the horses and up we go,” said Tom, half singing the words. They climbed to a hidden village in the upper branches, a maze of rope walkways and little moss-covered houses concealed behind walls of red and gold, and were taken to the Lady of the Leaves, a stick-thin white-haired woman dressed in roughspun. “We cannot stay here much longer, with autumn on us,” she told them. “A dozen wolves went down the Hayford road nine days past, hunting. If they’d chanced to look up they might have seen us.”
“You’ve not seen Lord Beric?” asked Tom Sevenstrings.
“He’s dead.” The woman sounded sick. “The Mountain caught him, and drove a dagger through his eye. A begging brother told us. He had it from the lips of a man who saw it happen.”
“That’s an old stale tale, and false,” said Lem. “The lightning lord’s not so easy to kill. Ser Gregor might have put his eye out, but a man don’t die o’ that. Jack could tell you.”
“Well, I never did,” said one-eyed Jack-Be-Lucky. “My father got himself good and hanged by Lord Piper’s bailiff, my brother Wat got sent to the Wall, and the Lannisters killed my other brothers. An eye, that’s nothing.”
“You swear he’s not dead?” The woman clutched Lem’s arm. “Bless you, Lem, that’s the best tidings we’ve had in half a year. May the Warrior defend him, and the red priest too.”
The next night they found shelter beneath the scorched shell of a sept, in a burned village called Sallydance. Only shards remained of its windows of leaded glass, and the aged septon who greeted them said the looters had even made off with the Mother’s costly robes, the Crone’s gilded lantern, and the silver crown the Father had worn. “They hacked the Maiden’s breasts off too, though those were only wood,” he told them. “And the eyes, the eyes were jet and lapis and mother-of-pearl, they pried them out with their knives. May the Mother have mercy on them all.”
“Whose work was this?” said Lem Lemoncloak. “Mummers?”
“No,” the old man said. “Northmen, they were. Savages who worship trees. They wanted the Kingslayer, they said.”
Arya heard him, and chewed her lip. She could feel Gendry looking at her. It made her angry and ashamed.
There were a dozen men living in the vault beneath the sept, amongst cobwebs and roots and broken wine casks, but they had no word of Beric Dondarrion either. Not even their leader, who wore soot-blackened armor and a crude lightning bolt on his cloak. When Greenbeard saw Arya staring at him, he laughed and said, “The lightning lord is everywhere and nowhere, skinny squirrel.”
“I’m not a squirrel,” she said. “I’ll almost be a woman soon. I’ll be one-and-ten.”
“Best watch out I don’t marry you, then!” He tried to tickle her under the chin, but Arya slapped his stupid hand away.
Lem and Gendry played tiles with their hosts that night, while Tom Sevenstrings sang a silly song about Big Belly Ben and the High Septon’s goose. Anguy let Arya try his longbow, but no matter how hard she bit her lip she could not draw it. “You need a lighter bow, milady,” the freckled bowman said. “If there’s seasoned wood at Riverrun, might be I’ll make you one.”
Tom overheard him, and broke off his song. “You’re a young fool, Archer. If we go to Riverrun it will only be to collect her ransom, won’t be no time for you to sit about making bows. Be thankful if you get out with your hide. Lord Hoster was hanging outlaws before you were shaving. And that son of his . . . a man who hates music can’t be trusted, I always say.”
“It’s not music he hates,” said Lem. “It’s you, fool.”
“Well, he has no cause. The wench was willing to make a man of him, is it my fault he drank too much to do the deed?”
Lem snorted through his broken nose. “Was it you who made a song of it, or some other bloody arse in love with his own voice?”
“I only sang it the once,” Tom complained. “And who’s to say the song was about him? ’Twas a song about a fish.”
“A floppy fish,” said Anguy, laughing.
Arya didn’t care what Tom’s stupid songs were about. She turned to Harwin. “What did he mean about ransom?”
“We have sore need of horses, milady. Armor as well. Swords, shields, spears. All the things coin can buy. Aye, and seed for planting. Winter is coming, remember?” He touched her under the chin. “You will not be the first highborn captive we’ve ransomed. Nor the last, I’d hope.”
That much was true, Arya knew. Knights were captured and ransomed all the time, and sometimes women were too. But what if Robb won’t pay their price? She wasn’t a famous knight, and kings were supposed to put the realm before their sisters. And her lady mother, what would she say? Would she still want her back, after all the things she’d done? Arya chewed her lip and wondered.
The next day they rode to a place called High Heart, a hill so lofty that from atop it Arya felt as though she could see half the world. Around its brow stood a ring of huge pale stumps, all that remained of a circle of once-mighty weirwoods. Arya and Gendry walked around the hill to count them. There were thirty-one, some so wide that she could have used them for a bed.
High Heart had been sacred to the children of the forest, Tom Sevenstrings told her, and some of their magic lingered here still. “No harm can ever come to those as sleep here,” the singer said. Arya thought that must be true; the hill was so high and the surrounding lands so flat that no enemy could approach unseen.
The smallfolk hereabouts shunned the place, Tom told her; it was said to be haunted by the ghosts of the children of the forest who had died here when the Andal king named Erreg the Kinslayer had cut down their grove. Arya knew about the children of the forest, and about the Andals too, but ghosts did not frighten her. She used to hide in the crypts of Winterfell when she was little, and play games of come-into-my-castle and monsters and maidens amongst the stone kings on their thrones.
Yet even so, the hair on the back of her neck stood up that night. She had been asleep, but the storm woke her. The wind pulled the coverlet right off her and sent it swirling into the bushes. When she went after it she heard voices.
Beside the embers of their campfire, she saw Tom, Lem, and Greenbeard talking to a tiny little woman, a foot shorter than Arya and older than Old Nan, all stooped and wrinkled and leaning on a gnarled black cane. Her white hair was so long it came almost to the ground. When the wind gusted it blew about her head in a fine cloud. Her flesh was whiter, the color of milk, and it seemed to Arya that her eyes were red, though it was hard to tell from the bushes. “The old gods stir and will not let me sleep,” she heard the woman say. “I dreamt I saw a shadow with a burning heart butchering a golden stag, aye. I dreamt of a man without a face, waiting on a bridge that swayed and swung. On his shoulder perched a drowned crow with seaweed hanging from his wings. I dreamt of a roaring river and a woman that was a fish. Dead she drifted, with red tears on her cheeks, but when her eyes did open, oh, I woke from terror. All this I dreamt, and more. Do you have gifts for me, to pay me for my dreams?”
“Dreams,” grumbled Lem Lemoncloak, “what good are dreams? Fish women and drowned crows. I had a dream myself last night. I was kissing this tavern wench I used to know. Are you going to pay me for that, old woman?”
“The wench is dead,” the woman hissed. “Only worms may kiss her now.” And then to Tom Sevenstrings she said, “I’ll have my song or I’ll have you gone.”
So the singer played for her, so soft and sad that Arya only heard snatches of the words, though the tune was half-familiar. Sansa would know it, I bet. Her sister had known all the songs, and she could even play a little, and sing so sweetly. All I could ever do was shout the words.
The next morning the little white woman was nowhere to be seen. As they saddled their horses, Arya asked Tom Sevenstrings if the children of the forest still dwelled on High Heart. The singer chuckled. “Saw her, did you?”
“Was she a ghost?”
“Do ghosts complain of how their joints creak? No, she’s only an old dwarf woman. A queer one, though, and evil-eyed. But she knows things she has no business knowing, and sometimes she’ll tell you if she likes the look of you.”
“Did she like the looks of you?” Arya asked doubtfully.
The singer laughed. “The sound of me, at least. She always makes me sing the same bloody song, though. Not a bad song, mind you, but I know others just as good.” He shook his head. “What matters is, we have the scent now. You’ll soon be seeing Thoros and the lightning lord, I’ll wager.”
“If you’re their men, why do they hide from you?”
Tom Sevenstrings rolled his eyes at that, but Harwin gave her an answer. “I wouldn’t call it hiding, milady, but it’s true, Lord Beric moves about a lot, and seldom lets on what his plans are. That way no one can betray him. By now there must be hundreds of us sworn to him, maybe thousands, but it wouldn’t do for us all to trail along behind him. We’d eat the country bare, or get butchered in a battle by some bigger host. The way we’re scattered in little bands, we can strike in a dozen places at once, and be off somewhere else before they know. And when one of us is caught and put to the question, well, we can’t tell them where to find Lord Beric no matter what they do to us.” He hesitated. “You know what it means, to be put to the question?”
Arya nodded. “Tickling, they called it. Polliver and Raff and all.” She told them about the village by the Gods Eye where she and Gendry had been caught, and the questions that the Tickler had asked. “Is there gold hidden in the village?” he would always begin. “Silver, gems? Is there food? Where is Lord Beric? Which of you village folk helped him? Where did he go? How many men did he have with him? How many knights? How many bowmen? How many were horsed? How are they armed? How many wounded? Where did they go, did you say?” Just thinking of it, she could hear the shrieks again, and smell the stench of blood and shit and burning flesh. “He always asked the same questions,” she told the outlaws solemnly, “but he changed the tickling every day.”
“No child should be made to suffer that,” Harwin said when she was done. “The Mountain lost half his men at the Stone Mill, we hear. Might be this Tickler’s floating down the Red Fork even now, with fish biting at his face. If not, well, it’s one more crime they’ll answer for. I’ve heard his lordship say this war began when the Hand sent him out to bring the king’s justice to Gregor Clegane, and that’s how he means for it to end.” He gave her shoulder a reassuring pat. “You best mount up, milady. It’s a long day’s ride to Acorn Hall, but at the end of it we’ll have a roof above our heads and a hot supper in our bellies.”
It was a long day’s ride, but as dusk was settling they forded a brook and came up on Acorn Hall, with its stone curtain walls and great oaken keep. Its master was away fighting in the retinue of his master, Lord Vance, the castle gates closed and barred in his absence. But his lady wife was an old friend of Tom Sevenstrings, and Anguy said they’d once been lovers. Anguy often rode beside her; he was closer to her in age than any of them but Gendry, and he told her droll tales of the Dornish Marches. He never fooled her, though. He’s not my friend. He’s only staying close to watch me and make sure I don’t ride off again. Well, Arya could watch as well. Syrio Forel had taught her how.
Lady Smallwood welcomed the outlaws kindly enough, though she gave them a tongue lashing for dragging a young girl through the war. She became even more wroth when Lem let slip that Arya was highborn. “Who dressed the poor child in those Bolton rags?” she demanded of them. “That badge . . . there’s many a man who would hang her in half a heartbeat for wearing a flayed man on her breast.” Arya promptly found herself marched upstairs, forced into a tub, and doused with scalding hot water. Lady Smallwood’s maidservants scrubbed her so hard it felt like they were flaying her themselves. They even dumped in some stinky-sweet stuff that smelled like flowers.
And afterward, they insisted she dress herself in girl’s things, brown woolen stockings and a light linen shift, and over that a light green gown with acorns embroidered all over the bodice in brown thread, and more acorns bordering the hem. “My great-aunt is a septa at a motherhouse in Oldtown,” Lady Smallwood said as the women laced the gown up Arya’s back. “I sent my daughter there when the war began. She’ll have outgrown these things by the time she returns, no doubt. Are you fond of dancing, child? My Carellen’s a lovely dancer. She sings beautifully as well. What do you like to do?”
She scuffed a toe amongst the rushes. “Needlework.”
“Very restful, isn’t it?”
“Well,” said Arya, “not the way I do it.”
“No? I have always found it so. The gods give each of us our little gifts and talents, and it is meant for us to use them, my aunt always says. Any act can be a prayer, if done as well as we are able. Isn’t that a lovely thought? Remember that the next time you do your needlework. Do you work at it every day?”
“I did till I lost Needle. My new one’s not as good.”
“In times like these, we all must make do as best we can.” Lady Smallwood fussed at the bodice of the gown. “Now you look a proper young lady.”
I’m not a lady, Arya wanted to tell her, I’m a wolf.
“I do not know who you are, child,” the woman said, “and it may be that’s for the best. Someone important, I fear.” She smoothed down Arya’s collar. “In times like these, it is better to be insignificant. Would that I could keep you here with me. That would not be safe, though. I have walls, but too few men to hold them.” She sighed.
Supper was being served in the hall by the time Arya was all washed and combed and dressed. Gendry took one look and laughed so hard that wine came out his nose, until Harwin gave him a thwack alongside his ear. The meal was plain but filling; mutton and mushrooms, brown bread, pease pudding, and baked apples with yellow cheese. When the food had been cleared and the servants sent away, Greenbeard lowered his voice to ask if her ladyship had word of the lightning lord.
“Word?” She smiled. “They were here not a fortnight past. Them and a dozen more, driving sheep. I could scarcely believe my eyes. Thoros gave me three as thanks. You’ve eaten one tonight.”
“Thoros herding sheep?” Anguy laughed aloud.
“I grant you it was an odd sight, but Thoros claimed that as a priest he knew how to tend a flock.”
“Aye, and shear them too,” chuckled Lem Lemoncloak.
“Someone could make a rare fine song of that.” Tom plucked a string on his woodharp.
Lady Smallwood gave him a withering look. “Someone who doesn’t rhyme carry on with Dondarrion, perhaps. Or play ‘Oh, Lay My Sweet Lass Down in the Grass’ to every milkmaid in the shire and leave two of them with big bellies.”
“It was ‘Let Me Drink Your Beauty,’” said Tom defensively, “and milkmaids are always glad to hear it. As was a certain highborn lady I do recall. I play to please.”
Her nostrils flared. “The riverlands are full of maids you’ve pleased, all drinking tansy tea. You’d think a man as old as you would know to spill his seed on their bellies. Men will be calling you Tom Sevensons before much longer.”
“As it happens,” said Tom, “I passed seven many years ago. And fine boys they are too, with voices sweet as nightingales.” Plainly he did not care for the subject.
“Did his lordship say where he was bound, milady?” asked Harwin.
“Lord Beric never shares his plans, but there’s hunger down near Stoney Sept and the Threepenny Wood. I should look for him there.” She took a sip of wine. “You’d best know, I’ve had less pleasant callers as well. A pack of wolves came howling around my gates, thinking I might have Jaime Lannister in here.”
Tom stopped his plucking. “Then it’s true, the Kingslayer is loose again?”
Lady Smallwood gave him a scornful look. “I hardly think they’d be hunting him if he was chained up under Riverrun.”
“What did m’lady tell them?” asked Jack-Be-Lucky.
“Why, that I had Ser Jaime naked in my bed, but I’d left him much too exhausted to come down. One of them had the effrontery to call me a liar, so we saw them off with a few quarrels. I believe they made for Blackbottom Bend.”
Arya squirmed restlessly in her seat. “What northmen was it, who came looking after the Kingslayer?”
Lady Smallwood seemed surprised that she’d spoken. “They did not give their names, child, but they wore black, with the badge of a white sun on the breast.”
A white sun on black was the sigil of Lord Karstark, Arya thought. Those were Robb’s men. She wondered if they were still close. If she could give the outlaws the slip and find them, maybe they would take her to her mother at Riverrun . . . 
“Did they say how Lannister came to escape?” Lem asked.
“They did,” said Lady Smallwood. “Not that I believe a word of it. They claimed that Lady Catelyn set him free.”
That startled Tom so badly he snapped a string. “Go on with you,” he said. “That’s madness.”
It’s not true, thought Arya. It couldn’t be true.
“I thought the same,” said Lady Smallwood.
That was when Harwin remembered Arya. “Such talk is not for your ears, milady.”
“No, I want to hear.”
The outlaws were adamant. “Go on with you, skinny squirrel,” said Greenbeard. “Be a good little lady and go play in the yard while we talk, now.”
Arya stalked away angry, and would have slammed the door if it hadn’t been so heavy. Darkness had settled over Acorn Hall. A few torches burned along the walls, but that was all. The gates of the little castle were closed and barred. She had promised Harwin that she would not try and run away again, she knew, but that was before they started telling lies about her mother.
“Arya?” Gendry had followed her out. “Lady Smallwood said there’s a smithy. Want to have a look?”
“If you want.” She had nothing else to do.
“This Thoros,” Gendry said as they walked past the kennels, “is he the same Thoros who lived in the castle at King’s Landing? A red priest, fat, with a shaved head?”
“I think so.” Arya had never spoken to Thoros at King’s Landing that she could recall, but she knew who he was. He and Jalabhar Xho had been the most colorful figures at Robert’s court, and Thoros was a great friend of the king as well.
“He won’t remember me, but he used to come to our forge.” The Smallwood forge had not been used in some time, though the smith had hung his tools neatly on the wall. Gendry lit a candle and set it on the anvil while he took down a pair of tongs. “My master always scolded him about his flaming swords. It was no way to treat good steel, he’d say, but this Thoros never used good steel. He’d just dip some cheap sword in wildfire and set it alight. It was only an alchemist’s trick, my master said, but it scared the horses and some of the greener knights.”
She screwed up her face, trying to remember if her father had ever talked about Thoros. “He isn’t very priestly, is he?”
“No,” Gendry admitted. “Master Mott said Thoros could outdrink even King Robert. They were pease in a pod, he told me, both gluttons and sots.”
“You shouldn’t call the king a sot.” Maybe King Robert had drunk a lot, but he’d been her father’s friend.
“I was talking about Thoros.” Gendry reached out with the tongs as if to pinch her face, but Arya swatted them away. “He liked feasts and tourneys, that was why King Robert was so fond of him. And this Thoros was brave. When the walls of Pyke crashed down, he was the first through the breach. He fought with one of his flaming swords, setting ironmen afire with every slash.”
“I wish I had a flaming sword.” Arya could think of lots of people she’d like to set on fire.
“It’s only a trick, I told you. The wildfire ruins the steel. My master sold Thoros a new sword after every tourney. Every time they would have a fight about the price.” Gendry hung the tongs back up and took down the heavy hammer. “Master Mott said it was time I made my first longsword. He gave me a sweet piece of steel, and I knew just how I wanted to shape the blade. Only Yoren came, and took me away for the Night’s Watch.”
“You can still make swords if you want,” said Arya. “You can make them for my brother Robb when we get to Riverrun.”
“Riverrun.” Gendry put the hammer down and looked at her. “You look different now. Like a proper little girl.”
“I look like an oak tree, with all these stupid acorns.”
“Nice, though. A nice oak tree.” He stepped closer, and sniffed at her. “You even smell nice for a change.”
“You don’t. You stink.” Arya shoved him back against the anvil and made to run, but Gendry caught her arm. She stuck a foot between his legs and tripped him, but he yanked her down with him, and they rolled across the floor of the smithy. He was very strong, but she was quicker. Every time he tried to hold her still she wriggled free and punched him. Gendry only laughed at the blows, which made her mad. He finally caught both her wrists in one hand and started to tickle her with the other, so Arya slammed her knee between his legs, and wrenched free. Both of them were covered in dirt, and one sleeve was torn on her stupid acorn dress. “I bet I don’t look so nice now,” she shouted.
Tom was singing when they returned to the hall.My featherbed is deep and soft,and there I’ll lay you down,I’ll dress you all in yellow silk,and on your head a crown.For you shall be my lady love,and I shall be your lord.I’ll always keep you warm and safe,and guard you with my sword.
Harwin took one look at them and burst out laughing, and Anguy smiled one of his stupid freckly smiles and said, “Are we certain this one is a highborn lady?” But Lem Lemoncloak gave Gendry a clout alongside the head. “You want to fight, fight with me! She’s a girl, and half your age! You keep your hands off o’ her, you hear me?”
“I started it,” said Arya. “Gendry was just talking.”
“Leave the boy, Lem,” said Harwin. “Arya did start it, I have no doubt. She was much the same at Winterfell.”
Tom winked at her as he sang:And how she smiled and how she laughed,the maiden of the tree.She spun away and said to him,no featherbed for me.I’ll wear a gown of golden leaves,and bind my hair with grass,But you can be my forest love,and me your forest lass.
“I have no gowns of leaves,” said Lady Smallwood with a small fond smile, “but Carellen left some other dresses that might serve. Come, child, let us go upstairs and see what we can find.”
It was even worse than before; Lady Smallwood insisted that Arya take another bath, and cut and comb her hair besides; the dress she put her in this time was sort of lilac-colored, and decorated with little baby pearls. The only good thing about it was that it was so delicate that no one could expect her to ride in it. So the next morning as they broke their fast, Lady Smallwood gave her breeches, belt, and tunic to wear, and a brown doeskin jerkin dotted with iron studs. “They were my son’s things,” she said. “He died when he was seven.”
“I’m sorry, my lady.” Arya suddenly felt bad for her, and ashamed. “I’m sorry I tore the acorn dress too. It was pretty.”
“Yes, child. And so are you. Be brave.”

Stoney Sept was the biggest town Arya had seen since King’s Landing, and Harwin said her father had won a famous battle here.
“The Mad King’s men had been hunting Robert, trying to catch him before he could rejoin your father,” he told her as they rode toward the gate. “He was wounded, being tended by some friends, when Lord Connington the Hand took the town with a mighty force and started searching house by house. Before they could find him, though, Lord Eddard and your grandfather came down on the town and stormed the walls. Lord Connington fought back fierce. They battled in the streets and alleys, even on the rooftops, and all the septons rang their bells so the smallfolk would know to lock their doors. Robert came out of hiding to join the fight when the bells began to ring. He slew six men that day, they say. One was Myles Mooton, a famous knight who’d been Prince Rhaegar’s squire. He would have slain the Hand too, but the battle never brought them together. Connington wounded your grandfather Tully sore, though, and killed Ser Denys Arryn, the darling of the Vale. But when he saw the day was lost, he flew off as fast as the griffins on his shield. The Battle of the Bells, they called it after. Robert always said your father won it, not him.”
More recent battles had been fought here as well, Arya thought from the look of the place. The town gates were made of raw new wood; outside the walls a pile of charred planks remained to tell what had happened to the old ones.
Stoney Sept was closed up tight, but when the captain of the gate saw who they were, he opened a sally port for them. “How you fixed for food?” Tom asked as they entered.
“Not so bad as we were. The Huntsman brought in a flock o’ sheep, and there’s been some trading across the Blackwater. The harvest wasn’t burned south o’ the river. Course, there’s plenty want to take what we got. Wolves one day, Mummers the next. Them that’s not looking for food are looking for plunder, or women to rape, and them that’s not out for gold or wenches are looking for the bloody Kingslayer. Talk is, he slipped right through Lord Edmure’s fingers.”
“Lord Edmure?” Lem frowned. “Is Lord Hoster dead, then?”
“Dead or dying. Think Lannister might be making for the Blackwater? It’s the quickest way to King’s Landing, the Huntsman swears.” The captain did not wait for an answer. “He took his dogs out for a sniff round. If Ser Jaime’s hereabouts, they’ll find him. I’ve seen them dogs rip bears apart. Think they’ll like the taste of lion blood?”
“A chewed-up corpse’s no good to no one,” said Lem. “The Huntsman bloody well knows that, too.”
“When the westermen came through they raped the Huntsman’s wife and sister, put his crops to the torch, ate half his sheep, and killed the other half for spite. Killed six dogs too, and threw the carcasses down his well. A chewed-up corpse would be plenty good enough for him, I’d say. Me as well.”
“He’d best not,” said Lem. “That’s all I got to say. He’d best not, and you’re a bloody fool.”
Arya rode between Harwin and Anguy as the outlaws moved down the streets where her father once had fought. She could see the sept on its hill, and below it a stout strong holdfast of grey stone that looked much too small for such a big town. But every third house they passed was a blackened shell, and she saw no people. “Are all the townfolk dead?”
“Only shy.” Anguy pointed out two bowmen on a roof, and some boys with sooty faces crouched in the rubble of an alehouse. Farther on, a baker threw open a shuttered window and shouted down to Lem. The sound of his voice brought more people out of hiding, and Stoney Sept slowly seemed to come to life around them.
In the market square at the town’s heart stood a fountain in the shape of a leaping trout, spouting water into a shallow pool. Women were filling pails and flagons there. A few feet away, a dozen iron cages hung from creaking wooden posts. Crow cages, Arya knew. The crows were mostly outside the cages, splashing in the water or perched atop the bars; inside were men. Lem reined up scowling. “What’s this, now?”
“Justice,” answered a woman at the fountain.
“What, did you run short o’ hempen rope?”
“Was this done at Ser Wilbert’s decree?” asked Tom.
A man laughed bitterly. “The lions killed Ser Wilbert a year ago. His sons are all off with the Young Wolf, getting fat in the west. You think they give a damn for the likes of us? It was the Mad Huntsman caught these wolves.”
Wolves. Arya went cold. Robb’s men, and my father’s. She felt drawn toward the cages. The bars allowed so little room that prisoners could neither sit nor turn; they stood naked, exposed to sun and wind and rain. The first three cages held dead men. Carrion crows had eaten out their eyes, yet the empty sockets seemed to follow her. The fourth man in the row stirred as she passed. Around his mouth his ragged beard was thick with blood and flies. They exploded when he spoke, buzzing around his head. “Water.” The word was a croak. “Please . . . water . . .”
The man in the next cage opened his eyes at the sound. “Here,” he said. “Here, me.” An old man, he was; his beard was grey and his scalp was bald and mottled brown with age.
There was another dead man beyond the old one, a big red-bearded man with a rotting grey bandage covering his left ear and part of his temple. But the worst thing was between his legs, where nothing remained but a crusted brown hole crawling with maggots. Farther down was a fat man. The crow cage was so cruelly narrow it was hard to see how they’d ever gotten him inside. The iron dug painfully into his belly, squeezing bulges out between the bars. Long days baking in the sun had burned him a painful red from head to heel. When he shifted his weight, his cage creaked and swayed, and Arya could see pale white stripes where the bars had shielded his flesh from the sun.
“Whose men were you?” she asked them.
At the sound of her voice, the fat man opened his eyes. The skin around them was so red they looked like boiled eggs floating in a dish of blood. “Water . . . a drink . . .”
“Whose?” she said again.
“Pay them no mind, boy,” the townsman told her. “They’re none o’ your concern. Ride on by.”
“What did they do?” she asked him.
“They put eight people to the sword at Tumbler’s Falls,” he said. “They wanted the Kingslayer, but he wasn’t there so they did some rape and murder.” He jerked a thumb toward the corpse with maggots where his manhood ought to be. “That one there did the raping. Now move along.”
“A swallow,” the fat one called down. “Ha’ mercy, boy, a swallow.” The old one slid an arm up to grasp the bars. The motion made his cage swing violently. “Water,” gasped the one with the flies in his beard.
She looked at their filthy hair and scraggly beards and reddened eyes, at their dry, cracked, bleeding lips. Wolves, she thought again. Like me. Was this her pack? How could they be Robb’s men? She wanted to hit them. She wanted to hurt them. She wanted to cry. They all seemed to be looking at her, the living and the dead alike. The old man had squeezed three fingers out between the bars. “Water,” he said, “water.”
Arya swung down from her horse. They can’t hurt me, they’re dying. She took her cup from her bedroll and went to the fountain. “What do you think you’re doing, boy?” the townsman snapped. “They’re no concern o’ yours.” She raised the cup to the fish’s mouth. The water splashed across her fingers and down her sleeve, but Arya did not move until the cup was brimming over. When she turned back toward the cages, the townsman moved to stop her. “You get away from them, boy—”
“She’s a girl,” said Harwin. “Leave her be.”
“Aye,” said Lem. “Lord Beric don’t hold with caging men to die of thirst. Why don’t you hang them decent?”
“There was nothing decent ’bout them things they did at Tumbler’s Falls,” the townsman growled right back at him.
The bars were too narrow to pass a cup through, but Harwin and Gendry offered her a leg up. She planted a foot in Harwin’s cupped hands, vaulted onto Gendry’s shoulders, and grabbed the bars on top of the cage. The fat man turned his face up and pressed his cheek to the iron, and Arya poured the water over him. He sucked at it eagerly and let it run down over his head and cheeks and hands, and then he licked the dampness off the bars. He would have licked Arya’s fingers if she hadn’t snatched them back. By the time she served the other two the same, a crowd had gathered to watch her. “The Mad Huntsman will hear of this,” a man threatened. “He won’t like it. No, he won’t.”
“He’ll like this even less, then.” Anguy strung his longbow, slid an arrow from his quiver, nocked, drew, loosed. The fat man shuddered as the shaft drove up between his chins, but the cage would not let him fall. Two more arrows ended the other two northmen. The only sound in the market square was the splash of falling water and the buzzing of flies.
Valar morghulis, Arya thought.
On the east side of the market square stood a modest inn with whitewashed walls and broken windows. Half its roof had burnt off recently, but the hole had been patched over. Above the door hung a wooden shingle painted as a peach, with a big bite taken out of it. They dismounted at the stables sitting catty-corner, and Greenbeard bellowed for grooms.
The buxom red-haired innkeep howled with pleasure at the sight of them, then promptly set to tweaking them. “Greenbeard, is it? Or Greybeard? Mother take mercy, when did you get so old? Lem, is that you? Still wearing the same ratty cloak, are you? I know why you never wash it, I do. You’re afraid all the piss will wash out and we’ll see you’re really a knight o’ the Kingsguard! And Tom o’ Sevens, you randy old goat! You come to see that son o’ yours? Well, you’re too late, he’s off riding with that bloody Huntsman. And don’t tell me he’s not yours!”
“He hasn’t got my voice,” Tom protested weakly.
“He’s got your nose, though. Aye, and t’other parts as well, to hear the girls talk.” She spied Gendry then, and pinched him on the cheek. “Look at this fine young ox. Wait till Alyce sees those arms. Oh, and he blushes like a maid, too. Well, Alyce will fix that for you, boy, see if she don’t.”
Arya had never seen Gendry turn so red. “Tansy, you leave the Bull alone, he’s a good lad,” said Tom Sevenstrings. “All we need from you is safe beds for a night.”
“Speak for yourself, singer.” Anguy slid his arm around a strapping young serving girl as freckly as he was.
“Beds we got,” said red-haired Tansy. “There’s never been no lack o’ beds at the Peach. But you’ll all climb in a tub first. Last time you lot stayed under my roof you left your fleas behind.” She poked Greenbeard in the chest. “And yours was green, too. You want food?”
“If you can spare it, we won’t say no,” Tom conceded.
“Now when did you ever say no to anything, Tom?” the woman hooted. “I’ll roast some mutton for your friends, and an old dry rat for you. It’s more than you deserve, but if you gargle me a song or three, might be I’ll weaken. I always pity the afflicted. Come on, come on. Cass, Lanna, put some kettles on. Jyzene, help me get the clothes off them, we’ll need to boil those too.”
She made good on all her threats. Arya tried to tell them that she’d been bathed twice at Acorn Hall, not a fortnight past, but the red-haired woman was having none of it. Two serving wenches carried her up the stairs bodily, arguing about whether she was a girl or a boy. The one called Helly won, so the other had to fetch the hot water and scrub Arya’s back with a stiff bristly brush that almost took her skin off. Then they stole all the clothes that Lady Smallwood had given her and dressed her up like one of Sansa’s dolls in linen and lace. But at least when they were done she got to go down and eat.
As she sat in the common room in her stupid girl clothes, Arya remembered what Syrio Forel had told her, the trick of looking and seeing what was there. When she looked, she saw more serving wenches than any inn could want, and most of them young and comely. And come evenfall, lots of men started coming and going at the Peach. They did not linger long in the common room, not even when Tom took out his woodharp and began to sing “Six Maids in a Pool.” The wooden steps were old and steep, and creaked something fierce whenever one of the men took a girl upstairs. “I bet this is a brothel,” she whispered to Gendry.
“You don’t even know what a brothel is.”
“I do so,” she insisted. “It’s like an inn, with girls.”
He was turning red again. “What are you doing here, then?” he demanded. “A brothel’s no fit place for no bloody highborn lady, everybody knows that.”
One of the girls sat down on the bench beside him. “Who’s a highborn lady? The little skinny one?” She looked at Arya and laughed. “I’m a king’s daughter myself.”
Arya knew she was being mocked. “You are not.”
“Well, I might be.” When the girl shrugged, her gown slipped off one shoulder. “They say King Robert fucked my mother when he hid here, back before the battle. Not that he didn’t have all the other girls too, but Leslyn says he liked my ma the best.”
The girl did have hair like the old king’s, Arya thought; a great thick mop of it, as black as coal. That doesn’t mean anything, though. Gendry has the same kind of hair too. Lots of people have black hair.
“I’m named Bella,” the girl told Gendry. “For the battle. I bet I could ring your bell, too. You want to?”
“No,” he said gruffly.
“I bet you do.” She ran a hand along his arm. “I don’t cost nothing to friends of Thoros and the lightning lord.”
“No, I said.” Gendry rose abruptly and stalked away from the table out into the night.
Bella turned to Arya. “Don’t he like girls?”
Arya shrugged. “He’s just stupid. He likes to polish helmets and beat on swords with hammers.”
“Oh.” Bella tugged her gown back over her shoulder and went to talk with Jack-Be-Lucky. Before long she was sitting in his lap, giggling and drinking wine from his cup. Greenbeard had two girls, one on each knee. Anguy had vanished with his freckle-faced wench, and Lem was gone as well. Tom Sevenstrings sat by the fire, singing. “The Maids that Bloom in Spring.” Arya sipped at the cup of watered wine the red-haired woman had allowed her, listening. Across the square the dead men were rotting in their crow cages, but inside the Peach everyone was jolly. Except it seemed to her that some of them were laughing too hard, somehow.
It would have been a good time to sneak away and steal a horse, but Arya couldn’t see how that would help her. She could only ride as far as the city gates. That captain would never let me pass, and if he did, Harwin would come after me, or that Huntsman with his dogs. She wished she had her map, so she could see how far Stoney Sept was from Riverrun.
By the time her cup was empty, Arya was yawning. Gendry hadn’t come back. Tom Sevenstrings was singing “Two Hearts that Beat as One,” and kissing a different girl at the end of every verse. In the corner by the window Lem and Harwin sat talking to red-haired Tansy in low voices. “. . . spent the night in Jaime’s cell,” she heard the woman say. “Her and this other wench, the one who slew Renly. All three o’ them together, and come the morn Lady Catelyn cut him loose for love.” She gave a throaty chuckle.
It’s not true, Arya thought. She never would. She felt sad and angry and lonely, all at once.
An old man sat down beside her. “Well, aren’t you a pretty little peach?” His breath smelled near as foul as the dead men in the cages, and his little pig eyes were crawling up and down her. “Does my sweet peach have a name?”
For half a heartbeat she forgot who she was supposed to be. She wasn’t any peach, but she couldn’t be Arya Stark either, not here with some smelly drunk she did not know. “I’m . . .”
“She’s my sister.” Gendry put a heavy hand on the old man’s shoulder, and squeezed. “Leave her be.”
The man turned, spoiling for a quarrel, but when he saw Gendry’s size he thought better of it. “Your sister, is she? What kind of brother are you? I’d never bring no sister of mine to the Peach, that I wouldn’t.” He got up from the bench and moved off muttering, in search of a new friend.
“Why did you say that?” Arya hopped to her feet. “You’re not my brother.”
“That’s right,” he said angrily. “I’m too bloody lowborn to be kin to m’lady high.”
Arya was taken aback by the fury in his voice. “That’s not the way I meant it.”
“Yes it is.” He sat down on the bench, cradling a cup of wine between his hands. “Go away. I want to drink this wine in peace. Then maybe I’ll go find that black-haired girl and ring her bell for her.”
“But . . .”
“I said, go away. M’lady.”
Arya whirled and left him there. A stupid bullheaded bastard boy, that’s all he is. He could ring all the bells he wanted, it was nothing to her.
Their sleeping room was at the top of the stairs, under the eaves. Maybe the Peach had no lack of beds, but there was only one to spare for the likes of them. It was a big bed, though. It filled the whole room, just about, and the musty straw-stuffed mattress looked large enough for all of them. Just now, though, she had it to herself. Her real clothes were hanging from a peg on the wall, between Gendry’s stuff and Lem’s. Arya took off the linen and lace, pulled her tunic over her head, climbed up into the bed, and burrowed under the blankets. “Queen Cersei,” she whispered into the pillow. “King Joffrey, Ser Ilyn, Ser Meryn. Dunsen, Raff, and Polliver. The Tickler, the Hound, and Ser Gregor the Mountain.” She liked to mix up the order of the names sometimes. It helped her remember who they were and what they’d done. Maybe some of them are dead, she thought. Maybe they’re in iron cages someplace, and the crows are picking out their eyes.
Sleep came as quick as she closed her eyes. She dreamed of wolves that night, stalking through a wet wood with the smell of rain and rot and blood thick in the air. Only they were good smells in the dream, and Arya knew she had nothing to fear. She was strong and swift and fierce, and her pack was all around her, her brothers and her sisters. They ran down a frightened horse together, tore its throat out, and feasted. And when the moon broke through the clouds, she threw back her head and howled.
But when the day came, she woke to the barking of dogs.
Arya sat up yawning. Gendry was stirring on her left and Lem Lemoncloak snoring loudly to her right, but the baying outside all but drowned him out. There must be half a hundred dogs out there. She crawled from under the blankets and hopped over Lem, Tom, and Jack-Be-Lucky to the window. When she opened the shutters wide, wind and wet and cold all came flooding in together. The day was grey and overcast. Down below, in the square, the dogs were barking, running in circles, growling and howling. There was a pack of them, great black mastiffs and lean wolfhounds and black-and-white sheepdogs and kinds Arya did not know, shaggy brindled beasts with long yellow teeth. Between the inn and the fountain, a dozen riders sat astride their horses, watching the townsmen open the fat man’s cage and tug his arm until his swollen corpse spilled out onto the ground. The dogs were at him at once, tearing chunks of flesh off his bones.
Arya heard one of the riders laugh. “Here’s your new castle, you bloody Lannister bastard,” he said. “A little snug for the likes o’ you, but we’ll squeeze you in, never fret.” Beside him a prisoner sat sullen, with coils of hempen rope tight around his wrists. Some of the townsmen were throwing dung at him, but he never flinched. “You’ll rot in them cages,” his captor was shouting. “The crows will be picking out your eyes while we’re spending all that good Lannister gold o’ yours! And when them crows are done, we’ll send what’s left o’ you to your bloody brother. Though I doubt he’ll know you.”
The noise had woken half the Peach. Gendry squeezed into the window beside Arya, and Tom stepped up behind them naked as his name day. “What’s all that bloody shouting?” Lem complained from bed. “A man’s trying to get some bloody sleep.”
“Where’s Greenbeard?” Tom asked him.
“Abed with Tansy,” Lem said. “Why?”
“Best find him. Archer too. The Mad Huntsman’s come back, with another man for the cages.”
“Lannister,” said Arya. “I heard him say Lannister.”
“Have they caught the Kingslayer?” Gendry wanted to know.
Down in the square, a thrown stone caught the captive on the cheek, turning his head. Not the Kingslayer, Arya thought, when she saw his face. The gods had heard her prayers after all.

Her eyes had grown accustomed to blackness. When Harwin pulled the hood off her head, the ruddy glare inside the hollow hill made Arya blink like some stupid owl.
A huge firepit had been dug in the center of the earthen floor, and its flames rose swirling and crackling toward the smoke-stained ceiling. The walls were equal parts stone and soil, with huge white roots twisting through them like a thousand slow pale snakes. People were emerging from between those roots as she watched; edging out from the shadows for a look at the captives, stepping from the mouths of pitch-black tunnels, popping out of crannies and crevices on all sides. In one place on the far side of the fire, the roots formed a kind of stairway up to a hollow in the earth where a man sat almost lost in the tangle of weirwood.
Lem unhooded Gendry. “What is this place?” he asked.
“An old place, deep and secret. A refuge where neither wolves nor lions come prowling.”
Neither wolves nor lions. Arya’s skin prickled. She remembered the dream she’d had, and the taste of blood when she tore the man’s arm from his shoulder.
Big as the fire was, the cave was bigger; it was hard to tell where it began and where it ended. The tunnel mouths might have been two feet deep or gone on two miles. Arya saw men and women and little children, all of them watching her warily.
Greenbeard said, “Here’s the wizard, skinny squirrel. You’ll get your answers now.” He pointed toward the fire, where Tom Sevenstrings stood talking to a tall thin man with oddments of old armor buckled on over his ratty pink robes. That can’t be Thoros of Myr. Arya remembered the red priest as fat, with a smooth face and a shiny bald head. This man had a droopy face and a full head of shaggy grey hair. Something Tom said made him look at her, and Arya thought he was about to come over to her. Only then the Mad Huntsman appeared, shoving his captive down into the light, and she and Gendry were forgotten.
The Huntsman had turned out to be a stocky man in patched tan leathers, balding and weak-chinned and quarrelsome. At Stoney Sept she had thought that Lem and Greenbeard might be torn to pieces when they faced him at the crow cages to claim his captive for the lightning lord. The hounds had been all around them, sniffing and snarling. But Tom o’ Sevens soothed them with his playing, Tansy marched across the square with her apron full of bones and fatty mutton, and Lem pointed out Anguy in the brothel window, standing with an arrow notched. The Mad Huntsman had cursed them all for lickspittles, but finally he had agreed to take his prize to Lord Beric for judgment.
They had bound his wrists with hempen rope, strung a noose around his neck, and pulled a sack down over his head, but even so there was danger in the man. Arya could feel it across the cave. Thoros—if that was Thoros—met captor and captive halfway to the fire. “How did you take him?” the priest asked.
“The dogs caught the scent. He was sleeping off a drunk under a willow tree, if you believe it.”
“Betrayed by his own kind.” Thoros turned to the prisoner and yanked his hood off. “Welcome to our humble hall, dog. It is not so grand as Robert’s throne room, but the company is better.”
The shifting flames painted Sandor Clegane’s burned face with orange shadows, so he looked even more terrible than he did in daylight. When he pulled at the rope that bound his wrists, flakes of dry blood fell off. The Hound’s mouth twitched. “I know you,” he said to Thoros.
“You did. In mêlées, you’d curse my flaming sword, though thrice I overthrew you with it.”
“Thoros of Myr. You used to shave your head.”
“To betoken a humble heart, but in truth my heart was vain. Besides, I lost my razor in the woods.” The priest slapped his belly. “I am less than I was, but more. A year in the wild will melt the flesh off a man. Would that I could find a tailor to take in my skin. I might look young again, and pretty maids would shower me with kisses.”
“Only the blind ones, priest.”
The outlaws hooted, none so loud as Thoros. “Just so. Yet I am not the false priest you knew. The Lord of Light has woken in my heart. Many powers long asleep are waking, and there are forces moving in the land. I have seen them in my flames.”
The Hound was unimpressed. “Bugger your flames. And you as well.” He looked around at the others. “You keep queer company for a holy man.”
“These are my brothers,” Thoros said simply.
Lem Lemoncloak pushed forward. He and Greenbeard were the only men there tall enough to look the Hound in the eye. “Be careful how you bark, dog. We hold your life in our hands.”
“Best wipe the shit off your fingers, then.” The Hound laughed. “How long have you been hiding in this hole?”
Anguy the Archer bristled at the suggestion of cowardice. “Ask the goat if we’ve hidden, Hound. Ask your brother. Ask the lord of leeches. We’ve bloodied them all.”
“You lot? Don’t make me laugh. You look more swineherds than soldiers.”
“Some of us was swineherds,” said a short man Arya did not know. “And some was tanners or singers or masons. But that was before the war come.”
“When we left King’s Landing we were men of Winterfell and men of Darry and men of Blackhaven, Mallery men and Wylde men. We were knights and squires and men-at-arms, lords and commoners, bound together only by our purpose.” The voice came from the man seated amongst the weirwood roots halfway up the wall. “Six score of us set out to bring the king’s justice to your brother.” The speaker was descending the tangle of steps toward the floor. “Six score brave men and true, led by a fool in a starry cloak.” A scarecrow of a man, he wore a ragged black cloak speckled with stars and an iron breastplate dinted by a hundred battles. A thicket of red-gold hair hid most of his face, save for a bald spot above his left ear where his head had been smashed in. “More than eighty of our company are dead now, but others have taken up the swords that fell from their hands.” When he reached the floor, the outlaws moved aside to let him pass. One of his eyes was gone, Arya saw, the flesh about the socket scarred and puckered, and he had a dark black ring all around his neck. “With their help, we fight on as best we can, for Robert and the realm.”
“Robert?” rasped Sandor Clegane, incredulous.
“Ned Stark sent us out,” said pothelmed Jack-Be-Lucky, “but he was sitting the Iron Throne when he gave us our commands, so we were never truly his men, but Robert’s.”
“Robert is the king of the worms now. Is that why you’re down in the earth, to keep his court for him?”
“The king is dead,” the scarecrow knight admitted, “but we are still king’s men, though the royal banner we bore was lost at the Mummer’s Ford when your brother’s butchers fell upon us.” He touched his breast with a fist. “Robert is slain, but his realm remains. And we defend her.”
“Her?” The Hound snorted. “Is she your mother, Dondarrion? Or your whore?”
Dondarrion? Beric Dondarrion had been handsome; Sansa’s friend Jeyne had fallen in love with him. Even Jeyne Poole was not so blind as to think this man was fair. Yet when Arya looked at him again, she saw it; the remains of a forked purple lightning bolt on the cracked enamel of his breastplate.
“Rocks and trees and rivers, that’s what your realm is made of,” the Hound was saying. “Do the rocks need defending? Robert wouldn’t have thought so. If he couldn’t fuck it, fight it, or drink it, it bored him, and so would you . . . you brave companions.”
Outrage swept the hollow hill. “Call us that name again, dog, and you’ll swallow that tongue.” Lem drew his longsword.
The Hound stared at the blade with contempt. “Here’s a brave man, baring steel on a bound captive. Untie me, why don’t you? We’ll see how brave you are then.” He glanced at the Mad Huntsman behind him. “How about you? Or did you leave all your courage in your kennels?”
“No, but I should have left you in a crow cage.” The Huntsman drew a knife. “I might still.”
The Hound laughed in his face.
“We are brothers here,” Thoros of Myr declared. “Holy brothers, sworn to the realm, to our god, and to each other.”
“The brotherhood without banners.” Tom Sevenstrings plucked a string. “The knights of the hollow hill.”
“Knights?” Clegane made the word a sneer. “Dondarrion’s a knight, but the rest of you are the sorriest lot of outlaws and broken men I’ve ever seen. I shit better men than you.”
“Any knight can make a knight,” said the scarecrow that was Beric Dondarrion, “and every man you see before you has felt a sword upon his shoulder. We are the forgotten fellowship.”
“Send me on my way and I’ll forget you too,” Clegane rasped. “But if you mean to murder me, then bloody well get on with it. You took my sword, my horse, and my gold, so take my life and be done with it . . . but spare me this pious bleating.”
“You will die soon enough, dog,” promised Thoros, “but it shan’t be murder, only justice.”
“Aye,” said the Mad Huntsman, “and a kinder fate than you deserve for all your kind have done. Lions, you call yourselves. At Sherrer and the Mummer’s Ford, girls of six and seven years were raped, and babes still on the breast were cut in two while their mothers watched. No lion ever killed so cruel.”
“I was not at Sherrer, nor the Mummer’s Ford,” the Hound told him. “Lay your dead children at some other door.”
Thoros answered him. “Do you deny that House Clegane was built upon dead children? I saw them lay Prince Aegon and Princess Rhaenys before the Iron Throne. By rights your arms should bear two bloody infants in place of those ugly dogs.”
The Hound’s mouth twitched. “Do you take me for my brother? Is being born Clegane a crime?”
“Murder is a crime.”
“Who did I murder?”
“Lord Lothar Mallery and Ser Gladden Wylde,” said Harwin.
“My brothers Lister and Lennocks,” declared Jack-Be-Lucky.
“Goodman Beck and Mudge the miller’s son, from Donnelwood,” an old woman called from the shadows.
“Merriman’s widow, who loved so sweet,” added Greenbeard.
“Them septons at Sludgy Pond.”
“Ser Andrey Charlton. His squire Lucas Roote. Every man, woman, and child in Fieldstone and Mousedown Mill.”
“Lord and Lady Deddings, that was so rich.”
Tom Sevenstrings took up the count. “Alyn of Winterfell, Joth Quick-bow, Little Matt and his sister Randa, Anvil Ryn. Ser Ormond. Ser Dudley. Pate of Mory, Pate of Lancewood, Old Pate, and Pate of Shermer’s Grove. Blind Wyl the Whittler. Goodwife Maerie. Maerie the Whore. Becca the Baker. Ser Raymun Darry, Lord Darry, young Lord Darry. The Bastard of Bracken. Fletcher Will. Harsley. Goodwife Nolla—”
“Enough.” The Hound’s face was tight with anger. “You’re making noise. These names mean nothing. Who were they?”
“People,” said Lord Beric. “People great and small, young and old. Good people and bad people, who died on the points of Lannister spears or saw their bellies opened by Lannister swords.”
“It wasn’t my sword in their bellies. Any man who says it was is a bloody liar.”
“You serve the Lannisters of Casterly Rock,” said Thoros.
“Once. Me and thousands more. Is each of us guilty of the crimes of the others?” Clegane spat. “Might be you are knights after all. You lie like knights, maybe you murder like knights.”
Lem and Jack-Be-Lucky began to shout at him, but Dondarrion raised a hand for silence. “Say what you mean, Clegane.”
“A knight’s a sword with a horse. The rest, the vows and the sacred oils and the lady’s favors, they’re silk ribbons tied round the sword. Maybe the sword’s prettier with ribbons hanging off it, but it will kill you just as dead. Well, bugger your ribbons, and shove your swords up your arses. I’m the same as you. The only difference is, I don’t lie about what I am. So kill me, but don’t call me a murderer while you stand there telling each other that your shit don’t stink. You hear me?”
Arya squirted past Greenbeard so fast he never saw her. “You are a murderer!” she screamed. “You killed Mycah, don’t say you never did. You murdered him!”
The Hound stared at her with no flicker of recognition. “And who was this Mycah, boy?”
“I’m not a boy! But Mycah was. He was a butcher’s boy and you killed him. Jory said you cut him near in half, and he never even had a sword.” She could feel them looking at her now, the women and the children and the men who called themselves the knights of the hollow hill. “Who’s this now?” someone asked.
The Hound answered. “Seven hells. The little sister. The brat who tossed Joff’s pretty sword in the river.” He gave a bark of laughter. “Don’t you know you’re dead?”
“No, you’re dead,” she threw back at him.
Harwin took her arm to draw her back as Lord Beric said, “The girl has named you a murderer. Do you deny killing this butcher’s boy, Mycah?”
The big man shrugged. “I was Joffrey’s sworn shield. The butcher’s boy attacked a prince of the blood.”
“That’s a lie!” Arya squirmed in Harwin’s grip. “It was me. I hit Joffrey and threw Lion’s Paw in the river. Mycah just ran away, like I told him.”
“Did you see the boy attack Prince Joffrey?” Lord Beric Dondarrion asked the Hound.
“I heard it from the royal lips. It’s not my place to question princes.” Clegane jerked his hands toward Arya. “This one’s own sister told the same tale when she stood before your precious Robert.”
“Sansa’s just a liar,” Arya said, furious at her sister all over again. “It wasn’t like she said. It wasn’t.”
Thoros drew Lord Beric aside. The two men stood talking in low whispers while Arya seethed. They have to kill him. I prayed for him to die, hundreds and hundreds of times.
Beric Dondarrion turned back to the Hound. “You stand accused of murder, but no one here knows the truth or falsehood of the charge, so it is not for us to judge you. Only the Lord of Light may do that now. I sentence you to trial by battle.”
The Hound frowned suspiciously, as if he did not trust his ears. “Are you a fool or a madman?”
“Neither. I am a just lord. Prove your innocence with a blade, and you shall be free to go.”
“No,” Arya cried, before Harwin covered her mouth. No, they can’t, he’ll go free. The Hound was deadly with a sword, everyone knew that. He’ll laugh at them, she thought.
And so he did, a long rasping laugh that echoed off the cave walls, a laugh choking with contempt. “So who will it be?” He looked at Lem Lemoncloak. “The brave man in the piss-yellow cloak? No? How about you, Huntsman? You’ve kicked dogs before, try me.” He saw Greenbeard. “You’re big enough, Tyrosh, step forward. Or do you mean to make the little girl fight me herself?” He laughed again. “Come on, who wants to die?”
“It’s me you’ll face,” said Lord Beric Dondarrion.
Arya remembered all the tales. He can’t be killed, she thought, hoping against hope. The Mad Huntsman sliced apart the ropes that bound Sandor Clegane’s hands together. “I’ll need sword and armor.” The Hound rubbed a torn wrist.
“Your sword you shall have,” declared Lord Beric, “but your innocence must be your armor.”
Clegane’s mouth twitched. “My innocence against your breastplate, is that the way of it?”
“Ned, help me remove my breastplate.”
Arya got goosebumps when Lord Beric said her father’s name, but this Ned was only a boy, a fair-haired squire no more than ten or twelve. He stepped up quickly to undo the clasps that fastened the battered steel about the Marcher lord. The quilting beneath was rotten with age and sweat, and fell away when the metal was pulled loose. Gendry sucked in his breath. “Mother have mercy.”
Lord Beric’s ribs were outlined starkly beneath his skin. A puckered crater scarred his breast just above his left nipple, and when he turned to call for sword and shield, Arya saw a matching scar upon his back. The lance went through him. The Hound had seen it too. Is he scared? Arya wanted him to be scared before he died, as scared as Mycah must have been.
Ned fetched Lord Beric his swordbelt and a long black surcoat. It was meant to be worn over armor, so it draped his body loosely, but across it crackled the forked purple lightning of his House. He unsheathed his sword and gave the belt back to his squire.
Thoros brought the Hound his swordbelt. “Does a dog have honor?” the priest asked. “Lest you think to cut your way free of here, or seize some child for a hostage . . . Anguy, Dennet, Kyle, feather him at the first sign of treachery.” Only when the three bowmen had notched their shafts did Thoros hand Clegane the belt.
The Hound ripped the sword free and threw away the scabbard. The Mad Huntsman gave him his oaken shield, all studded with iron and painted yellow, the three black dogs of Clegane emblazoned upon it. The boy Ned helped Lord Beric with his own shield, so hacked and battered that the purple lightning and the scatter of stars upon it had almost been obliterated.
But when the Hound made to step toward his foe, Thoros of Myr stopped him. “First we pray.” He turned toward the fire and lifted his arms. “Lord of Light, look down upon us.”
All around the cave, the brotherhood without banners lifted their own voices in response. “Lord of Light, defend us.”
“Lord of Light, protect us in the darkness.”
“Lord of Light, shine your face upon us.”
“Light your flame among us, R’hllor,” said the red priest. “Show us the truth or falseness of this man. Strike him down if he is guilty, and give strength to his sword if he is true. Lord of Light, give us wisdom.”
“For the night is dark,” the others chanted, Harwin and Anguy loud as all the rest, “and full of terrors.”
“This cave is dark too,” said the Hound, “but I’m the terror here. I hope your god’s a sweet one, Dondarrion. You’re going to meet him shortly.”
Unsmiling, Lord Beric laid the edge of his longsword against the palm of his left hand, and drew it slowly down. Blood ran dark from the gash he made, and washed over the steel.
And then the sword took fire.
Arya heard Gendry whisper a prayer.
“Burn in seven hells,” the Hound cursed. “You, and Thoros too.” He threw a glance at the red priest. “When I’m done with him you’ll be next, Myr.”
“Every word you say proclaims your guilt, dog,” answered Thoros, while Lem and Greenbeard and Jack-Be-Lucky shouted threats and curses. Lord Beric himself waited silent, calm as still water, his shield on his left arm and his sword burning in his right hand. Kill him, Arya thought, please, you have to kill him. Lit from below, his face was a death mask, his missing eye a red and angry wound. The sword was aflame from point to crossguard, but Dondarrion seemed not to feel the heat. He stood so still he might have been carved of stone.
But when the Hound charged him, he moved fast enough.
The flaming sword leapt up to meet the cold one, long streamers of fire trailing in its wake like the ribbons the Hound had spoken of. Steel rang on steel. No sooner was his first slash blocked than Clegane made another, but this time Lord Beric’s shield got in the way, and wood chips flew from the force of the blow. Hard and fast the cuts came, from low and high, from right and left, and each one Dondarrion blocked. The flames swirled about his sword and left red and yellow ghosts to mark its passage. Each move Lord Beric made fanned them and made them burn the brighter, until it seemed as though the lightning lord stood within a cage of fire. “Is it wildfire?” Arya asked Gendry.
“No. This is different. This is . . .”
“. . . magic?” she finished as the Hound edged back. Now it was Lord Beric attacking, filling the air with ropes of fire, driving the bigger man back on his heels. Clegane caught one blow high on his shield, and a painted dog lost a head. He countercut, and Dondarrion interposed his own shield and launched a fiery backslash. The outlaw brotherhood shouted on their leader. “He’s yours!” Arya heard, and “At him! At him! At him!” The Hound parried a cut at his head, grimacing as the heat of the flames beat against his face. He grunted and cursed and reeled away.
Lord Beric gave him no respite. Hard on the big man’s heels he followed, his arm never still. The swords clashed and sprang apart and clashed again, splinters flew from the lightning shield while swirling flames kissed the dogs once, and twice, and thrice. The Hound moved to his right, but Dondarrion blocked him with a quick sidestep and drove him back the other way . . . toward the sullen red blaze of the firepit. Clegane gave ground until he felt the heat at his back. A quick glance over his shoulder showed him what was behind him, and almost cost him his head when Lord Beric attacked anew.
Arya could see the whites of Sandor Clegane’s eyes as he bulled his way forward again. Three steps up and two back, a move to the left that Lord Beric blocked, two more forward and one back, clang and clang, and the big oaken shields took blow after blow after blow. The Hound’s lank dark hair was plastered to his brow in a sheen of sweat. Wine sweat, Arya thought, remembering that he’d been taken drunk. She thought she could see the beginnings of fear wake in his eyes. He’s going to lose, she told herself, exulting, as Lord Beric’s flaming sword whirled and slashed. In one wild flurry, the lightning lord took back all the ground the Hound had gained, sending Clegane staggering to the very edge of the firepit once more. He is, he is, he’s going to die. She stood on her toes for a better look.
“Bloody bastard!” the Hound screamed as he felt the fire licking against the back of his thighs. He charged, swinging the heavy sword harder and harder, trying to smash the smaller man down with brute force, to break blade or shield or arm. But the flames of Dondarrion’s parries snapped at his eyes, and when the Hound jerked away from them, his foot went out from under him and he staggered to one knee. At once Lord Beric closed, his downcut screaming through the air trailing pennons of fire. Panting from exertion, Clegane jerked his shield up over his head just in time, and the cave rang with the loud crack of splintering oak.
“His shield is afire,” Gendry said in a hushed voice. Arya saw it in the same instant. The flames had spread across the chipped yellow paint, and the three black dogs were engulfed.
Sandor Clegane had fought his way back to his feet with a reckless counterattack. Not until Lord Beric retreated a pace did the Hound seem to realize that the fire that roared so near his face was his own shield, burning. With a shout of revulsion, he hacked down savagely on the broken oak, completing its destruction. The shield shattered, one piece of it spinning away, still afire, while the other clung stubbornly to his forearm. His efforts to free himself only fanned the flames. His sleeve caught, and now his whole left arm was ablaze. “Finish him!” Greenbeard urged Lord Beric, and other voices took up the chant of “Guilty!” Arya shouted with the rest. “Guilty, guilty, kill him, guilty!”
Smooth as summer silk, Lord Beric slid close to make an end of the man before him. The Hound gave a rasping scream, raised his sword in both hands and brought it crashing down with all his strength. Lord Beric blocked the cut easily . . . 
“Noooooo,” Arya shrieked.
 . . . but the burning sword snapped in two, and the Hound’s cold steel plowed into Lord Beric’s flesh where his shoulder joined his neck and clove him clean down to the breastbone. The blood came rushing out in a hot black gush.
Sandor Clegane jerked backward, still burning. He ripped the remnants of his shield off and flung them away with a curse, then rolled in the dirt to smother the fire running along his arm.
Lord Beric’s knees folded slowly, as if for prayer. When his mouth opened only blood came out. The Hound’s sword was still in him as he toppled face forward. The dirt drank his blood. Beneath the hollow hill there was no sound but the soft crackling of flames and the whimper the Hound made when he tried to rise. Arya could only think of Mycah and all the stupid prayers she’d prayed for the Hound to die. If there were gods, why didn’t Lord Beric win? She knew the Hound was guilty.
“Please,” Sandor Clegane rasped, cradling his arm. “I’m burned. Help me. Someone. Help me.” He was crying. “Please.”
Arya looked at him in astonishment. He’s crying like a little baby, she thought.
“Melly, see to his burns,” said Thoros. “Lem, Jack, help me with Lord Beric. Ned, you’d best come too.” The red priest wrenched the Hound’s sword from the body of his fallen lord and thrust the point of it down in the blood-soaked earth. Lem slid his big hands under Dondarrion’s arms, while Jack-Be-Lucky took his feet. They carried him around the firepit, into the darkness of one of the tunnels. Thoros and the boy Ned followed after.
The Mad Huntsman spat. “I say we take him back to Stoney Sept and put him in a crow cage.”
“Yes,” Arya said. “He murdered Mycah. He did.”
“Such an angry squirrel,” murmured Greenbeard.
Harwin sighed. “R’hllor has judged him innocent.”
“Who’s Rulore?” She couldn’t even say it.
“The Lord of Light. Thoros has taught us—”
She didn’t care what Thoros had taught them. She yanked Greenbeard’s dagger from its sheath and spun away before he could catch her. Gendry made a grab for her as well, but she had always been too fast for Gendry.
Tom Sevenstrings and some woman were helping the Hound to his feet. The sight of his arm shocked her speechless. There was a strip of pink where the leather strap had clung, but above and below the flesh was cracked and red and bleeding from elbow to wrist. When his eyes met hers, his mouth twitched. “You want me dead that bad? Then do it, wolf girl. Shove it in. It’s cleaner than fire.” Clegane tried to stand, but as he moved a piece of burned flesh sloughed right off his arm, and his knees went out from under him. Tom caught him by his good arm and held him up.
His arm, Arya thought, and his face. But he was the Hound. He deserved to burn in a fiery hell. The knife felt heavy in her hand. She gripped it tighter. “You killed Mycah,” she said once more, daring him to deny it. “Tell them. You did. You did.”
“I did.” His whole face twisted. “I rode him down and cut him in half, and laughed. I watched them beat your sister bloody too, watched them cut your father’s head off.”
Lem grabbed her wrist and twisted, wrenching the dagger away. She kicked at him, but he would not give it back. “You go to hell, Hound,” she screamed at Sandor Clegane in helpless empty-handed rage. “You just go to hell!”
“He has,” said a voice scarce stronger than a whisper.
When Arya turned, Lord Beric Dondarrion was standing behind her, his bloody hand clutching Thoros by the shoulder.

The man on the roof was the first to die. He was crouched down by the chimney two hundred yards away, no more than a vague shadow in the predawn gloom, but as the sky began to lighten he stirred, stretched, and stood. Anguy’s arrow took him in the chest. He tumbled bonelessly down the steep slate pitch, and fell in front of the septry door.
The Mummers had posted two guards there, but their torch left them night blind, and the outlaws had crept in close. Kyle and Notch let fly together. One man went down with an arrow through his throat, the other through his belly. The second man dropped the torch, and the flames licked up at him. He screamed as his clothes took fire, and that was the end of stealth. Thoros gave a shout, and the outlaws attacked in earnest.
Arya watched from atop her horse, on the crest of the wooded ridge that overlooked the septry, mill, brewhouse, and stables and the desolation of weeds, burnt trees, and mud that surrounded them. The trees were mostly bare now, and the few withered brown leaves that still clung to the branches did little to obstruct her view. Lord Beric had left Beardless Dick and Mudge to guard them. Arya hated being left behind like she was some stupid child, but at least Gendry had been kept back as well. She knew better than to try and argue. This was battle, and in battle you had to obey.
The eastern horizon glowed gold and pink, and overhead a half moon peeked out through low scuttling clouds. The wind blew cold, and Arya could hear the rush of water and the creak of the mill’s great wooden waterwheel. There was a smell of rain in the dawn air, but no drops were falling yet. Flaming arrows flew through the morning mists, trailing pale ribbons of fire, and thudded into the wooden walls of the septry. A few smashed through shuttered windows, and soon enough thin tendrils of smoke were rising between the broken shutters.
Two Mummers came bursting from the septry side by side, axes in their hands. Anguy and the other archers were waiting. One axeman died at once. The other managed to duck, so the shaft ripped through his shoulder. He staggered on, till two more arrows found him, so quickly it was hard to say which had struck first. The long shafts punched through his breastplate as if it had been made of silk instead of steel. He fell heavily. Anguy had arrows tipped with bodkins as well as broadheads. A bodkin could pierce even heavy plate. I’m going to learn to shoot a bow, Arya thought. She loved swordfighting, but she could see how arrows were good too.
Flames were creeping up the west wall of the septry, and thick smoke poured through a broken window. A Myrish crossbowman poked his head out a different window, got off a bolt, and ducked down to rewind. She could hear fighting from the stables as well, shouts well mingled with the screams of horses and the clang of steel. Kill them all, she thought fiercely. She bit her lip so hard she tasted blood. Kill every single one.
The crossbowman appeared again, but no sooner had he loosed than three arrows hissed past his head. One rattled off his helm. He vanished, bow and all. Arya could see flames in several of the second-story windows. Between the smoke and the morning mists, the air was a haze of blowing black and white. Anguy and the other bowmen were creeping closer, the better to find targets.
Then the septry erupted, the Mummers boiling out like angry ants. Two Ibbenese rushed through the door with shaggy brown shields held high before them, and behind them came a Dothraki with a great curved arakh and bells in his braid, and behind him three Volantene sellswords covered with fierce tattoos. Others were climbing out windows and leaping to the ground. Arya saw a man take an arrow through the chest with one leg across a windowsill, and heard his scream as he fell. The smoke was thickening. Quarrels and arrows sped back and forth. Watty fell with a grunt, his bow slipping from his hand. Kyle was trying to nock another shaft to his string when a man in black mail flung a spear through his belly. She heard Lord Beric shout. From out of the ditches and trees the rest of his band came pouring, steel in hand. Arya saw Lem’s bright yellow cloak flapping behind him as he rode down the man who’d killed Kyle. Thoros and Lord Beric were everywhere, their swords swirling fire. The red priest hacked at a hide shield until it flew to pieces, while his horse kicked the man in the face. A Dothraki screamed and charged the lightning lord, and the flaming sword leapt out to meet his arakh. The blades kissed and spun and kissed again. Then the Dothraki’s hair was ablaze, and a moment later he was dead. She spied Ned too, fighting at the lightning lord’s side. It’s not fair, he’s only a little older than me, they should have let me fight.
The battle did not last very long. The Brave Companions still on their feet soon died, or threw down their swords. Two of the Dothraki managed to regain their horses and flee, but only because Lord Beric let them go. “Let them carry the word back to Harrenhal,” he said, with flaming sword in hand. “It will give the Leech Lord and his goat a few more sleepless nights.”
Jack-Be-Lucky, Harwin, and Merrit o’ Moontown braved the burning septry to search for captives. They emerged from the smoke and flames a few moments later with eight brown brothers, one so weak that Merrit had to carry him across a shoulder. There was a septon with them as well, round-shouldered and balding, but he wore black chainmail over his grey robes. “Found him hiding under the cellar steps,” said Jack, coughing.
Thoros smiled to see him. “You are Utt.”
“Septon Utt. A man of god.”
“What god would want the likes o’ you?” growled Lem.
“I have sinned,” the septon wailed. “I know, I know. Forgive me, Father. Oh, grievously have I sinned.”
Arya remembered Septon Utt from her time at Harrenhal. Shagwell the Fool said he always wept and prayed for forgiveness after he’d killed his latest boy. Sometimes he even made the other Mummers scourge him. They all thought that was very funny.
Lord Beric slammed his sword into its scabbard, quenching the flames. “Give the dying the gift of mercy and bind the others hand and foot for trial,” he commanded, and it was done.
The trials went swiftly. Various of the outlaws came forward to tell of things the Brave Companions had done; towns and villages sacked, crops burned, women raped and murdered, men maimed and tortured. A few spoke of the boys that Septon Utt had carried off. The septon wept and prayed through it all. “I am a weak reed,” he told Lord Beric. “I pray to the Warrior for strength, but the gods made me weak. Have mercy on my weakness. The boys, the sweet boys . . . I never mean to hurt them . . .”
Septon Utt soon dangled beneath a tall elm, swinging slowly by the neck, as naked as his name day. The other Brave Companions followed one by one. A few fought, kicking and struggling as the noose was tightened round their throats. One of the crossbowmen kept shouting, “I soldier, I soldier,” in a thick Myrish accent. Another offered to lead his captors to gold; a third told them what a good outlaw he would make. Each was stripped and bound and hanged in turn. Tom Sevenstrings played a dirge for them on his woodharp, and Thoros implored the Lord of Light to roast their souls until the end of time.
A mummer tree, Arya thought as she watched them dangle, their pale skins painted a sullen red by the flames of the burning septry. Already the crows were coming, appearing out of nowhere. She heard them croaking and cackling at one another, and wondered what they were saying. Arya had not feared Septon Utt as much as she did Rorge and Biter and some of the others still at Harrenhal, but she was glad that he was dead all the same. They should have hanged the Hound too, or chopped his head off. Instead, to her disgust, the outlaws had treated Sandor Clegane’s burned arm, restored his sword and horse and armor, and set him free a few miles from the hollow hill. All they’d taken was his gold.
The septry soon collapsed in a roar of smoke and flame, its walls no longer able to support the weight of its heavy slate roof. The eight brown brothers watched with resignation. They were all that remained, explained the eldest, who wore a small iron hammer on a thong about his neck to signify his devotion to the Smith. “Before the war we were four-and-forty, and this was a prosperous place. We had a dozen milk cows and a bull, a hundred beehives, a vineyard and an apple arbor. But when the lions came through they took all our wine and milk and honey, slaughtered the cows, and put our vineyard to the torch. After that . . . I have lost count of our visitors. This false septon was only the latest. There was one monster . . . we gave him all our silver, but he was certain we were hiding gold, so his men killed us one by one to make Elder Brother talk.”
“How did the eight of you survive?” asked Anguy the Archer.
“I am ashamed,” the old man said. “It was me. When it came my turn to die, I told them where our gold was hidden.”
“Brother,” said Thoros of Myr, “the only shame was not telling them at once.”
The outlaws sheltered that night in the brewhouse beside the little river. Their hosts had a cache of food hidden beneath the floor of the stables, so they shared a simple supper; oaten bread, onions, and a watery cabbage soup tasting faintly of garlic. Arya found a slice of carrot floating in her bowl, and counted herself lucky. The brothers never asked the outlaws for names. They know, Arya thought. How could they not? Lord Beric wore the lightning bolt on breastplate, shield, and cloak, and Thoros his red robes, or what remained of them. One brother, a young novice, was bold enough to tell the red priest not to pray to his false god so long as he was under their roof. “Bugger that,” said Lem Lemoncloak. “He’s our god too, and you owe us for your bloody lives. And what’s false about him? Might be your Smith can mend a broken sword, but can he heal a broken man?”
“Enough, Lem,” Lord Beric commanded. “Beneath their roof we will honor their rules.”
“The sun will not cease to shine if we miss a prayer or two,” Thoros agreed mildly. “I am one who would know.”
Lord Beric himself did not eat. Arya had never seen him eat, though from time to time he took a cup of wine. He did not seem to sleep, either. His good eye would often close, as if from weariness, but when you spoke to him it would flick open again at once. The Marcher lord was still clad in his ratty black cloak and dented breastplate with its chipped enamel lightning. He even slept in that breastplate. The dull black steel hid the terrible wound the Hound had given him, the same way his thick woolen scarf concealed the dark ring about his throat. But nothing hid his broken head, all caved in at the temple, or the raw red pit that was his missing eye, or the shape of the skull beneath his face.
Arya looked at him warily, remembering all the tales told of him in Harrenhal. Lord Beric seemed to sense her fear. He turned his head, and beckoned her closer. “Do I frighten you, child?”
“No.” She chewed her lip. “Only . . . well . . . I thought the Hound had killed you, but . . .”
“A wound,” said Lem Lemoncloak. “A grievous wound, aye, but Thoros healed it. There’s never been no better healer.”
Lord Beric gazed at Lem with a queer look in his good eye and no look at all in the other, only scars and dried blood. “No better healer,” he agreed wearily. “Lem, past time to change the watch, I’d think. See to it, if you’d be so good.”
“Aye, m’lord.” Lem’s big yellow cloak swirled behind him as he strode out into the windy night.
“Even brave men blind themselves sometimes, when they are afraid to see,” Lord Beric said when Lem was gone. “Thoros, how many times have you brought me back now?”
The red priest bowed his head. “It is R’hllor who brings you back, my lord. The Lord of Light. I am only his instrument.”
“How many times?” Lord Beric insisted.
“Six,” Thoros said reluctantly. “And each time is harder. You have grown reckless, my lord. Is death so very sweet?”
“Sweet? No, my friend. Not sweet.”
“Then do not court it so. Lord Tywin leads from the rear. Lord Stannis as well. You would be wise to do the same. A seventh death might mean the end of both of us.”
Lord Beric touched the spot above his left ear where his temple was caved in. “Here is where Ser Burton Crakehall broke helm and head with a blow of his mace.” He unwound his scarf, exposing the black bruise that encircled his neck. “Here the mark the manticore made at Rushing Falls. He seized a poor beekeeper and his wife, thinking they were mine, and let it be known far and wide that he would hang them both unless I gave myself up to him. When I did he hanged them anyway, and me on the gibbet between them.” He lifted a finger to the raw red pit of his eye. “Here is where the Mountain thrust his dirk through my visor.” A weary smile brushed his lips. “That’s thrice I have died at the hands of House Clegane. You would think that I might have learned . . .”
It was a jest, Arya knew, but Thoros did not laugh. He put a hand on Lord Beric’s shoulder. “Best not to dwell on it.”
“Can I dwell on what I scarce remember? I held a castle on the Marches once, and there was a woman I was pledged to marry, but I could not find that castle today, nor tell you the color of that woman’s hair. Who knighted me, old friend? What were my favorite foods? It all fades. Sometimes I think I was born on the bloody grass in that grove of ash, with the taste of fire in my mouth and a hole in my chest. Are you my mother, Thoros?”
Arya stared at the Myrish priest, all shaggy hair and pink rags and bits of old armor. Grey stubble covered his cheeks and the sagging skin beneath his chin. He did not look much like the wizards in Old Nan’s stories, but even so . . .
“Could you bring back a man without a head?” Arya asked. “Just the once, not six times. Could you?”
“I have no magic, child. Only prayers. That first time, his lordship had a hole right through him and blood in his mouth, I knew there was no hope. So when his poor torn chest stopped moving, I gave him the good god’s own kiss to send him on his way. I filled my mouth with fire and breathed the flames inside him, down his throat to lungs and heart and soul. The last kiss it is called, and many a time I saw the old priests bestow it on the Lord’s servants as they died. I had given it a time or two myself, as all priests must. But never before had I felt a dead man shudder as the fire filled him, nor seen his eyes come open. It was not me who raised him, my lady. It was the Lord. R’hllor is not done with him yet. Life is warmth, and warmth is fire, and fire is God’s and God’s alone.”
Arya felt tears well in her eyes. Thoros used a lot of words, but all they meant was no, that much she understood.
“Your father was a good man,” Lord Beric said. “Harwin has told me much of him. For his sake, I would gladly forgo your ransom, but we need the gold too desperately.”
She chewed her lip. That’s true, I guess. He had given the Hound’s gold to Greenbeard and the Huntsman to buy provisions south of the Mander, she knew. “The last harvest burned, this one is drowning, and winter will soon be on us,” she had heard him say when he sent them off. “The smallfolk need grain and seed, and we need blades and horses. Too many of my men ride rounseys, drays, and mules against foes mounted on coursers and destriers.”
Arya didn’t know how much Robb would pay for her, though. He was a king now, not the boy she’d left at Winterfell with snow melting in his hair. And if he knew the things she’d done, the stableboy and the guard at Harrenhal and all . . . “What if my brother doesn’t want to ransom me?”
“Why would you think that?” asked Lord Beric.
“Well,” Arya said, “my hair’s messy and my nails are dirty and my feet are all hard.” Robb wouldn’t care about that, probably, but her mother would. Lady Catelyn always wanted her to be like Sansa, to sing and dance and sew and mind her courtesies. Just thinking of it made Arya try to comb her hair with her fingers, but it was all tangles and mats, and all she did was tear some out. “I ruined that gown that Lady Smallwood gave me, and I don’t sew so good.” She chewed her lip. “I don’t sew very well, I mean. Septa Mordane used to say I had a blacksmith’s hands.”
Gendry hooted. “Those soft little things?” he called out. “You couldn’t even hold a hammer.”
“I could if I wanted!” she snapped at him.
Thoros chuckled. “Your brother will pay, child. Have no fear on that count.”
“Yes, but what if he won’t?” she insisted.
Lord Beric sighed. “Then I will send you to Lady Smallwood for a time, or perhaps to mine own castle of Blackhaven. But that will not be necessary, I’m certain. I do not have the power to give you back your father, no more than Thoros does, but I can at least see that you are returned safely to your mother’s arms.”
“Do you swear?” she asked him. Yoren had promised to take her home too, only he’d gotten killed instead.
“On my honor as a knight,” the lightning lord said solemnly.
It was raining when Lem returned to the brewhouse, muttering curses as water ran off his yellow cloak to puddle on the floor. Anguy and Jack-Be-Lucky sat by the door rolling dice, but no matter which game they played one-eyed Jack had no luck at all. Tom Sevenstrings replaced a string on his woodharp, and sang “The Mother’s Tears,” “When Willum’s Wife Was Wet,” “Lord Harte Rode Out on a Rainy Day,” and then “The Rains of Castamere.”And who are you, the proud lord said,that I must bow so low?Only a cat of a different coat,that’s all the truth I know.In a coat of gold or a coat of red,a lion still has claws,And mine are long and sharp, my lord,as long and sharp as yours.And so he spoke, and so he spoke,that lord of Castamere,But now the rains weep o’er his hall,with no one there to hear.Yes now the rains weep o’er his hall,and not a soul to hear.
Finally Tom ran out of rain songs and put away his harp. Then there was only the sound of the rain itself beating down on the slate roof of the brewhouse. The dice game ended, and Arya stood on one leg and then the other listening to Merrit complain about his horse throwing a shoe.
“I could shoe him for you,” said Gendry, all of a sudden. “I was only a ’prentice, but my master said my hand was made to hold a hammer. I can shoe horses, close up rents in mail, and beat the dents from plate. I bet I could make swords too.”
“What are you saying, lad?” asked Harwin.
“I’ll smith for you.” Gendry went to one knee before Lord Beric. “If you’ll have me, m’lord, I could be of use. I’ve made tools and knives and once I made a helmet that wasn’t so bad. One of the Mountain’s men stole it from me when we was taken.”
Arya bit her lip. He means to leave me too.
“You would do better serving Lord Tully at Riverrun,” said Lord Beric. “I cannot pay for your work.”
“No one ever did. I want a forge, and food to eat, some place I can sleep. That’s enough, m’lord.”
“A smith can find a welcome most anywhere. A skilled armorer even more so. Why would you choose to stay with us?”
Arya watched Gendry screw up his stupid face, thinking. “At the hollow hill, what you said about being King Robert’s men, and brothers, I liked that. I liked that you gave the Hound a trial. Lord Bolton just hanged folk or took off their heads, and Lord Tywin and Ser Amory were the same. I’d sooner smith for you.”
“We got plenty of mail needs mending, m’lord,” Jack reminded Lord Beric. “Most we took off the dead, and there’s holes where the death came through.”
“You must be a lackwit, boy,” said Lem. “We’re outlaws. Lowborn scum, most of us, excepting his lordship. Don’t think it’ll be like Tom’s fool songs neither. You won’t be stealing no kisses from a princess, nor riding in no tourneys in stolen armor. You join us, you’ll end with your neck in a noose, or your head mounted up above some castle gate.”
“It’s no more than they’d do for you,” said Gendry.
“Aye, that’s so,” said Jack-Be-Lucky cheerfully. “The crows await us all. M’lord, the boy seems brave enough, and we do have need of what he brings us. Take him, says Jack.”
“And quick,” suggested Harwin, chuckling, “before the fever passes and he comes back to his senses.”
A wan smile crossed Lord Beric’s lips. “Thoros, my sword.”
This time the lightning lord did not set the blade afire, but merely laid it light on Gendry’s shoulder. “Gendry, do you swear before the eyes of gods and men to defend those who cannot defend themselves, to protect all women and children, to obey your captains, your liege lord, and your king, to fight bravely when needed and do such other tasks as are laid upon you, however hard or humble or dangerous they may be?”
“I do, m’lord.”
The marcher lord moved the sword from the right shoulder to the left, and said, “Arise Ser Gendry, knight of the hollow hill, and be welcome to our brotherhood.”
From the door came rough, rasping laughter.
The rain was running off him. His burned arm was wrapped in leaves and linen and bound tight against his chest by a crude rope sling, but the older burns that marked his face glistened black and slick in the glow of their little fire. “Making more knights, Dondarrion?” the intruder said in a growl. “I ought to kill you all over again for that.”
Lord Beric faced him coolly. “I’d hoped we’d seen the last of you, Clegane. How did you come to find us?”
“It wasn’t hard. You made enough bloody smoke to be seen in Oldtown.”
“What’s become of the sentries I posted?”
Clegane’s mouth twitched. “Those two blind men? Might be I killed them both. What would you do if I had?”
Anguy strung his bow. Notch was doing the same. “Do you wish to die so very much, Sandor?” asked Thoros. “You must be mad or drunk to follow us here.”
“Drunk on rain? You didn’t leave me enough gold to buy a cup of wine, you whoresons.”
Anguy drew an arrow. “We’re outlaws. Outlaws steal. It’s in the songs, if you ask nice Tom may sing you one. Be thankful we didn’t kill you.”
“Come try it, Archer. I’ll take that quiver off you and shove those arrows up your freckly little arse.”
Anguy raised his longbow, but Lord Beric lifted a hand before he could loose. “Why did you come here, Clegane?”
“To get back what’s mine.”
“Your gold?”
“What else? It wasn’t for the pleasure of looking at your face, Dondarrion, I’ll tell you that. You’re uglier than me now. And a robber knight besides, it seems.”
“I gave you a note for your gold,” Lord Beric said calmly. “A promise to pay, when the war’s done.”
“I wiped my arse with your paper. I want the gold.”
“We don’t have it. I sent it south with Greenbeard and the Huntsman, to buy grain and seed across the Mander.”
“To feed all them whose crops you burned,” said Gendry.
“Is that the tale, now?” Sandor Clegane laughed again. “As it happens, that’s just what I meant to do with it. Feed a bunch of ugly peasants and their poxy whelps.”
“You’re lying,” said Gendry.
“The boy has a mouth on him, I see. Why believe them and not me? Couldn’t be my face, could it?” Clegane glanced at Arya. “You going to make her a knight too, Dondarrion? The first eight-year-old girl knight?”
“I’m twelve,” Arya lied loudly, “and I could be a knight if I wanted. I could have killed you too, only Lem took my knife.” Remembering that still made her angry.
“Complain to Lem, not me. Then tuck your tail between your legs and run. Do you know what dogs do to wolves?”
“Next time I will kill you. I’ll kill your brother too!”
“No.” His dark eyes narrowed. “That you won’t.” He turned back to Lord Beric. “Say, make my horse a knight. He never shits in the hall and doesn’t kick more than most, he deserves to be knighted. Unless you meant to steal him too.”
“Best climb on that horse and go,” warned Lem.
“I’ll go with my gold. Your own god said I’m guiltless—”
“The Lord of Light gave you back your life,” declared Thoros of Myr. “He did not proclaim you Baelor the Blessed come again.” The red priest unsheathed his sword, and Arya saw that Jack and Merrit had drawn as well. Lord Beric still held the blade he’d used to dub Gendry. Maybe this time they’ll kill him.
The Hound’s mouth gave another twitch. “You’re no more than common thieves.”
Lem glowered. “Your lion friends ride into some village, take all the food and every coin they find, and call it foraging. The wolves as well, so why not us? No one robbed you, dog. You just been good and foraged.”
Sandor Clegane looked at their faces, every one, as if he were trying to commit them all to memory. Then he walked back out into the darkness and the pouring rain from whence he’d come, with never another word. The outlaws waited, wondering . . . 
“I best go see what he did to our sentries.” Harwin took a wary look out the door before he left, to make certain the Hound was not lurking just outside.
“How’d that bloody bastard get all that gold anyhow?” Lem Lemoncloak said, to break the tension.
Anguy shrugged. “He won the Hand’s tourney. In King’s Landing.” The bowman grinned. “I won a fair fortune myself, but then I met Dancy, Jayde, and Alayaya. They taught me what roast swan tastes like, and how to bathe in Arbor wine.”
“Pissed it all away, did you?” laughed Harwin.
“Not all. I bought these boots, and this excellent dagger.”
“You ought t’have bought some land and made one o’ them roast swan girls an honest woman,” said Jack-Be-Lucky. “Raised yourself a crop o’ turnips and a crop o’ sons.”
“Warrior defend me! What a waste that would have been, to turn my gold to turnips.”
“I like turnips,” said Jack, aggrieved. “I could do with some mashed turnips right now.”
Thoros of Myr paid no heed to the banter. “The Hound has lost more than a few bags of coin,” he mused. “He has lost his master and kennel as well. He cannot go back to the Lannisters, the Young Wolf would never have him, nor would his brother be like to welcome him. That gold was all he had left, it seems to me.”
“Bloody hell,” said Watty the Miller. “He’ll come murder us in our sleep for sure, then.”
“No.” Lord Beric had sheathed his sword. “Sandor Clegane would kill us all gladly, but not in our sleep. Anguy, on the morrow, take the rear with Beardless Dick. If you see Clegane still sniffing after us, kill his horse.”
“That’s a good horse,” Anguy protested.
“Aye,” said Lem. “It’s the bloody rider we should be killing. We could use that horse.”
“I’m with Lem,” Notch said. “Let me feather the dog a few times, discourage him some.”
Lord Beric shook his head. “Clegane won his life beneath the hollow hill. I will not rob him of it.”
“My lord is wise,” Thoros told the others. “Brothers, a trial by battle is a holy thing. You heard me ask R’hllor to take a hand, and you saw his fiery finger snap Lord Beric’s sword, just as he was about to make an end of it. The Lord of Light is not yet done with Joffrey’s Hound, it would seem.”
Harwin soon returned to the brewhouse. “Puddingfoot was sound asleep, but unharmed.”
“Wait till I get hold of him,” said Lem. “I’ll cut him a new bunghole. He could have gotten every one of us killed.”
No one rested very comfortably that night, knowing that Sandor Clegane was out there in the dark, somewhere close. Arya curled up near the fire, warm and snug, yet sleep would not come. She took out the coin that Jaqen H’ghar had given her and curled her fingers around it as she lay beneath her cloak. It made her feel strong to hold it, remembering how she’d seen the ghost in Harrenhal. She could kill with a whisper then.
Jaqen was gone, though. He’d left her. Hot Pie left me too, and now Gendry is leaving. Lommy had died, Yoren had died, Syrio Forel had died, even her father had died, and Jaqen had given her a stupid iron penny and vanished. “Valar morghulis,” she whispered softly, tightening her fist so the hard edges of the coin dug into her palm. “Ser Gregor, Dunsen, Polliver, Raff the Sweetling. The Tickler and the Hound. Ser Ilyn, Ser Meryn, King Joffrey, Queen Cersei.” Arya tried to imagine how they would look when they were dead, but it was hard to bring their faces to mind. The Hound she could see, and his brother the Mountain, and she would never forget Joffrey’s face, or his mother’s . . . but Raff and Dunsen and Polliver were all fading, and even the Tickler, whose looks had been so commonplace.
Sleep took her at last, but in the black of night Arya woke again, tingling. The fire had burned down to embers. Mudge stood by the door, and another guard was pacing outside. The rain had stopped, and she could hear wolves howling. So close, she thought, and so many. They sounded as if they were all around the stable, dozens of them, maybe hundreds. I hope they eat the Hound. She remembered what he’d said, about wolves and dogs.
Come morning, Septon Utt still swung beneath the tree, but the brown brothers were out in the rain with spades, digging shallow graves for the other dead. Lord Beric thanked them for the night’s lodging and the meal, and gave them a bag of silver stags to help rebuild. Harwin, Likely Luke, and Watty the Miller went out scouting, but neither wolves nor hounds were found.
As Arya was cinching her saddle girth, Gendry came up to say that he was sorry. She put a foot in the stirrup and swung up into her saddle, so she could look down on him instead of up. You could have made swords at Riverrun for my brother, she thought, but what she said was, “If you want to be some stupid outlaw knight and get hanged, why should I care? I’ll be at Riverrun, ransomed, with my brother.”
There was no rain that day, thankfully, and for once they made good time.

When Arya saw the shape of a great hill looming in the distance, golden in the afternoon sun, she knew it at once. They had come all the way back to High Heart.
By sunset they were at the top, making camp where no harm could come to them. Arya walked around the circle of weirwood stumps with Lord Beric’s squire Ned, and they stood on top of one watching the last light fade in the west. From up here she could see a storm raging to the north, but High Heart stood above the rain. It wasn’t above the wind, though; the gusts were blowing so strongly that it felt like someone was behind her, yanking on her cloak. Only when she turned, no one was there.
Ghosts, she remembered. High Heart is haunted.
They built a great fire atop the hill, and Thoros of Myr sat crosslegged beside it, gazing deep into the flames as if there was nothing else in all the world.
“What is he doing?” Arya asked Ned.
“Sometimes he sees things in the flames,” the squire told her. “The past. The future. Things happening far away.”
Arya squinted at the fire to see if she could see what the red priest was seeing, but it only made her eyes water and before long she turned away. Gendry was watching the red priest as well. “Can you truly see the future there?” he asked suddenly.
Thoros turned from the fire, sighing. “Not here. Not now. But some days, yes, the Lord of Light grants me visions.”
Gendry looked dubious. “My master said you were a sot and a fraud, as bad a priest as there ever was.”
“That was unkind.” Thoros chuckled. “True, but unkind. Who was this master of yours? Did I know you, boy?”
“I was ’prenticed to the master armorer Tobho Mott, on the Street of Steel. You used to buy your swords from him.”
“Just so. He charged me twice what they were worth, then scolded me for setting them afire.” Thoros laughed. “Your master had it right. I was no very holy priest. I was born youngest of eight, so my father gave me over to the Red Temple, but it was not the path I would have chosen. I prayed the prayers and I spoke the spells, but I would also lead raids on the kitchens, and from time to time they found girls in my bed. Such wicked girls, I never knew how they got there.
“I had a gift for tongues, though. And when I gazed into the flames, well, from time to time I saw things. Even so, I was more bother than I was worth, so they sent me finally to King’s Landing to bring the Lord’s light to seven-besotted Westeros. King Aerys so loved fire it was thought he might make a convert. Alas, his pyromancers knew better tricks than I did.
“King Robert was fond of me, though. The first time I rode into a mêlée with a flaming sword, Kevan Lannister’s horse reared and threw him and His Grace laughed so hard I thought he might rupture.” The red priest smiled at the memory. “It was no way to treat a blade, though, your master had the right of that too.”
“Fire consumes.” Lord Beric stood behind them, and there was something in his voice that silenced Thoros at once. “It consumes, and when it is done there is nothing left. Nothing.”
“Beric. Sweet friend.” The priest touched the lightning lord on the forearm. “What are you saying?”
“Nothing I have not said before. Six times, Thoros? Six times is too many.” He turned away abruptly.
That night the wind was howling almost like a wolf and there were some real wolves off to the west giving it lessons. Notch, Anguy, and Merrit o’ Moontown had the watch. Ned, Gendry, and many of the others were fast asleep when Arya spied the small pale shape creeping behind the horses, thin white hair flying wild as she leaned upon a gnarled cane. The woman could not have been more than three feet tall. The firelight made her eyes gleam as red as the eyes of Jon’s wolf. He was a ghost too. Arya stole closer, and knelt to watch.
Thoros and Lem were with Lord Beric when the dwarf woman sat down uninvited by the fire. She squinted at them with eyes like hot coals. “The Ember and the Lemon come to honor me again, and His Grace the Lord of Corpses.”
“An ill-omened name. I have asked you not to use it.”
“Aye, you have. But the stink of death is fresh on you, my lord.” She had but a single tooth remaining. “Give me wine or I will go. My bones are old. My joints ache when the winds do blow, and up here the winds are always blowing.”
“A silver stag for your dreams, my lady,” Lord Beric said, with solemn courtesy. “Another if you have news for us.”
“I cannot eat a silver stag, nor ride one. A skin of wine for my dreams, and for my news a kiss from the great oaf in the yellow cloak.” The little woman cackled. “Aye, a sloppy kiss, a bit of tongue. It has been too long, too long. His mouth will taste of lemons, and mine of bones. I am too old.”
“Aye,” Lem complained. “Too old for wine and kisses. All you’ll get from me is the flat of my sword, crone.”
“My hair comes out in handfuls and no one has kissed me for a thousand years. It is hard to be so old. Well, I will have a song then. A song from Tom o’ Sevens, for my news.”
“You will have your song from Tom,” Lord Beric promised. He gave her the wineskin himself.
The dwarf woman drank deep, the wine running down her chin. When she lowered the skin, she wiped her mouth with the back of a wrinkled hand and said, “Sour wine for sour tidings, what could be more fitting? The king is dead, is that sour enough for you?”
Arya’s heart caught in her throat.
“Which bloody king is dead, crone?” Lem demanded.
“The wet one. The kraken king, m’lords. I dreamt him dead and he died, and the iron squids now turn on one another. Oh, and Lord Hoster Tully’s died too, but you know that, don’t you? In the hall of kings, the goat sits alone and fevered as the great dog descends on him.” The old woman took another long gulp of wine, squeezing the skin as she raised it to her lips.
The great dog. Did she mean the Hound? Or maybe his brother, the Mountain That Rides? Arya was not certain. They bore the same arms, three black dogs on a yellow field. Half the men whose deaths she prayed for belonged to Ser Gregor Clegane; Polliver, Dunsen, Raff the Sweetling, the Tickler, and Ser Gregor himself. Maybe Lord Beric will hang them all.
“I dreamt a wolf howling in the rain, but no one heard his grief,” the dwarf woman was saying. “I dreamt such a clangor I thought my head might burst, drums and horns and pipes and screams, but the saddest sound was the little bells. I dreamt of a maid at a feast with purple serpents in her hair, venom dripping from their fangs. And later I dreamt that maid again, slaying a savage giant in a castle built of snow.” She turned her head sharply and smiled through the gloom, right at Arya. “You cannot hide from me, child. Come closer, now.”
Cold fingers walked down Arya’s neck. Fear cuts deeper than swords, she reminded herself. She stood and approached the fire warily, light on the balls of her feet, poised to flee.
The dwarf woman studied her with dim red eyes. “I see you,” she whispered. “I see you, wolf child. Blood child. I thought it was the lord who smelled of death . . .” She began to sob, her little body shaking. “You are cruel to come to my hill, cruel. I gorged on grief at Summerhall, I need none of yours. Begone from here, dark heart. Begone!”
There was such fear in her voice that Arya took a step backward, wondering if the woman was mad. “Don’t frighten the child,” Thoros protested. “There’s no harm in her.”
Lem Lemoncloak’s finger went to his broken nose. “Don’t be so bloody sure of that.”
“She will leave on the morrow, with us,” Lord Beric assured the little woman. “We’re taking her to Riverrun, to her mother.”
“Nay,” said the dwarf. “You’re not. The black fish holds the rivers now. If it’s the mother you want, seek her at the Twins. For there’s to be a wedding.” She cackled again. “Look in your fires, pink priest, and you will see. Not now, though, not here, you’ll see nothing here. This place belongs to the old gods still . . . they linger here as I do, shrunken and feeble but not yet dead. Nor do they love the flames. For the oak recalls the acorn, the acorn dreams the oak, the stump lives in them both. And they remember when the First Men came with fire in their fists.” She drank the last of the wine in four long swallows, flung the skin aside, and pointed her stick at Lord Beric. “I’ll have my payment now. I’ll have the song you promised me.”
And so Lem woke Tom Sevenstrings beneath his furs, and brought him yawning to the fireside with his woodharp in hand. “The same song as before?” he asked.
“Oh, aye. My Jenny’s song. Is there another?”
And so he sang, and the dwarf woman closed her eyes and rocked slowly back and forth, murmuring the words and crying. Thoros took Arya firmly by the hand and drew her aside. “Let her savor her song in peace,” he said. “It is all she has left.”
I wasn’t going to hurt her, Arya thought. “What did she mean about the Twins? My mother’s at Riverrun, isn’t she?”
“She was.” The red priest rubbed beneath his chin. “A wedding, she said. We shall see. Wherever she is, Lord Beric will find her, though.”
Not long after, the sky opened. Lightning cracked and thunder rolled across the hills, and the rain fell in blinding sheets. The dwarf woman vanished as suddenly as she had appeared, while the outlaws gathered branches and threw up crude shelters.
It rained all through that night, and come morning Ned, Lem, and Watty the Miller awoke with chills. Watty could not keep his breakfast down, and young Ned was feverish and shivering by turns, with skin clammy to the touch. There was an abandoned village half a day’s ride to the north, Notch told Lord Beric; they’d find better shelter there, a place to wait out the worst of the rains. So they dragged themselves back into the saddles and urged their horses down the great hill.
The rains did not let up. They rode through woods and fields, fording swollen streams where the rushing water came up to the bellies of their horses. Arya pulled up the hood of her cloak and hunched down, sodden and shivering but determined not to falter. Merrit and Mudge were soon coughing as bad as Watty, and poor Ned seemed to grow more miserable with every mile. “When I wear my helm, the rain beats against the steel and gives me headaches,” he complained. “But when I take it off, my hair gets soaked and sticks to my face and in my mouth.”
“You have a knife,” Gendry suggested. “If your hair annoys you so much, shave your bloody head.”
He doesn’t like Ned. The squire seemed nice enough to Arya; maybe a little shy, but good-natured. She had always heard that Dornishmen were small and swarthy, with black hair and small black eyes, but Ned had big blue eyes, so dark that they looked almost purple. And his hair was a pale blond, more ash than honey.
“How long have you been Lord Beric’s squire?” she asked, to take his mind from his misery.
“He took me for his page when he espoused my aunt.” He coughed. “I was seven, but when I turned ten he raised me to squire. I won a prize once, riding at rings.”
“I never learned the lance, but I could beat you with a sword,” said Arya. “Have you killed anyone?”
That seemed to startle him. “I’m only twelve.”
I killed a boy when I was eight, Arya almost said, but she thought she’d better not. “You’ve been in battles, though.”
“Yes.” He did not sound very proud of it. “I was at the Mummer’s Ford. When Lord Beric fell into the river, I dragged him up onto the bank so he wouldn’t drown and stood over him with my sword. I never had to fight, though. He had a broken lance sticking out of him, so no one bothered us. When we regrouped, Green Gergen helped pull his lordship back onto a horse.”
Arya was remembering the stableboy at King’s Landing. After him there’d been that guard whose throat she cut at Harrenhal, and Ser Amory’s men at that holdfast by the lake. She didn’t know if Weese and Chiswyck counted, or the ones who’d died on account of the weasel soup . . . all of a sudden, she felt very sad. “My father was called Ned too,” she said.
“I know. I saw him at the Hand’s tourney. I wanted to go up and speak with him, but I couldn’t think what to say.” Ned shivered beneath his cloak, a sodden length of pale purple. “Were you at the tourney? I saw your sister there. Ser Loras Tyrell gave her a rose.”
“She told me.” It all seemed so long ago. “Her friend Jeyne Poole fell in love with your Lord Beric.”
“He’s promised to my aunt.” Ned looked uncomfortable. “That was before, though. Before he . . .”
 . . . died? she thought, as Ned’s voice trailed off into an awkward silence. Their horses’ hooves made sucking sounds as they pulled free of the mud.
“My lady?” Ned said at last. “You have a baseborn brother . . . Jon Snow?”
“He’s with the Night’s Watch on the Wall.” Maybe I should go to the Wall instead of Riverrun. Jon wouldn’t care who I killed or whether I brushed my hair . . . “Jon looks like me, even though he’s bastard-born. He used to muss my hair and call me ‘little sister.’” Arya missed Jon most of all. Just saying his name made her sad. “How do you know about Jon?”
“He is my milk brother.”
“Brother?” Arya did not understand. “But you’re from Dorne. How could you and Jon be blood?”
“Milk brothers. Not blood. My lady mother had no milk when I was little, so Wylla had to nurse me.”
Arya was lost. “Who’s Wylla?”
“Jon Snow’s mother. He never told you? She’s served us for years and years. Since before I was born.”
“Jon never knew his mother. Not even her name.” Arya gave Ned a wary look. “You know her? Truly?” Is he making mock of me? “If you lie I’ll punch your face.”
“Wylla was my wetnurse,” he repeated solemnly. “I swear it on the honor of my House.”
“You have a House?” That was stupid; he was a squire, of course he had a House. “Who are you?”
“My lady?” Ned looked embarrassed. “I’m Edric Dayne, the . . . the Lord of Starfall.”
Behind them, Gendry groaned. “Lords and ladies,” he proclaimed in a disgusted tone. Arya plucked a withered crabapple off a passing branch and whipped it at him, bouncing it off his thick bull head. “Ow,” he said. “That hurt.” He felt the skin above his eye. “What kind of lady throws crabapples at people?”
“The bad kind,” said Arya, suddenly contrite. She turned back to Ned. “I’m sorry I didn’t know who you were. My lord.”
“The fault is mine, my lady.” He was very polite.
Jon has a mother. Wylla, her name is Wylla. She would need to remember so she could tell him, the next time she saw him. She wondered if he would still call her “little sister.” I’m not so little anymore. He’d have to call me something else. Maybe once she got to Riverrun she could write Jon a letter and tell him what Ned Dayne had said. “There was an Arthur Dayne,” she remembered. “The one they called the Sword of the Morning.”
“My father was Ser Arthur’s elder brother. Lady Ashara was my aunt. I never knew her, though. She threw herself into the sea from atop the Palestone Sword before I was born.”
“Why would she do that?” said Arya, startled.
Ned looked wary. Maybe he was afraid that she was going to throw something at him. “Your lord father never spoke of her?” he said. “The Lady Ashara Dayne, of Starfall?”
“No. Did he know her?”
“Before Robert was king. She met your father and his brothers at Harrenhal, during the year of the false spring.”
“Oh.” Arya did not know what else to say. “Why did she jump in the sea, though?”
“Her heart was broken.”
Sansa would have sighed and shed a tear for true love, but Arya just thought it was stupid. She couldn’t say that to Ned, though, not about his own aunt. “Did someone break it?”
He hesitated. “Perhaps it’s not my place . . .”
“Tell me.”
He looked at her uncomfortably. “My aunt Allyria says Lady Ashara and your father fell in love at Harrenhal—”
“That’s not so. He loved my lady mother.”
“I’m sure he did, my lady, but—”
“She was the only one he loved.”
“He must have found that bastard under a cabbage leaf, then,” Gendry said behind them.
Arya wished she had another crabapple to bounce off his face. “My father had honor,” she said angrily. “And we weren’t talking to you anyway. Why don’t you go back to Stoney Sept and ring that girl’s stupid bells?”
Gendry ignored that. “At least your father raised his bastard, not like mine. I don’t even know my father’s name. Some smelly drunk, I’d wager, like the others my mother dragged home from the alehouse. Whenever she got mad at me, she’d say, ‘If your father was here, he’d beat you bloody.’ That’s all I know of him.” He spat. “Well, if he was here now, might be I’d beat him bloody. But he’s dead, I figure, and your father’s dead too, so what does it matter who he lay with?”
It mattered to Arya, though she could not have said why. Ned was trying to apologize for upsetting her, but she did not want to hear it. She pressed her heels into her horse and left them both. Anguy the Archer was riding a few yards ahead. When she caught up with him, she said, “Dornishmen lie, don’t they?”
“They’re famous for it.” The bowman grinned. “Of course, they say the same of us marchers, so there you are. What’s the trouble now? Ned’s a good lad . . .”
“He’s just a stupid liar.” Arya left the trail, leapt a rotten log and splashed across a streambed, ignoring the shouts of the outlaws behind her. They just want to tell me more lies. She thought about trying to get away from them, but there were too many and they knew these lands too well. What was the use of running if they caught you?
It was Harwin who rode up beside her, in the end. “Where do you think you’re going, milady? You shouldn’t run off. There are wolves in these woods, and worse things.”
“I’m not afraid,” she said. “That boy Ned said . . .”
“Aye, he told me. Lady Ashara Dayne. It’s an old tale, that one. I heard it once at Winterfell, when I was no older than you are now.” He took hold of her bridle firmly and turned her horse around. “I doubt there’s any truth to it. But if there is, what of it? When Ned met this Dornish lady, his brother Brandon was still alive, and it was him betrothed to Lady Catelyn, so there’s no stain on your father’s honor. There’s nought like a tourney to make the blood run hot, so maybe some words were whispered in a tent of a night, who can say? Words or kisses, maybe more, but where’s the harm in that? Spring had come, or so they thought, and neither one of them was pledged.”
“She killed herself, though,” said Arya uncertainly. “Ned says she jumped from a tower into the sea.”
“So she did,” Harwin admitted, as he led her back, “but that was for grief, I’d wager. She’d lost a brother, the Sword of the Morning.” He shook his head. “Let it lie, my lady. They’re dead, all of them. Let it lie . . . and please, when we come to Riverrun, say naught of this to your mother.”
The village was just where Notch had promised it would be. They took shelter in a grey stone stable. Only half a roof remained, but that was half a roof more than any other building in the village. It’s not a village, it’s only black stones and old bones. “Did the Lannisters kill the people who lived here?” Arya asked as she helped Anguy dry the horses.
“No.” He pointed. “Look at how thick the moss grows on the stones. No one’s moved them for a long time. And there’s a tree growing out of the wall there, see? This place was put to the torch a long time ago.”
“Who did it, then?” asked Gendry.
“Hoster Tully.” Notch was a stooped thin grey-haired man, born in these parts. “This was Lord Goodbrook’s village. When Riverrun declared for Robert, Goodbrook stayed loyal to the king, so Lord Tully came down on him with fire and sword. After the Trident, Goodbrook’s son made his peace with Robert and Lord Hoster, but that didn’t help the dead none.”
A silence fell. Gendry gave Arya a queer look, then turned away to brush his horse. Outside the rain came down and down. “I say we need a fire,” Thoros declared. “The night is dark and full of terrors. And wet too, eh? Too very wet.”
Jack-Be-Lucky hacked some dry wood from a stall, while Notch and Merrit gathered straw for kindling. Thoros himself struck the spark, and Lem fanned the flames with his big yellow cloak until they roared and swirled. Soon it grew almost hot inside the stable. Thoros sat before it crosslegged, devouring the flames with his eyes just as he had atop High Heart. Arya watched him closely, and once his lips moved, and she thought she heard him mutter, “Riverrun.” Lem paced back and forth, coughing, a long shadow matching him stride for stride, while Tom o’ Sevens pulled off his boots and rubbed his feet. “I must be mad, to be going back to Riverrun,” the singer complained. “The Tullys have never been lucky for old Tom. It was that Lysa sent me up the high road, when the moon men took my gold and my horse and all my clothes as well. There’s knights in the Vale still telling how I came walking up to the Bloody Gate with only my harp to keep me modest. They made me sing ‘The Name Day Boy’ and ‘The King Without Courage’ before they opened that gate. My only solace was that three of them died laughing. I haven’t been back to the Eyrie since, and I won’t sing ‘The King Without Courage’ either, not for all the gold in Casterly—”
“Lannisters,” Thoros said. “Roaring red and gold.” He lurched to his feet and went to Lord Beric. Lem and Tom wasted no time joining them. Arya could not make out what they were saying, but the singer kept glancing at her, and one time Lem got so angry he pounded a fist against the wall. That was when Lord Beric gestured for her to come closer. It was the last thing she wanted to do, but Harwin put a hand in the small of her back and pushed her forward. She took two steps and hesitated, full of dread. “My lord.” She waited to hear what Lord Beric would say.
“Tell her,” the lightning lord commanded Thoros.
The red priest squatted down beside her. “My lady,” he said, “the Lord granted me a view of Riverrun. An island in a sea of fire, it seemed. The flames were leaping lions with long crimson claws. And how they roared! A sea of Lannisters, my lady. Riverrun will soon come under attack.”
Arya felt as though he’d punched her in the belly. “No!”
“Sweetling,” said Thoros, “the flames do not lie. Sometimes I read them wrongly, blind fool that I am. But not this time, I think. The Lannisters will soon have Riverrun under siege.”
“Robb will beat them.” Arya got a stubborn look. “He’ll beat them like he did before.”
“Your brother may be gone,” said Thoros. “Your mother as well. I did not see them in the flames. This wedding the old one spoke of, a wedding on the Twins . . . she has her own ways of knowing things, that one. The weirwoods whisper in her ear when she sleeps. If she says your mother is gone to the Twins . . .”
Arya turned on Tom and Lem. “If you hadn’t caught me, I would have been there. I would have been home.”
Lord Beric paid no heed to her outburst. “My lady,” he said with weary courtesy, “would you know your grandfather’s brother by sight? Ser Brynden Tully, called the Blackfish? Would he know you, perchance?”
Arya shook her head miserably. She had heard her mother speak of Ser Brynden Blackfish, but if she had ever met him herself it had been when she was too little to remember.
“Small chance the Blackfish will pay good coin for a girl he doesn’t know,” said Tom. “Those Tullys are a sour, suspicious lot, he’s like to think we’re selling him false goods.”
“We’ll convince him,” Lem Lemoncloak insisted. “She will, or Harwin. Riverrun is closest. I say we take her there, get the gold, and be bloody well done with her.”
“And if the lions catch us inside the castle?” said Tom. “They’d like nothing better than to hang his lordship in a cage from the top of Casterly Rock.”
“I do not mean to be taken,” said Lord Beric. A final word hung unspoken in the air. Alive. They all heard it, even Arya, though it never passed his lips. “Still, we dare not go blindly here. I want to know where the armies are, the wolves and lions both. Sharna will know something, and Lord Vance’s maester will know more. Acorn Hall’s not far. Lady Smallwood will shelter us for a time while we send scouts ahead to learn . . .”
His words beat at her ears like the pounding of a drum, and suddenly it was more than Arya could stand. She wanted Riverrun, not Acorn Hall; she wanted her mother and her brother Robb, not Lady Smallwood or some uncle she never knew. Whirling, she broke for the door, and when Harwin tried to grab her arm she spun away from him quick as a snake.
Outside the stables the rain was still falling, and distant lightning flashed in the west. Arya ran as fast as she could. She did not know where she was going, only that she wanted to be alone, away from all the voices, away from their hollow words and broken promises. All I wanted was to go to Riverrun. It was her own fault, for taking Gendry and Hot Pie with her when she left Harrenhal. She would have been better alone. If she had been alone, the outlaws would never have caught her, and she’d be with Robb and her mother by now. They were never my pack. If they had been, they wouldn’t leave me. She splashed through a puddle of muddy water. Someone was shouting her name, Harwin probably, or Gendry, but the thunder drowned them out as it rolled across the hills, half a heartbeat behind the lightning. The lightning lord, she thought angrily. Maybe he couldn’t die, but he could lie.
Somewhere off to her left a horse whinnied. Arya couldn’t have gone more than fifty yards from the stables, yet already she was soaked to the bone. She ducked around the corner of one of the tumbledown houses, hoping the mossy walls would keep the rain off, and almost bowled right into one of the sentries. A mailed hand closed hard around her arm.
“You’re hurting me,” she said, twisting in his grasp. “Let go, I was going to go back, I . . .”
“Back?” Sandor Clegane’s laughter was iron scraping over stone. “Bugger that, wolf girl. You’re mine.” He needed only one hand to yank her off her feet and drag her kicking toward his waiting horse. The cold rain lashed them both and washed away her shouts, and all that Arya could think of was the question he had asked her. Do you know what dogs do to wolves?

When they reached the top of the ridge and saw the river, Sandor Clegane reined up hard and cursed.
The rain was falling from a black iron sky, pricking the green and brown torrent with ten thousand swords. It must be a mile across, Arya thought. The tops of half a hundred trees poked up out the swirling waters, their limbs clutching for the sky like the arms of drowning men. Thick mats of sodden leaves choked the shoreline, and farther out in the channel she glimpsed something pale and swollen, a deer or perhaps a dead horse, moving swiftly downstream. There was a sound too, a low rumble at the edge of hearing, like the sound a dog makes just before he growls.
Arya squirmed in the saddle and felt the links of the Hound’s mail digging into her back. His arms encircled her; on the left, the burned arm, he’d donned a steel vambrace for protection, but she’d seen him change the dressings, and the flesh beneath was still raw and seeping. If the burns pained him, though, Sandor Clegane gave no hint of it.
“Is this the Blackwater Rush?” They had ridden so far in rain and darkness, through trackless woods and nameless villages, that Arya had lost all sense of where they were.
“It’s a river we need to cross, that’s all you need to know.” Clegane would answer her from time to time, but he had warned her not to talk back. He had given her a lot of warnings that first day. “The next time you hit me, I’ll tie your hands behind your back,” he’d said. “The next time you try and run off, I’ll bind your feet together. Scream or shout or bite me again, and I’ll gag you. We can ride double, or I can throw you across the back of the horse trussed up like a sow for slaughter. Your choice.”
She had chosen to ride, but the first time they made camp she’d waited until she thought he was asleep, and found a big jagged rock to smash his ugly head in. Quiet as a shadow, she told herself as she crept toward him, but that wasn’t quiet enough. The Hound hadn’t been asleep after all. Or maybe he’d woken. Whichever it was, his eyes opened, his mouth twitched, and he took the rock away from her as if she were a baby. The best she could do was kick him. “I’ll give you that one,” he said, when he flung the rock into the bushes. “But if you’re stupid enough to try again, I’ll hurt you.”
“Why don’t you just kill me like you did Mycah?” Arya had screamed at him. She was still defiant then, more angry than scared.
He answered by grabbing the front of her tunic and yanking her within an inch of his burned face. “The next time you say that name I’ll beat you so bad you’ll wish I killed you.”
After that, he rolled her in his horse blanket every night when he went to sleep, and tied ropes around her top and bottom so she was bound up as tight as a babe in swaddling clothes.
It has to be the Blackwater, Arya decided as she watched the rain lash the river. The Hound was Joffrey’s dog; he was taking her back to the Red Keep, to hand to Joffrey and the queen. She wished that the sun would come out, so she could tell which way they were going. The more she looked at the moss on the trees the more confused she got. The Blackwater wasn’t so wide at King’s Landing, but that was before the rains.
“The fords will all be gone,” Sandor Clegane said, “and I wouldn’t care to try and swim over neither.”
There’s no way across, she thought. Lord Beric will catch us for sure. Clegane had pushed his big black stallion hard, doubling back thrice to throw off pursuit, once even riding half a mile up the center of a swollen stream . . . but Arya still expected to see the outlaws every time she looked back. She had tried to help them by scratching her name on the trunks of trees when she went in the bushes to make water, but the fourth time she did it he caught her, and that was the end of that. It doesn’t matter, Arya told herself, Thoros will find me in his flames. Only he hadn’t. Not yet, anyway, and once they crossed the river . . . 
“Harroway town shouldn’t be far,” the Hound said. “Where Lord Roote stables Old King Andahar’s two-headed water horse. Maybe we’ll ride across.”
Arya had never heard of Old King Andahar. She’d never seen a horse with two heads either, especially not one who could run on water, but she knew better than to ask. She held her tongue and sat stiff as the Hound turned the stallion’s head and trotted along the ridgeline, following the river downstream. At least the rain was at their backs this way. She’d had enough of it stinging her eyes half-blind and washing down her cheeks like she was crying. Wolves never cry, she reminded herself again.
It could not have been much past noon, but the sky was dark as dusk. They had not seen the sun in more days than she could count. Arya was soaked to the bone, saddle-sore, sniffling, and achy. She had a fever too, and sometimes shivered uncontrollably, but when she’d told the Hound that she was sick he’d only snarled at her. “Wipe your nose and shut your mouth,” he told her. Half the time he slept in the saddle now, trusting his stallion to follow whatever rutted farm track or game trail they were on. The horse was a heavy courser, almost as big as a destrier but much faster. Stranger, the Hound called him. Arya had tried to steal him once, when Clegane was taking a piss against a tree, thinking she could ride off before he could catch her. Stranger had almost bitten her face off. He was gentle as an old gelding with his master, but otherwise he had a temper as black as he was. She had never known a horse so quick to bite or kick.
They rode beside the river for hours, splashing across two muddy vassal streams before they reached the place that Sandor Clegane had spoken of. “Lord Harroway’s Town,” he said, and then, when he saw it, “Seven hells!” The town was drowned and desolate. The rising waters had overflowed the riverbanks. All that remained of Harroway town was the upper story of a daub-and-wattle inn, the seven-sided dome of a sunken sept, two-thirds of a stone roundtower, some moldy thatch roofs, and a forest of chimneys.
But there was smoke coming from the tower, Arya saw, and below one arched window a wide flat-bottomed boat was chained up tight. The boat had a dozen oarlocks and a pair of great carved wooden horse heads mounted fore and aft. The two-headed horse, she realized. There was a wooden house with a sod roof right in the middle of the deck, and when the Hound cupped his hands around his mouth and shouted two men came spilling out. A third appeared in the window of the roundtower, clutching a loaded crossbow. “What do you want?” he shouted across the swirling brown waters.
“Take us over,” the Hound shouted back.
The men in the boat conferred with one another. One of them, a grizzled grey-haired man with thick arms and a bent back, stepped to the rail. “It will cost you.”
“Then I’ll pay.”
With what? Arya wondered. The outlaws had taken Clegane’s gold, but maybe Lord Beric had left him some silver and copper. A ferry ride shouldn’t cost more than a few coppers . . . 
The ferrymen were talking again. Finally the bent-backed one turned away and gave a shout. Six more men appeared, pulling up hoods to keep the rain off their heads. Still more squirmed out the holdfast window and leapt down onto the deck. Half of them looked enough like the bent-backed man to be his kin. Some of them undid the chains and took up long poles, while the others slid heavy wide-bladed oars through the locks. The ferry swung about and began to creep slowly toward the shallows, oars stroking smoothly on either side. Sandor Clegane rode down the hill to meet it.
When the aft end of the boat slammed into the hillside, the ferrymen opened a wide door beneath the carved horse’s head, and extended a heavy oaken plank. Stranger balked at the water’s edge, but the Hound put his heels into the courser’s flank and urged him up the gangway. The bent-backed man was waiting for them on deck. “Wet enough for you, ser?” he asked, smiling.
The Hound’s mouth gave a twitch. “I need your boat, not your bloody wit.” He dismounted, and pulled Arya down beside him. One of the boatmen reached for Stranger’s bridle. “I wouldn’t,” Clegane said, as the horse kicked. The man leapt back, slipped on the rain-slick deck, and crashed onto his arse, cursing.
The ferryman with the bent back wasn’t smiling any longer. “We can get you across,” he said sourly. “It will cost you a gold piece. Another for the horse. A third for the boy.”
“Three dragons?” Clegane gave a bark of laughter. “For three dragons I should own the bloody ferry.”
“Last year, might be you could. But with this river, I’ll need extra hands on the poles and oars just to see we don’t get swept a hundred miles out to sea. Here’s your choice. Three dragons, or you teach that hellhorse how to walk on water.”
“I like an honest brigand. Have it your way. Three dragons . . . when you put us ashore safe on the north bank.”
“I’ll have them now, or we don’t go.” The man thrust out a thick, callused hand, palm up.
Clegane rattled his longsword to loosen the blade in the scabbard. “Here’s your choice. Gold on the north bank, or steel on the south.”
The ferryman looked up at the Hound’s face. Arya could tell that he didn’t like what he saw there. He had a dozen men behind him, strong men with oars and hardwood poles in their hands, but none of them were rushing forward to help him. Together they could overwhelm Sandor Clegane, though he’d likely kill three or four of them before they took him down. “How do I know you’re good for it?” the bent-backed man asked, after a moment.
He’s not, she wanted to shout. Instead she bit her lip.
“Knight’s honor,” the Hound said, unsmiling.
He’s not even a knight. She did not say that either.
“That will do.” The ferryman spat. “Come on then, we can have you across before dark. Tie the horse up, I don’t want him spooking when we’re under way. There’s a brazier in the cabin if you and your son want to get warm.”
“I’m not his stupid son!” said Arya furiously. That was even worse than being taken for a boy. She was so angry that she might have told them who she really was, only Sandor Clegane grabbed her by the back of the collar and hoisted her one-handed off the deck. “How many times do I need to tell you to shut your bloody mouth?” He shook her so hard her teeth rattled, then let her fall. “Get in there and get dry, like the man said.”
Arya did as she was told. The big iron brazier was glowing red, filling the room with a sullen suffocating heat. It felt pleasant to stand beside it, to warm her hands and dry off a little bit, but as soon as she felt the deck move under her feet she slipped back out through the forward door.
The two-headed horse eased slowly through the shallows, picking its way between the chimneys and rooftops of drowned Harroway. A dozen men labored at the oars while four more used the long poles to push off whenever they came too close to a rock, a tree, or a sunken house. The bent-backed man had the rudder. Rain pattered against the smooth planks of the deck and splashed off the tall carved horseheads fore and aft. Arya was getting soaked again, but she didn’t care. She wanted to see. The man with the crossbow still stood in the window of the roundtower, she saw. His eyes followed her as the ferry slid by underneath. She wondered if he was this Lord Roote that the Hound had mentioned. He doesn’t look much like a lord. But then, she didn’t look much like a lady either.
Once they were beyond the town and out in the river proper, the current grew much stronger. Through the grey haze of rain Arya could make out a tall stone pillar on the far shore that surely marked the ferry landing, but no sooner had she seen it than she realized that they were being pushed away from it, downstream. The oarsmen were rowing more vigorously now, fighting the rage of the river. Leaves and broken branches swirled past as fast as if they’d been fired from a scorpion. The men with the poles leaned out and shoved away anything that came too close. It was windier out here, too. Whenever she turned to look upstream, Arya got a face full of blowing rain. Stranger was screaming and kicking as the deck moved underfoot.
If I jumped over the side, the river would wash me away before the Hound even knew that I was gone. She looked back over a shoulder, and saw Sandor Clegane struggling with his frightened horse, trying to calm him. She would never have a better chance to get away from him. I might drown, though. Jon used to say that she swam like a fish, but even a fish might have trouble in this river. Still, drowning might be better than King’s Landing. She thought about Joffrey and crept up to the prow. The river was murky brown with mud and lashed by rain, looking more like soup than water. Arya wondered how cold it would be. I couldn’t get much wetter than I am now. She put a hand on the rail.
But a sudden shout snapped her head about before she could leap. The ferrymen were rushing forward, poles in hand. For a moment she did not understand what was happening. Then she saw it: an uprooted tree, huge and dark, coming straight at them. A tangle of roots and limbs poked up out of the water as it came, like the reaching arms of a great kraken. The oarsmen were backing water frantically, trying to avoid a collision that could capsize them or stove their hull in. The old man had wrenched the rudder about, and the horse at the prow was swinging downstream, but too slowly. Glistening brown and black, the tree rushed toward them like a battering ram.
It could not have been more than ten feet from their prow when two of the boatmen somehow caught it with their long poles. One snapped, and the long splintering craaaack made it sound as if the ferry were breaking up beneath them. But the second man managed to give the trunk a hard shove, just enough to deflect it away from them. The tree swept past the ferry with inches to spare, its branches scrabbling like claws against the horsehead. Only just when it seemed as if they were clear, one of the monster’s upper limbs dealt them a glancing thump. The ferry seemed to shudder, and Arya slipped, landing painfully on one knee. The man with the broken pole was not so lucky. She heard him shout as he stumbled over the side. Then the raging brown water closed over him, and he was gone in the time it took Arya to climb back to her feet. One of the other boatmen snatched up a coil of rope, but there was no one to throw it to.
Maybe he’ll wash up someplace downstream, Arya tried to tell herself, but the thought had a hollow ring. She had lost all desire to go swimming. When Sandor Clegane shouted at her to get back inside before he beat her bloody, she went meekly. The ferry was fighting to turn back on course by then, against a river that wanted nothing more than to carry it down to the sea.
When they finally came ashore, it was a good two miles downriver of their usual landing. The boat slammed into the bank so hard that another pole snapped, and Arya almost lost her feet again. Sandor Clegane lifted her onto Stranger’s back as if she weighed no more than a doll. The boatmen stared at them with dull, exhausted eyes, all but the bent-backed man, who held his hand out. “Six dragons,” he demanded. “Three for the passage, and three for the man I lost.”
Sandor Clegane rummaged in his pouch and shoved a crumpled wad of parchment into the boatman’s palm. “There. Take ten.”
“Ten?” The ferryman was confused. “What’s this, now?”
“A dead man’s note, good for nine thousand dragons or nearabouts.” The Hound swung up into the saddle behind Arya, and smiled down unpleasantly. “Ten of it is yours. I’ll be back for the rest one day, so see you don’t go spending it.”
The man squinted down at the parchment. “Writing. What good’s writing? You promised gold. Knight’s honor, you said.”
“Knights have no bloody honor. Time you learned that, old man.” The Hound gave Stranger the spur and galloped off through the rain. The ferrymen threw curses at their backs, and one or two threw stones. Clegane ignored rocks and words alike, and before long they were lost in the gloom of the trees, the river a dwindling roar behind them. “The ferry won’t cross back till morning,” he said, “and that lot won’t be taking paper promises from the next fools to come along. If your friends are chasing us, they’re going to need to be bloody strong swimmers.”
Arya huddled down and held her tongue. Valar morghulis, she thought sullenly. Ser Ilyn, Ser Meryn, King Joffrey, Queen Cersei. Dunsen, Poliver, Raff the Sweetling, Ser Gregor and the Tickler. And the Hound, the Hound, the Hound.
By the time the rain stopped and the clouds broke, she was shivering and sneezing so badly that Clegane called a halt for the night, and even tried to make a fire. The wood they gathered proved too wet, though. Nothing he tried was enough to make the spark catch. Finally he kicked it all apart in disgust. “Seven bloody hells,” he swore. “I hate fires.”
They sat on damp rocks beneath an oak tree, listening to the slow patter of water dripping from the leaves as they ate a cold supper of hardbread, moldy cheese, and smoked sausage. The Hound sliced the meat with his dagger, and narrowed his eyes when he caught Arya looking at the knife. “Don’t even think about it.”
“I wasn’t,” she lied.
He snorted to show what he thought of that, but he gave her a thick slice of sausage. Arya worried it with her teeth, watching him all the while. “I never beat your sister,” the Hound said. “But I’ll beat you if you make me. Stop trying to think up ways to kill me. None of it will do you a bit of good.”
She had nothing to say to that. She gnawed on the sausage and stared at him coldly. Hard as stone, she thought.
“At least you look at my face. I’ll give you that, you little she-wolf. How do you like it?”
“I don’t. It’s all burned and ugly.”
Clegane offered her a chunk of cheese on the point of his dagger. “You’re a little fool. What good would it do you if you did get away? You’d just get caught by someone worse.”
“I would not,” she insisted. “There is no one worse.”
“You never knew my brother. Gregor once killed a man for snoring. His own man.” When he grinned, the burned side of his face pulled tight, twisting his mouth in a queer unpleasant way. He had no lips on that side, and only the stump of an ear.
“I did so know your brother.” Maybe the Mountain was worse, now that Arya thought about it. “Him and Dunsen and Polliver, and Raff the Sweetling and the Tickler.”
The Hound seemed surprised. “And how would Ned Stark’s precious little daughter come to know the likes of them? Gregor never brings his pet rats to court.”
“I know them from the village.” She ate the cheese, and reached for a hunk of hardbread. “The village by the lake where they caught Gendry, me, and Hot Pie. They caught Lommy Greenhands too, but Raff the Sweetling killed him because his leg was hurt.”
Clegane’s mouth twitched. “Caught you? My brother caught you?” That made him laugh, a sour sound, part rumble and part snarl. “Gregor never knew what he had, did he? He couldn’t have, or he would have dragged you back kicking and screaming to King’s Landing and dumped you in Cersei’s lap. Oh, that’s bloody sweet. I’ll be sure and tell him that, before I cut his heart out.”
It wasn’t the first time he had talked of killing the Mountain. “But he’s your brother,” Arya said dubiously.
“Didn’t you ever have a brother you wanted to kill?” He laughed again. “Or maybe a sister?” He must have seen something in her face then, for he leaned closer. “Sansa. That’s it, isn’t it? The wolf bitch wants to kill the pretty bird.”
“No,” Arya spat back at him. “I’d like to kill you.”
“Because I hacked your little friend in two? I’ve killed a lot more than him, I promise you. You think that makes me some monster. Well, maybe it does, but I saved your sister’s life too. The day the mob pulled her off her horse, I cut through them and brought her back to the castle, else she would have gotten what Lollys Stokeworth got. And she sang for me. You didn’t know that, did you? Your sister sang me a sweet little song.”
“You’re lying,” she said at once.
“You don’t know half as much as you think you do. The Blackwater? Where in seven hells do you think we are? Where do you think we’re going?”
The scorn in his voice made her hesitate. “Back to King’s Landing,” she said. “You’re bringing me to Joffrey and the queen.” That was wrong, she realized all of a sudden, just from the way he asked the questions. But she had to say something.
“Stupid blind little wolf bitch.” His voice was rough and hard as an iron rasp. “Bugger Joffrey, bugger the queen, and bugger that twisted little gargoyle she calls a brother. I’m done with their city, done with their Kingsguard, done with Lannisters. What’s a dog to do with lions, I ask you?” He reached for his waterskin, took a long pull. As he wiped his mouth, he offered the skin to Arya and said, “The river was the Trident, girl. The Trident, not the Blackwater. Make the map in your head, if you can. On the morrow we should reach the kingsroad. We’ll make good time after that, straight up to the Twins. It’s going to be me who hands you over to that mother of yours. Not the noble lightning lord or that flaming fraud of a priest, the monster.” He grinned at the look on her face. “You think your outlaw friends are the only ones can smell a ransom? Dondarrion took my gold, so I took you. You’re worth twice what they stole from me, I’d say. Maybe even more if I sold you back to the Lannisters like you fear, but I won’t. Even a dog gets tired of being kicked. If this Young Wolf has the wits the gods gave a toad, he’ll make me a lordling and beg me to enter his service. He needs me, though he may not know it yet. Maybe I’ll even kill Gregor for him, he’d like that.”
“He’ll never take you,” she spat back. “Not you.”
“Then I’ll take as much gold as I can carry, laugh in his face, and ride off. If he doesn’t take me, he’d be wise to kill me, but he won’t. Too much his father’s son, from what I hear. Fine with me. Either way I win. And so do you, she-wolf. So stop whimpering and snapping at me, I’m sick of it. Keep your mouth shut and do as I tell you, and maybe we’ll even be in time for your uncle’s bloody wedding.”

The outriders came on them an hour from the Green Fork, as the wayn was slogging down a muddy road.
“Keep your head down and your mouth shut,” the Hound warned her as the three spurred toward them; a knight and two squires, lightly armored and mounted on fast palfreys. Clegane cracked his whip at the team, a pair of old drays that had known better days. The wayn was creaking and swaying, its two huge wooden wheels squeezing mud up out of the deep ruts in the road with every turn. Stranger followed, tied to the wagon.
The big bad-tempered courser wore neither armor, barding, nor harness, and the Hound himself was garbed in splotchy green roughspun and a soot-grey mantle with a hood that swallowed his head. So long as he kept his eyes down you could not see his face, only the whites of his eyes peering out. He looked like some down-at-heels farmer. A big farmer, though. And under the roughspun was boiled leather and oiled mail, Arya knew. She looked like a farmer’s son, or maybe a swineherd. And behind them were four squat casks of salt pork and one of pickled pigs’ feet.
The riders split and circled them for a look before they came up close. Clegane drew the wayn to a halt and waited patiently on their pleasure. The knight bore spear and sword while his squires carried longbows. The badges on their jerkins were smaller versions of the sigil sewn on their master’s surcoat; a black pitchfork on a golden bar sinister, upon a russet field. Arya had thought of revealing herself to the first outriders they encountered, but she had always pictured grey-cloaked men with the direwolf on their breasts. She might have risked it even if they’d worn the Umber giant or the Glover fist, but she did not know this pitchfork knight or whom he served. The closest thing to a pitchfork she had ever seen at Winterfell was the trident in the hand of Lord Manderly’s merman.
“You have business at the Twins?” the knight asked.
“Salt pork for the wedding feast, if it please you, ser.” The Hound mumbled his reply, his eyes down, his face hidden.
“Salt pork never pleases me.” The pitchfork knight gave Clegane only the most cursory glance, and paid no attention at all to Arya, but he looked long and hard at Stranger. The stallion was no plow horse, that was plain at a glance. One of the squires almost wound up in the mud when the big black courser bit at his own mount. “How did you come by this beast?” the pitchfork knight demanded.
“M’lady told me to bring him, ser,” Clegane said humbly. “He’s a wedding gift for young Lord Tully.”
“What lady? Who is it you serve?”
“Old Lady Whent, ser.”
“Does she think she can buy Harrenhal back with a horse?” the knight asked. “Gods, is there any fool like an old fool?” Yet he waved them down the road. “Go on with you, then.”
“Aye, m’lord.” The Hound snapped his whip again, and the old drays resumed their weary trek. The wheels had settled deep into the mud during the halt, and it took several moments for the team to pull them free again. By then the outriders were riding off. Clegane gave them one last look and snorted. “Ser Donnel Haigh,” he said. “I’ve taken more horses off him than I can count. Armor as well. Once I near killed him in a mêlée.”
“How come he didn’t know you, then?” Arya asked.
“Because knights are fools, and it would have been beneath him to look twice at some poxy peasant.” He gave the horses a lick with the whip. “Keep your eyes down and your tone respectful and say ser a lot, and most knights will never see you. They pay more mind to horses than to smallfolk. He might have known Stranger if he’d ever seen me ride him.”
He would have known your face, though. Arya had no doubt of that. Sandor Clegane’s burns would not be easy to forget, once you saw them. He couldn’t hide the scars behind a helm, either; not so long as the helm was made in the shape of a snarling dog.
That was why they’d needed the wayn and the pickled pigs’ feet. “I’m not going to be dragged before your brother in chains,” the Hound had told her, “and I’d just as soon not have to cut through his men to get to him. So we play a little game.”
A farmer chance-met on the kingsroad had provided them with wayn, horses, garb, and casks, though not willingly. The Hound had taken them at swordpoint. When the farmer cursed him for a robber, he said, “No, a forager. Be grateful you get to keep your smallclothes. Now take those boots off. Or I’ll take your legs off. Your choice.” The farmer was as big as Clegane, but all the same he chose to give up his boots and keep his legs.
Evenfall found them still trudging toward the Green Fork and Lord Frey’s twin castles. I am almost there, Arya thought. She knew she ought to be excited, but her belly was all knotted up tight. Maybe that was just the fever she’d been fighting, but maybe not. Last night she’d had a bad dream, a terrible dream. She couldn’t remember what she’d dreamed of now, but the feeling had lingered all day. If anything, it had only gotten stronger. Fear cuts deeper than swords. She had to be strong now, the way her father told her. There was nothing between her and her mother but a castle gate, a river, and an army . . . but it was Robb’s army, so there was no real danger there. Was there?
Roose Bolton was one of them, though. The Leech Lord, as the outlaws called him. That made her uneasy. She had fled Harrenhal to get away from Bolton as much as from the Bloody Mummers, and she’d had to cut the throat of one of his guards to escape. Did he know she’d done that? Or did he blame Gendry or Hot Pie? Would he have told her mother? What would he do if he saw her? He probably won’t even know me. She looked more like a drowned rat than a lord’s cupbearer these days. A drowned boy rat. The Hound had hacked handfuls of her hair off only two days past. He was an even worse barber than Yoren, and he’d left her half bald on one side. Robb won’t know me either, I bet. Or even Mother. She had been a little girl the last time she saw them, the day Lord Eddard Stark left Winterfell.
They heard the music before they saw the castle; the distant rattle of drums, the brazen blare of horns, the thin skirling of pipes faint beneath the growl of the river and the sound of the rain beating on their heads. “We’ve missed the wedding,” the Hound said, “but it sounds as though the feast is still going. I’ll be rid of you soon.”
No, I’ll be rid of you, Arya thought.
The road had been running mostly northwest, but now it turned due west between an apple orchard and a field of drowned corn beaten down by the rain. They passed the last of the apple trees and crested a rise, and the castles, river, and camps all appeared at once. There were hundreds of horses and thousands of men, most of them milling about the three huge feast tents that stood side by side facing the castle gates, like three great canvas longhalls. Robb had made his camp well back from the walls, on higher, drier ground, but the Green Fork had overflown its bank and even claimed a few carelessly placed tents.
The music from the castles was louder here. The sound of the drums and horns rolled across the camp. The musicians in the nearer castle were playing a different song than the ones in the castle on the far bank, though, so it sounded more like a battle than a song. “They’re not very good,” Arya observed.
The Hound made a sound that might have been a laugh. “There’s old deaf women in Lannisport complaining of the din, I’ll warrant. I’d heard Walder Frey’s eyes were failing, but no one mentioned his bloody ears.”
Arya found herself wishing it were day. If the sun was out and the wind was blowing, she would have been able to see the banners better. She would have looked for the direwolf of Stark, or maybe the Cerwyn battleaxe or the Glover fist. But in the gloom of night all the colors looked grey. The rain had dwindled down to a fine drizzle, almost a mist, but an earlier downpour had left the banners wet as dishrags, sodden and unreadable.
A hedge of wagons and carts had been drawn up along the perimeter to make a crude wooden wall against any attack. That was where the guards stopped them. The lantern their sergeant carried shed enough light for Arya to see that his cloak was a pale pink, spotted with red teardrops. The men under him had the Leech Lord’s badge sewn over their hearts, the flayed man of the Dreadfort. Sandor Clegane gave them the same tale he’d used on the outriders, but the Bolton sergeant was a harder sort of nut than Ser Donnel Haigh had been. “Salt pork’s no fit meat for a lord’s wedding feast,” he said scornfully.
“Got pickled pigs’ feet too, ser.”
“Not for the feast, you don’t. The feast’s half done. And I’m a northman, not some milksuck southron knight.”
“I was told to see the steward, or the cook . . .”
“Castle’s closed. The lordlings are not to be disturbed.” The sergeant considered a moment. “You can unload by the feast tents, there.” He pointed with a mailed hand. “Ale makes a man hungry, and old Frey won’t miss a few pigs’ feet. He don’t have the teeth for such anyhow. Ask for Sedgekins, he’ll know what’s to be done with you.” He barked a command, and his men rolled one of the wagons aside for them to enter.
The Hound’s whip spurred the team toward the tents. No one seemed to pay them any mind. They splashed past rows of brightly colored pavilions, their walls of wet silk lit up like magic lanterns by lamps and braziers inside; pink and gold and green they glimmered, striped and fretty and chequy, emblazoned with birds and beasts, chevrons and stars, wheels and weapons. Arya spotted a yellow tent with six acorns on its panels, three over two over one. Lord Smallwood, she knew, remembering Acorn Hall so far away, and the lady who’d said she was pretty.
But for every shimmering silk pavilion there were two dozen of felt or canvas, opaque and dark. There were barracks tents too, big enough to shelter two score footsoldiers, though even those were dwarfed by the three great feast tents. The drinking had been going on for hours, it seemed. Arya heard shouted toasts and the clash of cups, mixed in with all the usual camp sounds, horses whinnying and dogs barking, wagons rumbling through the dark, laughter and curses, the clank and clatter of steel and wood. The music grew still louder as they approached the castle, but under that was a deeper, darker sound: the river, the swollen Green Fork, growling like a lion in its den.
Arya twisted and turned, trying to look everywhere at once, hoping for a glimpse of a direwolf badge, for a tent done up in grey and white, for a face she knew from Winterfell. All she saw were strangers. She stared at a man relieving himself in the reeds, but he wasn’t Alebelly. She saw a half-dressed girl burst from a tent laughing, but the tent was pale blue, not grey like she’d thought at first, and the man who went running after her wore a treecat on his doublet, not a wolf. Beneath a tree, four archers were slipping waxed strings over the notches of their longbows, but they were not her father’s archers. A maester crossed their path, but he was too young and thin to be Maester Luwin. Arya gazed up at the Twins, their high tower windows glowing softly wherever a light was burning. Through the haze of rain, the castles looked spooky and mysterious, like something from one of Old Nan’s tales, but they weren’t Winterfell.
The press was thickest at the feast tents. The wide flaps were tied back, and men were pushing in and out with drinking horns and tankards in their hands, some with camp followers. Arya glanced inside as the Hound drove past the first of the three, and saw hundreds of men crowding the benches and jostling around the casks of mead and ale and wine. There was hardly room to move inside, but none of them seemed to mind. At least they were warm and dry. Cold wet Arya envied them. Some were even singing. The fine misty rain was steaming all around the door from the heat escaping from inside. “Here’s to Lord Edmure and Lady Roslin,” she heard a voice shout. They all drank, and someone yelled, “Here’s to the Young Wolf and Queen Jeyne.”
Who is Queen Jeyne? Arya wondered briefly. The only queen she knew was Cersei.
Firepits had been dug outside the feast tents, sheltered beneath rude canopies of woven wood and hides that kept the rain out, so long as it fell straight down. The wind was blowing off the river, though, so the drizzle came in anyway, enough to make the fires hiss and swirl. Serving men were turning joints of meat on spits above the flames. The smells made Arya’s mouth water. “Shouldn’t we stop?” she asked Sandor Clegane. “There’s northmen in the tents.” She knew them by their beards, by their faces, by their cloaks of bearskin and sealskin, by their half-heard toasts and the songs they sang; Karstarks and Umbers and men of the mountain clans. “I bet there are Winterfell men too.” Her father’s men, the Young Wolf’s men, the direwolves of Stark.
“Your brother will be in the castle,” he said. “Your mother too. You want them or not?”
“Yes,” she said. “What about Sedgekins?” The sergeant had told them to ask for Sedgekins.
“Sedgekins can bugger himself with a hot poker.” Clegane shook out his whip, and sent it hissing through the soft rain to bite at a horse’s flank. “It’s your bloody brother I want.”

The feast tents were behind them now. They squished over wet clay and torn grass, out of the light and back into the gloom. Ahead loomed the castle gatehouse. She could see torches moving on the walls, their flames dancing and blowing in the wind. The light shone dully against the wet mail and helms. More torches were moving on the dark stone bridge that joined the Twins, a column of them streaming from the west bank to the east.
“The castle’s not closed,” Arya said suddenly. The sergeant had said it would be, but he was wrong. The portcullis was being drawn upward even as she watched, and the drawbridge had already been lowered to span the swollen moat. She had been afraid that Lord Frey’s guardsmen would refuse to let them in. For half a heartbeat she chewed her lip, too anxious to smile.
The Hound reined up so suddenly that she almost fell off the wayn. “Seven bloody buggering hells,” Arya heard him curse, as their left wheel began to sink in soft mud. The wayn tilted slowly. “Get down,” Clegane roared at her, slamming the heel of his hand into her shoulder to knock her sideways. She landed light, the way Syrio had taught her, and bounced up at once with a face full of mud. “Why did you do that?” she screamed. The Hound had leapt down as well. He tore the seat off the front of the wayn and reached in for the swordbelt he’d hidden beneath it.
It was only then that she heard the riders pouring out the castle gate in a river of steel and fire, the thunder of their destriers crossing the drawbridge almost lost beneath the drumming from the castles. Men and mounts wore plate armor, and one in every ten carried a torch. The rest had axes, longaxes with spiked heads and heavy bone-crushing armor-smashing blades.
Somewhere far off she heard a wolf howling. It wasn’t very loud compared to the camp noise and the music and the low ominous growl of the river running wild, but she heard it all the same. Only maybe it wasn’t her ears that heard it. The sound shivered through Arya like a knife, sharp with rage and grief. More and more riders were emerging from the castle, a column four wide with no end to it, knights and squires and freeriders, torches and longaxes. And there was noise coming from behind as well.
When Arya looked around, she saw that there were only two of the huge feast tents where once there had been three. The one in the middle had collapsed. For a moment she did not understand what she was seeing. Then the flames went licking up from the fallen tent, and now the other two were collapsing, heavy oiled cloth settling down on the men beneath. A flight of fire arrows streaked through the air. The second tent took fire, and then the third. The screams grew so loud she could hear words through the music. Dark shapes moved in front of the flames, the steel of their armor shining orange from afar.
A battle, Arya knew. It’s a battle. And the riders . . . 
She had no more time to watch the tents then. With the river overflowing its banks, the dark swirling waters at the end of the drawbridge reached as high as a horse’s belly, but the riders splashed through them all the same, spurred on by the music. For once the same song was coming from both castles. I know this song, Arya realized suddenly. Tom o’ Sevens had sung it for them, that rainy night the outlaws had sheltered in the brewhouse with the brothers. And who are you, the proud lord said, that I must bow so low?
The Frey riders were struggling through the mud and reeds, but some of them had seen the wayn. She watched as three riders left the main column, pounding through the shallows. Only a cat of a different coat, that’s all the truth I know.
Clegane cut Stranger loose with a single slash of his sword and leapt onto his back. The courser knew what was wanted of him. He pricked up his ears and wheeled toward the charging destriers. In a coat of gold or a coat of red, a lion still has claws. And mine are long and sharp, my lord, as long and sharp as yours. Arya had prayed a hundred hundred times for the Hound to die, but now . . . there was a rock in her hand, slimy with mud, and she didn’t even remember picking it up. Who do I throw it at?
She jumped at the clash of metal as Clegane turned aside the first longaxe. While he was engaged with the first man, the second circled behind him and aimed a blow for the small of his back. Stranger was wheeling, so the Hound took only a glancing blow, enough to rip a great gash in his baggy peasant’s blouse and expose the mail below. He is one against three. Arya still clutched her rock. They’re sure to kill him. She thought of Mycah, the butcher’s boy who had been her friend so briefly.
Then she saw the third rider coming her way. Arya moved behind the wayn. Fear cuts deeper than swords. She could hear drums and warhorns and pipes, stallions trumpeting, the shriek of steel on steel, but all the sounds seemed so far away. There was only the oncoming horseman and the longaxe in his hand. He wore a surcoat over his armor and she saw the two towers that marked him for a Frey. She did not understand. Her uncle was marrying Lord Frey’s daughter, the Freys were her brother’s friends. “Don’t!” she screamed as he rode around the wayn, but he paid no mind.
When he charged Arya threw the rock, the way she’d once thrown a crabapple at Gendry. She’d gotten Gendry right between the eyes, but this time her aim was off, and the stone caromed sideways off his temple. It was enough to break his charge, but no more. She retreated, darting across the muddy ground on the balls of her feet, putting the wayn between them once more. The knight followed at a trot, only darkness behind his eyeslit. She hadn’t even dented his helm. They went round once, twice, a third time. The knight cursed her. “You can’t run for—”
The axehead caught him square in the back of the head, crashing through his helm and the skull beneath and sending him flying face first from his saddle. Behind him was the Hound, still mounted on Stranger. How did you get an axe? she almost asked, before she saw. One of the other Freys was trapped beneath his dying horse, drowning in a foot of water. The third man was sprawled on his back, unmoving. He hadn’t worn a gorget, and a foot of broken sword jutted from beneath his chin.
“Get my helm,” Clegane growled at her.
It was stuffed at the bottom of a sack of dried apples, in the back of the wayn behind the pickled pigs’ feet. Arya upended the sack and tossed it to him. He snatched it one-handed from the air and lowered it over his head, and where the man had sat only a steel dog remained, snarling at the fires.
“My brother . . .”
“Dead,” he shouted back at her. “Do you think they’d slaughter his men and leave him alive?” He turned his head back toward the camp. “Look. Look, damn you.”
The camp had become a battlefield. No, a butcher’s den. The flames from the feasting tents reached halfway up the sky. Some of the barracks tents were burning too, and half a hundred silk pavilions. Everywhere swords were singing. And now the rains weep o’er his hall, with not a soul to hear. She saw two knights ride down a running man. A wooden barrel came crashing onto one of the burning tents and burst apart, and the flames leapt twice as high. A catapult, she knew. The castle was flinging oil or pitch or something.
“Come with me.” Sandor Clegane reached down a hand. “We have to get away from here, and now.” Stranger tossed his head impatiently, his nostrils flaring at the scent of blood. The song was done. There was only one solitary drum, its slow monotonous beats echoing across the river like the pounding of some monstrous heart. The black sky wept, the river grumbled, men cursed and died. Arya had mud in her teeth and her face was wet. Rain. It’s only rain. That’s all it is. “We’re here,” she shouted. Her voice sounded thin and scared, a little girl’s voice. “Robb’s just in the castle, and my mother. The gate’s even open.” There were no more Freys riding out. I came so far. “We have to go get my mother.”
“Stupid little bitch.” Fires glinted off the snout of his helm, and made the steel teeth shine. “You go in there, you won’t come out. Maybe Frey will let you kiss your mother’s corpse.”
“Maybe we can save her . . .”
“Maybe you can. I’m not done living yet.” He rode toward her, crowding her back toward the wayn. “Stay or go, she-wolf. Live or die. Your—”
Arya spun away from him and darted for the gate. The portcullis was coming down, but slowly. I have to run faster. The mud slowed her, though, and then the water. Run fast as a wolf. The drawbridge had begun to lift, the water running off it in a sheet, the mud falling in heavy clots. Faster. She heard loud splashing and looked back to see Stranger pounding after her, sending up gouts of water with every stride. She saw the longaxe too, still wet with blood and brains. And Arya ran. Not for her brother now, not even for her mother, but for herself. She ran faster than she had ever run before, her head down and her feet churning up the river, she ran from him as Mycah must have run.
His axe took her in the back of the head.

She could feel the hole inside her every morning when she woke. It wasn’t hunger, though sometimes there was that too. It was a hollow place, an emptiness where her heart had been, where her brothers had lived, and her parents. Her head hurt too. Not as bad as it had at first, but still pretty bad. Arya was used to that, though, and at least the lump was going down. But the hole inside her stayed the same. The hole will never feel any better, she told herself when she went to sleep.
Some mornings Arya did not want to wake at all. She would huddle beneath her cloak with her eyes squeezed shut and try to will herself back to sleep. If the Hound would only have left her alone, she would have slept all day and all night.
And dreamed. That was the best part, the dreaming. She dreamed of wolves most every night. A great pack of wolves, with her at the head. She was bigger than any of them, stronger, swifter, faster. She could outrun horses and outfight lions. When she bared her teeth even men would run from her, her belly was never empty long, and her fur kept her warm even when the wind was blowing cold. And her brothers and sisters were with her, many and more of them, fierce and terrible and hers. They would never leave her.
But if her nights were full of wolves, her days belonged to the dog. Sandor Clegane made her get up every morning, whether she wanted to or not. He would curse at her in his raspy voice, or yank her to her feet and shake her. Once he dumped a helm full of cold water all over her head. She bounced up sputtering and shivering and tried to kick him, but he only laughed. “Dry off and feed the bloody horses,” he told her, and she did.
They had two now, Stranger and a sorrel palfrey mare Arya had named Craven, because Sandor said she’d likely run off from the Twins the same as them. They’d found her wandering riderless through a field the morning after the slaughter. She was a good enough horse, but Arya could not love a coward. Stranger would have fought. Still, she tended the mare as best she knew. It was better than riding double with the Hound. And Craven might have been a coward, but she was young and strong as well. Arya thought that she might be able to outrun Stranger, if it came to it.
The Hound no longer watched her as closely as he had. Sometimes he did not seem to care whether she stayed or went, and he no longer bound her up in a cloak at night. One night I’ll kill him in his sleep, she told herself, but she never did. One day I’ll ride away on Craven, and he won’t be able to catch me, she thought, but she never did that either. Where would she go? Winterfell was gone. Her grandfather’s brother was at Riverrun, but he didn’t know her, no more than she knew him. Maybe Lady Smallwood would take her in at Acorn Hall, but maybe she wouldn’t. Besides, Arya wasn’t even sure she could find Acorn Hall again. Sometimes she thought she might go back to Sharna’s inn, if the floods hadn’t washed it away. She could stay with Hot Pie, or maybe Lord Beric would find her there. Anguy would teach her to use a bow, and she could ride with Gendry and be an outlaw, like Wenda the White Fawn in the songs.
But that was just stupid, like something Sansa might dream. Hot Pie and Gendry had left her just as soon as they could, and Lord Beric and the outlaws only wanted to ransom her, just like the Hound. None of them wanted her around. They were never my pack, not even Hot Pie and Gendry. I was stupid to think so, just a stupid little girl, and no wolf at all.
So she stayed with the Hound. They rode every day, never sleeping twice in the same place, avoiding towns and villages and castles as best they could. Once she asked Sandor Clegane where they were going. “Away,” he said. “That’s all you need to know. You’re not worth spit to me now, and I don’t want to hear your whining. I should have let you run into that bloody castle.”
“You should have,” she agreed, thinking of her mother.
“You’d be dead if I had. You ought to thank me. You ought to sing me a pretty little song, the way your sister did.”
“Did you hit her with an axe too?”
“I hit you with the flat of the axe, you stupid little bitch. If I’d hit you with the blade there’d still be chunks of your head floating down the Green Fork. Now shut your bloody mouth. If I had any sense I’d give you to the silent sisters. They cut the tongues out of girls who talk too much.”
That wasn’t fair of him to say. Aside from that one time, Arya hardly talked at all. Whole days passed when neither of them said anything. She was too empty to talk, and the Hound was too angry. She could feel the fury in him; she could see it on his face, the way his mouth would tighten and twist, the looks he gave her. Whenever he took his axe to chop some wood for a fire, he would slide into a cold rage, hacking savagely at the tree or the deadfall or the broken limb, until they had twenty times as much kindling and firewood as they’d needed. Sometimes he would be so sore and tired afterward that he would lie down and go right to sleep without even lighting a fire. Arya hated it when that happened, and hated him too. Those were the nights when she stared the longest at the axe. It looks awfully heavy, but I bet I could swing it. She wouldn’t hit him with the flat, either.
Sometimes in their wanderings they glimpsed other people; farmers in their fields, swineherds with their pigs, a milkmaid leading a cow, a squire carrying a message down a rutted road. She never wanted to speak to them either. It was as if they lived in some distant land and spoke a queer alien tongue; they had nothing to do with her, or her with them.
Besides, it wasn’t safe to be seen. From time to time columns of horsemen passed down the winding farm roads, the twin towers of Frey flying before them. “Hunting for stray northmen,” the Hound said when they had passed. “Any time you hear hooves, get your head down fast, it’s not like to be a friend.”
One day, in an earthen hollow made by the roots of a fallen oak, they came face to face with another survivor of the Twins. The badge on his breast showed a pink maiden dancing in a swirl of silk, and he told them he was Ser Marq Piper’s man; a bowman, though he’d lost his bow. His left shoulder was all twisted and swollen where it met his arm; a blow from a mace, he said, it had broken his shoulder and smashed his chainmail deep into his flesh. “A northman, it was,” he wept. “His badge was a bloody man, and he saw mine and made a jape, red man and pink maiden, maybe they should get together. I drank to his Lord Bolton, he drank to Ser Marq, and we drank together to Lord Edmure and Lady Roslin and the King in the North. And then he killed me.” His eyes were fever bright when he said that, and Arya could tell that it was true. His shoulder was swollen grotesquely, and pus and blood had stained his whole left side. There was a stink to him too. He smells like a corpse. The man begged them for a drink of wine.
“If I’d had any wine, I’d have drunk it myself,” the Hound told him. “I can give you water, and the gift of mercy.”
The archer looked at him a long while before he said, “You’re Joffrey’s dog.”
“My own dog now. Do you want the water?”
“Aye.” The man swallowed. “And the mercy. Please.”
They had passed a small pond a short ways back. Sandor gave Arya his helm and told her to fill it, so she trudged back to the water’s edge. Mud squished over the toe of her boots. She used the dog’s head as a pail. Water ran out through the eyeholes, but the bottom of the helm still held a lot.
When she came back, the archer turned his face up and she poured the water into his mouth. He gulped it down as fast as she could pour, and what he couldn’t gulp ran down his cheeks into the brown blood that crusted his whiskers, until pale pink tears dangled from his beard. When the water was gone he clutched the helm and licked the steel. “Good,” he said. “I wish it was wine, though. I wanted wine.”
“Me too.” The Hound eased his dagger into the man’s chest almost tenderly, the weight of his body driving the point through his surcoat, ringmail, and the quilting beneath. As he slid the blade back out and wiped it on the dead man, he looked at Arya. “That’s where the heart is, girl. That’s how you kill a man.”
That’s one way. “Will we bury him?”
“Why?” Sandor said. “He don’t care, and we’ve got no spade. Leave him for the wolves and wild dogs. Your brothers and mine.” He gave her a hard look. “First we rob him, though.”
There were two silver stags in the archer’s purse, and almost thirty coppers. His dagger had a pretty pink stone in the hilt. The Hound hefted the knife in his hand, then flipped it toward Arya. She caught it by the hilt, slid it through her belt, and felt a little better. It wasn’t Needle, but it was steel. The dead man had a quiver of arrows too, but arrows weren’t much good without a bow. His boots were too big for Arya and too small for the Hound, so those they left. She took his kettle helm as well, even though it came down almost past her nose, so she had to tilt it back to see. “He must have had a horse as well, or he wouldn’t have got away,” Clegane said, peering about, “but it’s bloody well gone, I’d say. No telling how long he’s been here.”
By the time they found themselves in the foothills of the Mountains of the Moon, the rains had mostly stopped. Arya could see the sun and moon and stars, and it seemed to her that they were heading eastward. “Where are we going?” she asked again.
This time the Hound answered her. “You have an aunt in the Eyrie. Might be she’ll want to ransom your scrawny arse, though the gods know why. Once we find the high road, we can follow it all the way to the Bloody Gate.”
Aunt Lysa. The thought left Arya feeling empty. It was her mother she wanted, not her mother’s sister. She didn’t know her mother’s sister any more than she knew her great uncle Blackfish. We should have gone into the castle. They didn’t really know that her mother was dead, or Robb either. It wasn’t like they’d seen them die or anything. Maybe Lord Frey had just taken them captive. Maybe they were chained up in his dungeon, or maybe the Freys were taking them to King’s Landing so Joffrey could chop their heads off. They didn’t know. “We should go back,” she suddenly decided. “We should go back to the Twins and get my mother. She can’t be dead. We have to help her.”
“I thought your sister was the one with a head full of songs,” the Hound growled. “Frey might have kept your mother alive to ransom, that’s true. But there’s no way in seven hells I’m going to pluck her out of his castle all by my bloody self.”
“Not by yourself. I’d come too.”
He made a sound that was almost a laugh. “That will scare the piss out of the old man.”
“You’re just afraid to die!” she said scornfully.
Now Clegane did laugh. “Death don’t scare me. Only fire. Now be quiet, or I’ll cut your tongue out myself and save the silent sisters the bother. It’s the Vale for us.”
Arya didn’t think he’d really cut her tongue out; he was just saying that the way Pinkeye used to say he’d beat her bloody. All the same, she wasn’t going to try him. Sandor Clegane was no Pinkeye. Pinkeye didn’t cut people in half or hit them with axes. Not even with the flat of axes.
That night she went to sleep thinking of her mother, and wondering if she should kill the Hound in his sleep and rescue Lady Catelyn herself. When she closed her eyes she saw her mother’s face against the back of her eyelids. She’s so close I could almost smell her . . . 
 . . . and then she could smell her. The scent was faint beneath the other smells, beneath moss and mud and water, and the stench of rotting reeds and rotting men. She padded slowly through the soft ground to the river’s edge, lapped up a drink, then lifted her head to sniff. The sky was grey and thick with cloud, the river green and full of floating things. Dead men clogged the shallows, some still moving as the water pushed them, others washed up on the banks. Her brothers and sisters swarmed around them, tearing at the rich ripe flesh.
The crows were there too, screaming at the wolves and filling the air with feathers. Their blood was hotter, and one of her sisters had snapped at one as it took flight and caught it by the wing. It made her want a crow herself. She wanted to taste the blood, to hear the bones crunch between her teeth, to fill her belly with warm flesh instead of cold. She was hungry and the meat was all around, but she knew she could not eat.
The scent was stronger now. She pricked her ears up and listened to the grumbles of her pack, the shriek of angry crows, the whirr of wings and sound of running water. Somewhere far off she could hear horses and the calls of living men, but they were not what mattered. Only the scent mattered. She sniffed the air again. There it was, and now she saw it too, something pale and white drifting down the river, turning where it brushed against a snag. The reeds bowed down before it.
She splashed noisily through the shallows and threw herself into the deeper water, her legs churning. The current was strong but she was stronger. She swam, following her nose. The river smells were rich and wet, but those were not the smells that pulled her. She paddled after the sharp red whisper of cold blood, the sweet cloying stench of death. She chased them as she had often chased a red deer through the trees, and in the end she ran them down, and her jaw closed around a pale white arm. She shook it to make it move, but there was only death and blood in her mouth. By now she was tiring, and it was all she could do to pull the body back to shore. As she dragged it up the muddy bank, one of her little brothers came prowling, his tongue lolling from his mouth. She had to snarl to drive him off, or else he would have fed. Only then did she stop to shake the water from her fur. The white thing lay facedown in the mud, her dead flesh wrinkled and pale, cold blood trickling from her throat. Rise, she thought. Rise and eat and run with us.
The sound of horses turned her head. Men. They were coming from downwind, so she had not smelled them, but now they were almost here. Men on horses, with flapping black and yellow and pink wings and long shiny claws in hand. Some of her younger brothers bared their teeth to defend the food they’d found, but she snapped at them until they scattered. That was the way of the wild. Deer and hares and crows fled before wolves, and wolves fled from men. She abandoned the cold white prize in the mud where she had dragged it, and ran, and felt no shame.
When morning came, the Hound did not need to shout at Arya or shake her awake. She had woken before him for a change, and even watered the horses. They broke their fast in silence, until Sandor said, “This thing about your mother . . .”
“It doesn’t matter,” Arya said in a dull voice. “I know she’s dead. I saw her in a dream.”
The Hound looked at her a long time, then nodded. No more was said of it. They rode on toward the mountains.
In the higher hills, they came upon a tiny isolated village surrounded by grey-green sentinels and tall blue soldier pines, and Clegane decided to risk going in. “We need food,” he said, “and a roof over our heads. They’re not like to know what happened at the Twins, and with any luck they won’t know me.”
The villagers were building a wooden palisade around their homes, and when they saw the breadth of the Hound’s shoulders they offered them food and shelter and even coin for work. “If there’s wine as well, I’ll do it,” he growled at them. In the end, he settled for ale, and drank himself to sleep each night.
His dream of selling Arya to Lady Arryn died there in the hills, though. “There’s frost above us and snow in the high passes,” the village elder said. “If you don’t freeze or starve, the shadowcats will get you, or the cave bears. There’s the clans as well. The Burned Men are fearless since Timett One-Eye came back from the war. And half a year ago, Gunthor son of Gurn led the Stone Crows down on a village not eight miles from here. They took every woman and every scrap of grain, and killed half the men. They have steel now, good swords and mail hauberks, and they watch the high road—the Stone Crows, the Milk Snakes, the Sons of the Mist, all of them. Might be you’d take a few with you, but in the end they’d kill you and make off with your daughter.”
I’m not his daughter, Arya might have shouted, if she hadn’t felt so tired. She was no one’s daughter now. She was no one. Not Arya, not Weasel, not Nan nor Arry nor Squab, not even Lumpyhead. She was only some girl who ran with a dog by day, and dreamed of wolves by night.
It was quiet in the village. They had beds stuffed with straw and not too many lice, the food was plain but filling, and the air smelled of pines. All the same, Arya soon decided that she hated it. The villagers were cowards. None of them would even look at the Hound’s face, at least not for long. Some of the women tried to put her in a dress and make her do needlework, but they weren’t Lady Smallwood and she was having none of it. And there was one girl who took to following her, the village elder’s daughter. She was of an age with Arya, but just a child; she cried if she skinned a knee, and carried a stupid cloth doll with her everywhere she went. The doll was made up to look like a man-at-arms, sort of, so the girl called him Ser Soldier and bragged how he kept her safe. “Go away,” Arya told her half a hundred times. “Just leave me be.” She wouldn’t, though, so finally Arya took the doll away from her, ripped it open, and pulled the rag stuffing out of its belly with a finger. “Now he really looks like a soldier!” she said, before she threw the doll in a brook. After that the girl stopped pestering her, and Arya spent her days grooming Craven and Stranger or walking in the woods. Sometimes she would find a stick and practice her needlework, but then she would remember what had happened at the Twins and smash it against a tree until it broke.
“Might be we should stay here awhile,” the Hound told her, after a fortnight. He was drunk on ale, but more brooding than sleepy. “We’d never reach the Eyrie, and the Freys will still be hunting survivors in the riverlands. Sounds like they need swords here, with these clansmen raiding. We can rest up, maybe find a way to get a letter to your aunt.” Arya’s face darkened when she heard that. She didn’t want to stay, but there was nowhere to go, either. The next morning, when the Hound went off to chop down trees and haul logs, she crawled back into bed.
But when the work was done and the tall wooden palisade was finished, the village elder made it plain that there was no place for them. “Come winter, we will be hard pressed to feed our own,” he explained. “And you . . . a man like you brings blood with him.”
Sandor’s mouth tightened. “So you do know who I am.”
“Aye. We don’t get travelers here, that’s so, but we go to market, and to fairs. We know about King Joffrey’s dog.”
“When these Stone Crows come calling, you might be glad to have a dog.”
“Might be.” The man hesitated, then gathered up his courage. “But they say you lost your belly for fighting at the Blackwater. They say—”
“I know what they say.” Sandor’s voice sounded like two woodsaws grinding together. “Pay me, and we’ll be gone.”
When they left, the Hound had a pouch full of coppers, a skin of sour ale, and a new sword. It was a very old sword, if truth be told, though new to him. He swapped its owner the longaxe he’d taken at the Twins, the one he’d used to raise the lump on Arya’s head. The ale was gone in less than a day, but Clegane sharpened the sword every night, cursing the man he’d swapped with for every nick and spot of rust. If he lost his belly for fighting, why does he care if his sword is sharp? It was not a question Arya dared ask him, but she thought on it a lot. Was that why he’d run from the Twins and carried her off?
Back in the riverlands, they found that the rains had ebbed away, and the flood waters had begun to recede. The Hound turned south, back toward the Trident. “We’ll make for Riverrun,” he told Arya as they roasted a hare he’d killed. “Maybe the Blackfish wants to buy himself a she-wolf.”
“He doesn’t know me. He won’t even know I’m really me.” Arya was tired of making for Riverrun. She had been making for Riverrun for years, it seemed, without ever getting there. Every time she made for Riverrun, she ended up someplace worse. “He won’t give you any ransom. He’ll probably just hang you.”
“He’s free to try.” He turned the spit.
He doesn’t talk like he’s lost his belly for fighting. “I know where we could go,” Arya said. She still had one brother left. Jon will want me, even if no one else does. He’ll call me “little sister” and muss my hair. It was a long way, though, and she didn’t think she could get there by herself. She hadn’t even been able to reach Riverrun. “We could go to the Wall.”
Sandor’s laugh was half a growl. “The little wolf bitch wants to join the Night’s Watch, does she?”
“My brother’s on the Wall,” she said stubbornly.
His mouth gave a twitch. “The Wall’s a thousand leagues from here. We’d need to fight through the bloody Freys just to reach the Neck. There’s lizard lions in those swamps that eat wolves every day for breakfast. And if we did reach the north with our skins intact, there’s ironborn in half the castles, and thousands of bloody buggering northmen as well.”
“Are you scared of them?” she asked. “Have you lost your belly for fighting?”
For a moment she thought he was going to hit her. By then the hare was brown, though, skin crackling and grease popping as it dripped down into the cookfire. Sandor took it off the stick, ripped it apart with his big hands, and tossed half of it into Arya’s lap. “There’s nothing wrong with my belly,” he said as he pulled off a leg, “but I don’t give a rat’s arse for you or your brother. I have a brother too.”

Outside the inn on a weathered gibbet, a woman’s bones were twisting and rattling at every gust of wind.
I know this inn. There hadn’t been a gibbet outside the door when she had slept here with her sister Sansa under the watchful eye of Septa Mordane, though. “We don’t want to go in,” Arya decided suddenly, “there might be ghosts.”
“You know how long it’s been since I had a cup of wine?” Sandor swung down from the saddle. “Besides, we need to learn who holds the ruby ford. Stay with the horses if you want, it’s no hair off my arse.”
“What if they know you?” Sandor no longer troubled to hide his face. He no longer seemed to care who knew him. “They might want to take you captive.”
“Let them try.” He loosened his longsword in its scabbard, and pushed through the door.
Arya would never have a better chance to escape. She could ride off on Craven and take Stranger too. She chewed her lip. Then she led the horses to the stables, and went in after him.
They know him. The silence told her that. But that wasn’t the worst thing. She knew them too. Not the skinny innkeep, nor the women, nor the fieldhands by the hearth. But the others. The soldiers. She knew the soldiers.
“Looking for your brother, Sandor?” Polliver’s hand was down the bodice of the girl on his lap, but now he slid it out.
“Looking for a cup of wine. Innkeep, a flagon of red.” Clegane threw a handful of coppers on the floor.
“I don’t want no trouble, ser,” the innkeep said.
“Then don’t call me ser.” His mouth twitched. “Are you deaf, fool? I ordered wine.” As the man ran off, Clegane shouted after him, “Two cups! The girl’s thirsty too!”
There are only three, Arya thought. Polliver gave her a fleeting glance and the boy beside him never looked at her at all, but the third one gazed long and hard. He was a man of middling height and build, with a face so ordinary that it was hard to say how old he was. The Tickler. The Tickler and Polliver both. The boy was a squire, judging by his age and dress. He had a big white pimple on one side of his nose, and some red ones on his forehead. “Is this the lost puppy Ser Gregor spoke of?” he asked the Tickler. “The one who piddled in the rushes and ran off?”
The Tickler put a warning hand on the boy’s arm, and gave a short sharp shake of his head. Arya read that plain enough.
The squire didn’t, or else he didn’t care. “Ser said his puppy brother tucked his tail between his legs when the battle got too warm at King’s Landing. He said he ran off whimpering.” He gave the Hound a stupid mocking grin.
Clegane studied the boy and never said a word. Polliver shoved the girl off his lap and got to his feet. “The lad’s drunk,” he said. The man-at-arms was almost as tall as the Hound, though not so heavily muscled. A spade-shaped beard covered his jaws and jowls, thick and black and neatly trimmed, but his head was more bald than not. “He can’t hold his wine, is all.”
“Then he shouldn’t drink.”
“The puppy doesn’t scare . . .” the boy began, till the Tickler casually twisted his ear between thumb and forefinger. The words became a squeal of pain.
The innkeep came scurrying back with two stone cups and a flagon on a pewter platter. Sandor lifted the flagon to his mouth. Arya could see the muscles in his neck working as he gulped. When he slammed it back down on the table, half the wine was gone. “Now you can pour. Best pick up those coppers too, it’s the only coin you’re like to see today.”
“We’ll pay when we’re done drinking,” said Polliver.
“When you’re done drinking you’ll tickle the innkeep to see where he keeps his gold. The way you always do.”
The innkeep suddenly remembered something in the kitchen. The locals were leaving too, and the girls were gone. The only sound in the common room was the faint crackling of the fire in the hearth. We should go too, Arya knew.
“If you’re looking for Ser, you come too late,” Polliver said. “He was at Harrenhal, but now he’s not. The queen sent for him.” He wore three blades on his belt, Arya saw; a longsword on his left hip, and on his right a dagger and a slimmer blade, too long to be a dirk and too short to be a sword. “King Joffrey’s dead, you know,” he added. “Poisoned at his own wedding feast.”
Arya edged farther into the room. Joffrey’s dead. She could almost see him, with his blond curls and his mean smile and his fat soft lips. Joffrey’s dead! She knew it ought to make her happy, but somehow she still felt empty inside. Joffrey was dead, but if Robb was dead too, what did it matter?
“So much for my brave brothers of the Kingsguard.” The Hound gave a snort of contempt. “Who killed him?”
“The Imp, it’s thought. Him and his little wife.”
“What wife?”
“I forgot, you’ve been hiding under a rock. The northern girl. Winterfell’s daughter. We heard she killed the king with a spell, and afterward changed into a wolf with big leather wings like a bat, and flew out a tower window. But she left the dwarf behind and Cersei means to have his head.”
That’s stupid, Arya thought. Sansa only knows songs, not spells, and she’d never marry the Imp.
The Hound sat on the bench closest to the door. His mouth twitched, but only the burned side. “She ought to dip him in wildfire and cook him. Or tickle him till the moon turns black.” He raised his wine cup and drained it straightaway.
He’s one of them, Arya thought when she saw that. She bit her lip so hard she tasted blood. He’s just like they are. I should kill him when he sleeps.
“So Gregor took Harrenhal?” Sandor said.
“Didn’t require much taking,” said Polliver. “The sellswords fled as soon as they knew we were coming, all but a few. One of the cooks opened a postern gate for us, to get back at Hoat for cutting off his foot.” He chuckled. “We kept him to cook for us, a couple wenches to warm our beds, and put all the rest to the sword.”
“All the rest?” Arya blurted out.
“Well, Ser kept Hoat to pass the time.”
Sandor said, “The Blackfish is still in Riverrun?”
“Not for long,” said Polliver. “He’s under siege. Old Frey’s going to hang Edmure Tully unless he yields the castle. The only real fighting’s around Raventree. Blackwoods and Brackens. The Brackens are ours now.”
The Hound poured a cup of wine for Arya and another for himself, and drank it down while staring at the hearthfire. “The little bird flew away, did she? Well, bloody good for her. She shit on the Imp’s head and flew off.”
“They’ll find her,” said Polliver. “If it takes half the gold in Casterly Rock.”
“A pretty girl, I hear,” said the Tickler. “Honey sweet.” He smacked his lips and smiled.
“And courteous,” the Hound agreed. “A proper little lady. Not like her bloody sister.”
“They found her too,” said Polliver. “The sister. She’s for Bolton’s bastard, I hear.”
Arya sipped her wine so they could not see her mouth. She didn’t understand what Polliver was talking about. Sansa has no other sister. Sandor Clegane laughed aloud.
“What’s so bloody funny?” asked Polliver.
The Hound never flicked an eye at Arya. “If I’d wanted you to know, I’d have told you. Are there ships at Saltpans?”
“Saltpans? How should I know? The traders are back at Maidenpool, I heard. Randyll Tarly took the castle and locked Mooton in a tower cell. I haven’t heard shit about Saltpans.”
The Tickler leaned forward. “Would you put to sea without bidding farewell to your brother?” It gave Arya chills to hear him ask a question. “Ser would sooner you returned to Harrenhal with us, Sandor. I bet he would. Or King’s Landing . . .”
“Bugger that. Bugger him. Bugger you.”
The Tickler shrugged, straightened, and reached a hand behind his head to rub the back of his neck. Everything seemed to happen at once then; Sandor lurched to his feet, Polliver drew his longsword, and the Tickler’s hand whipped around in a blur to send something silver flashing across the common room. If the Hound had not been moving, the knife might have cored the apple of his throat; instead it only grazed his ribs, and wound up quivering in the wall near the door. He laughed then, a laugh as cold and hollow as if it had come from the bottom of a deep well. “I was hoping you’d do something stupid.” His sword slid from its scabbard just in time to knock aside Polliver’s first cut.
Arya took a step backward as the long steel song began. The Tickler came off the bench with a shortsword in one hand and a dagger in the other. Even the chunky brown-haired squire was up, fumbling for his swordhilt. She snatched her wine cup off the table and threw it at his face. Her aim was better than it had been at the Twins. The cup hit him right on his big white pimple and he went down hard on his tail.
Polliver was a grim, methodical fighter, and he pressed Sandor steadily backward, his heavy longsword moving with brutal precision. The Hound’s own cuts were sloppier, his parries rushed, his feet slow and clumsy. He’s drunk, Arya realized with dismay. He drank too much too fast, with no food in his belly. And the Tickler was sliding around the wall to get behind him. She grabbed the second wine cup and flung it at him, but he was quicker than the squire had been and ducked his head in time. The look he gave her then was cold with promise. Is there gold hidden in the village? she could hear him ask. The stupid squire was clutching the edge of a table and pulling himself to his knees. Arya could taste the beginnings of panic in the back of her throat. Fear cuts deeper than swords. Fears cuts deeper . . . 
Sandor gave a grunt of pain. The burned side of his face ran red from temple to cheek, and the stub of his ear was gone. That seemed to make him angry. He drove back Polliver with a furious attack, hammering at him with the old nicked longsword he had swapped for in the hills. The bearded man gave way, but none of the cuts so much as touched him. And then the Tickler leapt over a bench quick as a snake, and slashed at the back of the Hound’s neck with the edge of his short sword.
They’re killing him. Arya had no more cups, but there was something better to throw. She drew the dagger they’d robbed off the dying archer and tried to fling it at the Tickler the way he’d done. It wasn’t the same as throwing a rock or a crabapple, though. The knife wobbled, and hit him in the arm hilt first. He never even felt it. He was too intent on Clegane.
As he stabbed, Clegane twisted violently aside, winning himself half a heartbeat’s respite. Blood ran down his face and from the gash in his neck. Both of the Mountain’s men came after him hard, Polliver hacking at his head and shoulders while the Tickler darted in to stab at back and belly. The heavy stone flagon was still on the table. Arya grabbed it with two hands, but as she lifted it someone grabbed her arm. The flagon slipped from her fingers and crashed to the floor. Wrenched around, she found herself nose to nose with the squire. You stupid, you forgot all about him. His big white pimple had burst, she saw.
“Are you the puppy’s puppy?” He had his sword in his right hand and her arm in his left, but her own hands were free, so she jerked his knife from its sheath and sheathed it again in his belly, twisting. He wasn’t wearing mail or even boiled leather, so it went right in, the same way Needle had when she killed the stableboy at King’s Landing. The squire’s eyes got big and he let go of her arm. Arya spun to the door and wrenched the Tickler’s knife from the wall.
Polliver and the Tickler had driven the Hound into a corner behind a bench, and one of them had given him an ugly red gash on his upper thigh to go with his other wounds. Sandor was leaning against the wall, bleeding and breathing noisily. He looked as though he could barely stand, let alone fight. “Throw down the sword, and we’ll take you back to Harrenhal,” Polliver told him.
“So Gregor can finish me himself?”
The Tickler said, “Maybe he’ll give you to me.”
“If you want me, come get me.” Sandor pushed away from the wall and stood in a half-crouch behind the bench, his sword held across his body.
“You think we won’t?” said Polliver. “You’re drunk.”
“Might be,” said the Hound, “but you’re dead.” His foot lashed out and caught the bench, driving it hard into Polliver’s shins. Somehow the bearded man kept his feet, but the Hound ducked under his wild slash and brought his own sword up in a vicious backhand cut. Blood spattered on the ceiling and walls. The blade caught in the middle of Polliver’s face, and when the Hound wrenched it loose half his head came with it.
The Tickler backed away. Arya could smell his fear. The shortsword in his hand suddenly seemed almost a toy against the long blade the Hound was holding, and he wasn’t armored either. He moved swiftly, light on his feet, never taking his eyes off Sandor Clegane. It was the easiest thing in the world for Arya to step up behind him and stab him.
“Is there gold hidden in the village?” she shouted as she drove the blade up through his back. “Is there silver? Gems?” She stabbed twice more. “Is there food? Where is Lord Beric?” She was on top of him by then, still stabbing. “Where did he go? How many men were with him? How many knights? How many bowmen? How many, how many, how many, how many, how many, how many? Is there gold in the village?”
Her hands were red and sticky when Sandor dragged her off him. “Enough,” was all he said. He was bleeding like a butchered pig himself, and dragging one leg when he walked.
“There’s one more,” Arya reminded him.
The squire had pulled the knife out of his belly and was trying to stop the blood with his hands. When the Hound yanked him upright, he screamed and started to blubber like a baby. “Mercy,” he wept, “please. Don’t kill me. Mother have mercy.”
“Do I look like your bloody mother?” The Hound looked like nothing human. “You killed this one too,” he told Arya. “Pricked him in his bowels, that’s the end of him. He’ll be a long time dying, though.”
The boy didn’t seemed to hear him. “I came for the girls,” he whimpered. “. . . make me a man, Polly said . . . oh, gods, please, take me to a castle . . . a maester, take me to a maester, my father’s got gold . . . it was only for the girls . . . mercy, ser.”
The Hound gave him a crack across the face that made him scream again. “Don’t call me ser.” He turned back to Arya. “This one is yours, she-wolf. You do it.”
She knew what he meant. Arya went to Polliver and knelt in his blood long enough to undo his swordbelt. Hanging beside his dagger was a slimmer blade, too long to be a dirk, too short to be a man’s sword . . . but it felt just right in her hand.
“You remember where the heart is?” the Hound asked.
She nodded. The squire rolled his eyes. “Mercy.”
Needle slipped between his ribs and gave it to him.
“Good.” Sandor’s voice was thick with pain. “If these three were whoring here, Gregor must hold the ford as well as Harrenhal. More of his pets could ride up any moment, and we’ve killed enough of the bloody buggers for one day.”
“Where will we go?” she asked.
“Saltpans.” He put a big hand on her shoulder to keep from falling. “Get some wine, she-wolf. And take whatever coin they have as well, we’ll need it. If there’s ships at Saltpans, we can reach the Vale by sea.” His mouth twitched at her, as more blood ran down from where his ear had been. “Maybe Lady Lysa will marry you to her little Robert. There’s a match I’d like to see.” He started to laugh, then groaned instead.
When the time came to leave, he needed Arya’s help to get back up on Stranger. He had tied a strip of cloth about his neck and another around his thigh, and taken the squire’s cloak off its peg by the door. The cloak was green, with a green arrow on a white bend, but when the Hound wadded it up and pressed it to his ear it soon turned red. Arya was afraid he would collapse the moment they set out, but somehow he stayed in the saddle.
They could not risk meeting whoever held the ruby ford, so instead of following the kingsroad they angled south by east, through weedy fields, woods, and marshes. It was hours before they reached the banks of the Trident. The river had returned meekly to its accustomed channel, Arya saw, all its wet brown rage vanished with the rains. It’s tired too, she thought.
Close by the water’s edge, they found some willows rising from a jumble of weathered rocks. Together the rocks and trees formed a sort of natural fort where they could hide from both river and trail. “Here will do,” the Hound said. “Water the horses and gather some deadwood for a fire.” When he dismounted, he had to catch himself on a tree limb to keep from falling.
“Won’t the smoke be seen?”
“Anyone wants to find us, all they need to do is follow my blood. Water and wood. But bring me that wineskin first.”
When he got the fire going, Sandor propped up his helm in the flames, emptied half the wineskin into it, and collapsed back against a jut of moss-covered stone as if he never meant to rise again. He made Arya wash out the squire’s cloak and cut it into strips. Those went into his helm as well. “If I had more wine, I’d drink till I was dead to the world. Maybe I ought to send you back to that bloody inn for another skin or three.”
“No,” Arya said. He wouldn’t, would he? If he does, I’ll just leave him and ride off.
Sandor laughed at the fear on her face. “A jest, wolf girl. A bloody jest. Find me a stick, about so long and not too big around. And wash the mud off it. I hate the taste of mud.”
He didn’t like the first two sticks she brought him. By the time she found one that suited him, the flames had scorched his dog’s snout black all the way to the eyes. Inside the wine was boiling madly. “Get the cup from my bedroll and dip it half full,” he told her. “Be careful. You knock the damn thing over, I will send you back for more. Take the wine and pour it on my wounds. Think you can do that?” Arya nodded. “Then what are you waiting for?” he growled.
Her knuckles brushed the steel the first time she filled the cup, burning her so badly she got blisters. Arya had to bite her lip to keep from screaming. The Hound used the stick for the same purpose, clamping it between his teeth as she poured. She did the gash in his thigh first, then the shallower cut on the back of his neck. Sandor coiled his right hand into a fist and beat against the ground when she did his leg. When it came to his neck, he bit the stick so hard it broke, and she had to find him a new one. She could see the terror in his eyes. “Turn your head.” She trickled the wine down over the raw red flesh where his ear had been, and fingers of brown blood and red wine crept over his jaw. He did scream then, despite the stick. Then he passed out from the pain.
Arya figured the rest out by herself. She fished the strips they’d made of the squire’s cloak out of the bottom of the helm and used them to bind the cuts. When she came to his ear, she had to wrap up half his head to stop the bleeding. By then dusk was settling over the Trident. She let the horses graze, then hobbled them for the night and made herself as comfortable as she could in a niche between two rocks. The fire burned a while and died. Arya watched the moon through the branches overhead.
“Ser Gregor the Mountain,” she said softly. “Dunsen, Raff the Sweetling, Ser Ilyn, Ser Meryn, Queen Cersei.” It made her feel queer to leave out Polliver and the Tickler. And Joffrey too. She was glad he was dead, but she wished she could have been there to see him die, or maybe kill him herself. Polliver said that Sansa killed him, and the Imp. Could that be true? The Imp was a Lannister, and Sansa . . . I wish I could change into a wolf and grow wings and fly away.
If Sansa was gone too, there were no more Starks but her. Jon was on the Wall a thousand leagues away, but he was a Snow, and these different aunts and uncles the Hound wanted to sell her to, they weren’t Starks either. They weren’t wolves.
Sandor moaned, and she rolled onto her side to look at him. She had left his name out too, she realized. Why had she done that? She tried to think of Mycah, but it was hard to remember what he’d looked like. She hadn’t known him long. All he ever did was play at swords with me. “The Hound,” she whispered, and, “Valar morghulis.” Maybe he’d be dead by morning . . . 
But when the pale dawn light came filtering through the trees, it was him who woke her with the toe of his boot. She had dreamed she was a wolf again, chasing a riderless horse up a hill with a pack behind her, but his foot brought her back just as they were closing for the kill.
The Hound was still weak, every movement slow and clumsy. He slumped in the saddle, and sweated, and his ear began to bleed through the bandage. He needed all his strength just to keep from falling off Stranger. Had the Mountain’s men come hunting them, she doubted if he would even be able to lift a sword. Arya glanced over her shoulder, but there was nothing behind them but a crow flitting from tree to tree. The only sound was the river.
Long before noon, Sandor Clegane was reeling. There were hours of daylight still remaining when he called a halt. “I need to rest,” was all he said. This time when he dismounted he did fall. Instead of trying to get back up he crawled weakly under a tree, and leaned up against the trunk. “Bloody hell,” he cursed. “Bloody hell.” When he saw Arya staring at him, he said, “I’d skin you alive for a cup of wine, girl.”
She brought him water instead. He drank a little of it, complained that it tasted of mud, and slid into a noisy fevered sleep. When she touched him, his skin was burning up. Arya sniffed at his bandages the way Maester Luwin had done sometimes when treating her cut or scrape. His face had bled the worst, but it was the wound on his thigh that smelled funny to her.
She wondered how far this Saltpans was, and whether she could find it by herself. I wouldn’t have to kill him. If I just rode off and left him, he’d die all by himself. He’ll die of fever, and lie there beneath that tree until the end of days. But maybe it would be better if she killed him herself. She had killed the squire at the inn and he hadn’t done anything except grab her arm. The Hound had killed Mycah. Mycah and more. I bet he’s killed a hundred Mycahs. He probably would have killed her too, if not for the ransom.
Needle glinted as she drew it. Polliver had kept it nice and sharp, at least. She turned her body sideways in a water dancer’s stance without even thinking about it. Dead leaves crunched beneath her feet. Quick as a snake, she thought. Smooth as summer silk.
His eyes opened. “You remember where the heart is?” he asked in a hoarse whisper.
As still as stone she stood. “I . . . I was only . . .”
“Don’t lie,” he growled. “I hate liars. I hate gutless frauds even worse. Go on, do it.” When Arya did not move, he said, “I killed your butcher’s boy. I cut him near in half, and laughed about it after.” He made a queer sound, and it took her a moment to realize he was sobbing. “And the little bird, your pretty sister, I stood there in my white cloak and let them beat her. I took the bloody song, she never gave it. I meant to take her too. I should have. I should have fucked her bloody and ripped her heart out before leaving her for that dwarf.” A spasm of pain twisted his face. “Do you mean to make me beg, bitch? Do it! The gift of mercy . . . avenge your little Michael . . .”
“Mycah.” Arya stepped away from him. “You don’t deserve the gift of mercy.”
The Hound watched her saddle Craven through eyes bright with fever. Not once did he attempt to rise and stop her. But when she mounted, he said, “A real wolf would finish a wounded animal.”
Maybe some real wolves will find you, Arya thought. Maybe they’ll smell you when the sun goes down. Then he would learn what wolves did to dogs. “You shouldn’t have hit me with an axe,” she said. “You should have saved my mother.” She turned her horse and rode away from him, and never looked back once.
On a bright morning six days later, she came to a place where the Trident began to widen out and the air smelled more of salt than trees. She stayed close to the water, passing fields and farms, and a little after midday a town appeared before her. Saltpans, she hoped. A small castle dominated the town; no more than a holdfast, really, a single tall square keep with a bailey and a curtain wall. Most of the shops and inns and alehouses around the harbor had been plundered or burned, though some looked still inhabited. But the port was there, and eastward spread the Bay of Crabs, its waters shimmering blue and green in the sun.
And there were ships.
Three, thought Arya, there are three. Two were only river galleys, shallow draft boats made to ply the waters of the Trident. The third was bigger, a salt sea trader with two banks of oars, a gilded prow, and three tall masts with furled purple sails. Her hull was painted purple too. Arya rode Craven down to the docks to get a better look. Strangers are not so strange in a port as they are in little villages, and no one seemed to care who she was or why she was here.
I need silver. The realization made her bite her lip. They had found a stag and a dozen coppers on Polliver, eight silvers on the pimply squire she’d killed, and only a couple of pennies in the Tickler’s purse. But the Hound had told her to pull off his boots and slice open his blood-drenched clothes, and she’d turned up a stag in each toe, and three golden dragons sewn in the lining of his jerkin. Sandor had kept it all, though. That wasn’t fair. It was mine as much as his. If she had given him the gift of mercy . . . she hadn’t, though. She couldn’t go back, no more than she could beg for help. Begging for help never gets you any. She would have to sell Craven, and hope she brought enough.
The stable had been burnt, she learned from a boy by the docks, but the woman who’d owned it was still trading behind the sept. Arya found her easily; a big, robust woman with a good horsey smell to her. She liked Craven at first look, asked Arya how she’d come by her, and grinned at her answer. “She’s a well-bred horse, that’s plain enough, and I don’t doubt she belonged to a knight, sweetling,” she said. “But the knight wasn’t no dead brother o’ yours. I been dealing with the castle there many a year, so I know what gentleborn folk is like. This mare is well-bred, but you’re not.” She poked a finger at Arya’s chest. “Found her or stole her, never mind which, that’s how it was. Only way a scruffy little thing like you comes to ride a palfrey.”
Arya bit her lip. “Does that mean you won’t buy her?”
The woman chuckled. “It means you’ll take what I give you, sweetling. Else we go down to the castle, and maybe you get nothing. Or even hanged, for stealing some good knight’s horse.”
A half-dozen other Saltpans folks were around, going about their business, so Arya knew she couldn’t kill the woman. Instead she had to bite her lip and let herself be cheated. The purse she got was pitifully flat, and when she asked for more for the saddle and bridle and blanket, the woman just laughed at her.
She would never have cheated the Hound, she thought during the long walk back to the docks. The distance seemed to have grown by miles since she’d ridden it.
The purple galley was still there. If the ship had sailed while she was being robbed, that would have been too much to bear. A cask of mead was being rolled up the plank when she arrived. When she tried to follow, a sailor up on deck shouted down at her in a tongue she did not know. “I want to see the captain,” Arya told him. He only shouted louder. But the commotion drew the attention of a stout grey-haired man in a coat of purple wool, and he spoke the Common Tongue. “I am captain here,” he said. “What is your wish? Be quick, child, we have a tide to catch.”
“I want to go north, to the Wall. Here, I can pay.” She gave him the purse. “The Night’s Watch has a castle on the sea.”
“Eastwatch.” The captain spilled out the silver onto his palm and frowned. “Is this all you have?”
It is not enough, Arya knew without being told. She could see it on his face. “I wouldn’t need a cabin or anything,” she said. “I could sleep down in the hold, or . . .”
“Take her on as cabin girl,” said a passing oarsman, a bolt of wool over one shoulder. “She can sleep with me.”
“Mind your tongue,” the captain snapped.
“I could work,” said Arya. “I could scrub the decks. I scrubbed a castle steps once. Or I could row . . .”
“No,” he said, “you couldn’t.” He gave her back her coins. “It would make no difference if you could, child. The north has nothing for us. Ice and war and pirates. We saw a dozen pirate ships making north as we rounded Crackclaw Point, and I have no wish to meet them again. From here we bend our oars for home, and I suggest you do the same.”
I have no home, Arya thought. I have no pack. And now I don’t even have a horse.
The captain was turning away when she said, “What ship is this, my lord?”
He paused long enough to give her a weary smile. “This is the galleas Titan’s Daughter, of the Free City of Braavos.”
“Wait,” Arya said suddenly. “I have something else.” She had stuffed it down inside her smallclothes to keep it safe, so she had to dig deep to find it, while the oarsmen laughed and the captain lingered with obvious impatience. “One more silver will make no difference, child,” he finally said.
“It’s not silver.” Her fingers closed on it. “It’s iron. Here.” She pressed it into his hand, the small black iron coin that Jaqen H’ghar had given her, so worn the man whose head it bore had no features. It’s probably worthless, but . . . 
The captain turned it over and blinked at it, then looked at her again. “This . . . how . . . ?”
Jaqen said to say the words too. Arya crossed her arms against her chest. “Valar morghulis,” she said, as loud as if she’d known what it meant.
“Valar dohaeris,” he replied, touching his brow with two fingers. “Of course you shall have a cabin.”

Faint and far away the light burned, low on the horizon, shining through the sea mists. 
“It looks like a star,” said Arya.
“The star of home,” said Denyo.
His father was shouting orders. Sailors scrambled up and down the three tall masts and moved along the rigging, reefing the heavy purple sails. Below, oarsmen heaved and strained over two great banks of oars. The decks tilted, creaking, as the galleas Titan’s Daughter heeled to starboard and began to come about.
The star of home. Arya stood at the prow, one hand resting on the gilded figurehead, a maiden with a bowl of fruit. For half a heartbeat she let herself pretend that it was her home ahead.
But that was stupid. Her home was gone, her parents dead, and all her brothers slain but Jon Snow on the Wall. That was where she had wanted to go. She told the captain as much, but even the iron coin did not sway him. Arya never seemed to find the places she set out to reach. Yoren had sworn to deliver her to Winterfell, only she had ended up in Harrenhal and Yoren in his grave. When she escaped Harrenhal for Riverrun, Lem and Anguy and Tom o’ Sevens took her captive and dragged her to the hollow hill instead. Then the Hound had stolen her and dragged her to the Twins. Arya had left him dying by the river and gone ahead to Saltpans, hoping to take passage for Eastwatch-by-the-Sea, only . . . 
Braavos might not be so bad. Syrio was from Braavos, and Jaqen might be there as well. It was Jaqen who had given her the iron coin. He hadn’t truly been her friend, the way that Syrio had, but what good had friends ever done her? I don’t need any friends, so long as I have Needle. She brushed the ball of her thumb across the sword’s smooth pommel, wishing, wishing . . . 
If truth be told, Arya did not know what to wish for, any more than she knew what awaited her beneath that distant light. The captain had given her passage but he had no time to speak with her. Some of the crew shunned her, but others gave her gifts—a silver fork, fingerless gloves, a floppy woolen hat patched with leather. One man showed her how to tie sailor’s knots. Another poured her thimble cups of fire wine. The friendly ones would tap their chests, repeating their names over and over until Arya said them back, though none ever thought to ask her name. They called her Salty, since she’d come aboard at Saltpans, near the mouth of the Trident. It was as good a name as any, she supposed. 
The last of the night’s stars had vanished . . . all but the pair dead ahead. “It’s two stars now.”
“Two eyes,” said Denyo. “The Titan sees us.”
The Titan of Braavos. Old Nan had told them stories of the Titan back in Winterfell. He was a giant as tall as a mountain, and whenever Braavos stood in danger he would wake with fire in his eyes, his rocky limbs grinding and groaning as he waded out into the sea to smash the enemies. “The Braavosi feed him on the juicy pink flesh of little highborn girls,” Nan would end, and Sansa would give a stupid squeak. But Maester Luwin said the Titan was only a statue, and Old Nan’s stories were only stories. 
Winterfell is burned and fallen, Arya reminded herself. Old Nan and Maester Luwin were both dead, most like, and Sansa too. It did no good to think of them. All men must die. That was what the words meant, the words that Jaqen H’ghar had taught her when he gave her the worn iron coin. She had learned more Braavosi words since they left Saltpans, the words for please and thank you and sea and star and fire wine, but she came to them knowing that all men must die. Most of the Daughter’s crew had a smattering of the Common Tongue from nights ashore in Oldtown and King’s Landing and Maidenpool, though only the captain and his sons spoke it well enough to talk to her. Denyo was the youngest of those sons, a plump, cheerful boy of twelve who kept his father’s cabin and helped his eldest brother do his sums. 
“I hope your Titan isn’t hungry,” Arya told him.
“Hungry?” Denyo said, confused.
“It takes no matter.” Even if the Titan did eat juicy pink girl flesh, Arya would not fear him. She was a scrawny thing, no proper meal for a giant, and almost eleven, practically a woman grown. And Salty isn’t highborn, either. “Is the Titan the god of Braavos?” she asked. “Or do you have the Seven?” 
“All gods are honored in Braavos.” The captain’s son loved to talk about his city almost as much as he loved to talk about his father’s ship. “Your Seven have a sept here, the Sept-Beyond-the-Sea, but only Westerosi sailors worship there.”
They are not my Seven. They were my mother’s gods, and they let the Freys murder her at the Twins. She wondered whether she would find a godswood in Braavos, with a weirwood at its heart. Denyo might know, but she could not ask him. Salty was from Saltpans, and what would a girl from Saltpans know about the old gods of the north? The old gods are dead, she told herself, with Mother and Father and Robb and Bran and Rickon, all dead. A long time ago, she remembered her father saying that when the cold winds blow the lone wolf dies and the pack survives. He had it all backwards. Arya, the lone wolf, still lived, but the wolves of the pack had been taken and slain and skinned.
“The Moonsingers led us to this place of refuge, where the dragons of Valyria could not find us,” Denyo said. “Theirs is the greatest temple. We esteem the Father of Waters as well, but his house is built anew whenever he takes his bride. The rest of the gods dwell together on an isle in the center of the city. That is where you will find the . . . the Many-Faced God.”
The Titan’s eyes seemed brighter now, and farther apart. Arya did not know any Many-Faced God, but if he answered prayers, he might be the god she sought. Ser Gregor, she thought, Dunsen, Raff the Sweetling, Ser Ilyn, Ser Meryn, Queen Cersei. Only six now. Joffrey was dead, the Hound had slain Polliver, and she’d stabbed the Tickler herself, and that stupid squire with the pimple. I wouldn’t have killed him if he hadn’t grabbed me. The Hound had been dying when she left him on the banks of the Trident, burning up with fever from his wound. I should have given him the gift of mercy and put a knife into his heart. 

“Salty, look!” Denyo took her by the arm and turned her. “Can you see? There.” He pointed.
The mists gave way before them, ragged grey curtains parted by their prow. The Titan’s Daughter cleaved through the grey-green waters on billowing purple wings. Arya could hear the cries of seabirds overhead. There, where Denyo pointed, a line of stony ridges rose sudden from the sea, their steep slopes covered with soldier pines and black spruce. But dead ahead the sea had broken through, and there above the open water the Titan towered, with his eyes blazing and his long green hair blowing in the wind.
His legs bestrode the gap, one foot planted on each mountain, his shoulders looming tall above the jagged crests. His legs were carved of solid stone, the same black granite as the sea monts on which he stood, though around his hips he wore an armored skirt of greenish bronze. His breastplate was bronze as well, and his head in his crested halfhelm. His blowing hair was made of hempen ropes dyed green, and huge fires burned in the caves that were his eyes. One hand rested atop the ridge to his left, bronze fingers coiled about a knob of stone; the other thrust up into the air, clasping the hilt of a broken sword. 
He is only a little bigger than King Baelor’s statue in King’s Landing, she told herself when they were still well off to sea. As the galleas drove closer to where the breakers smashed against the ridgeline, however, the Titan grew larger still. She could hear Denyo’s father bellowing commands in his deep voice, and up in the rigging men were bringing in the sails. We are going to row beneath the Titan’s legs. Arya could see the arrow slits in the great bronze breastplate, and stains and speckles on the Titan’s arms and shoulders where the seabirds nested. Her neck craned upward. Baelor the Blessed would not reach his knee. He could step right over the walls of Winterfell.

Then the Titan gave a mighty roar. 
The sound was as huge as he was, a terrible groaning and grinding, so loud it drowned out even the captain’s voice and the crash of the waves against those pine-clad ridges. A thousand seabirds took to the air at once, and Arya flinched until she saw that Denyo was laughing. “He warns the Arsenal of our coming, that is all,” he shouted. “You must not be afraid.”
“I never was,” Arya shouted back. “It was loud, is all.” 
Wind and wave had the Titan’s Daughter hard in hand now, driving her swiftly toward the channel. Her double bank of oars stroked smoothly, lashing the sea to white foam as the Titan’s shadow fell upon them. For a moment it seemed as though they must surely smash up against the stones beneath his legs. Huddled by Denyo at the prow, Arya could taste salt where the spray had touched her face. She had to look straight up to see the Titan’s head. “The Braavosi feed him on the juicy pink flesh of little highborn girls,” she heard Old Nan say again, but she was not a little girl, and she would not be frightened of a stupid statue. 

Even so, she kept one hand on Needle as they slipped between his legs. More arrow slits dotted the insides of those great stone thighs, and when Arya craned her neck around to watch the crow’s nest slip through with a good ten yards to spare, she spied murder holes beneath the Titan’s armored skirts, and pale faces staring down at them from behind the iron bars. 
And then they were past.
The shadow lifted, the pine-clad ridges fell away to either side, the winds dwindled, and they found themselves moving through a great lagoon. Ahead rose another sea mont, a knob of rock that pushed up from the water like a spiked fist, its stony battlements bristling with scorpions, spitfires, and trebuchets. “The Arsenal of Braavos,” Denyo named it, as proud as if he’d built it. “They can build a war galley there in a day.” Arya could see dozens of galleys tied up at quays and perched on launching slips. The painted prows of others poked from innumerable wooden sheds along the stony shores, like hounds in a kennel, lean and mean and hungry, waiting for a hunter’s horn to call them forth. She tried to count them, but there were too many, and more docks and sheds and quays where the shoreline curved away.
Two galleys had come out to meet them. They seemed to skim upon the water like dragonflies, their pale oars flashing. Arya heard the captain shouting to them and their own captains shouting back, but she did not understand the words. A great horn sounded. The galleys passed to either side of them, so close that she could hear the muffled sound of drums from within their purple hulls, bom bom bom bom bom bom bom bom, like the beat of living hearts. 
Then the galleys were behind them, and the Arsenal as well. Ahead stretched a broad expanse of pea-green water rippled like a sheet of colored glass. From its wet heart arose the city proper, a great sprawl of domes and towers and bridges, grey and gold and red. The hundred isles of Braavos in the sea. 

Maester Luwin had taught them about Braavos, but Arya had forgotten much of what he’d said. It was a flat city, she could see that even from afar, not like King’s Landing on its three high hills. The only hills here were the ones that men had raised of brick and granite, bronze and marble. Something else was missing as well, though it took her a few moments to realize what it was. The city has no walls. But when she said as much to Denyo, he laughed at her. “Our walls are made of wood and painted purple,” he told her. “Our galleys are our walls. We need no other.”
The deck creaked behind them. Arya turned to find Denyo’s father looming over them in his long captain’s coat of purple wool. Tradesman-Captain Ternesio Terys wore no whiskers and kept his grey hair cut short and neat, framing his square, windburnt face. On the crossing she had oft seen him jesting with his crew, but when he frowned men ran from him as if before a storm. He was frowning now. “Our voyage is at an end,” he told Arya. “We make for the Chequy Port, where the Sealord’s customs officers will come aboard to inspect our holds. They will be half a day at it, they always are, but there is no need for you to wait upon their pleasure. Gather your belongings. I shall lower a boat, and Yorko will put you ashore.”
Ashore. Arya bit her lip. She had crossed the narrow sea to get here, but if the captain had asked she would have told him she wanted to stay aboard the Titan’s Daughter. Salty was too small to man an oar, she knew that now, but she could learn to splice ropes and reef the sails and steer a course across the great salt seas. Denyo had taken her up to the crow’s nest once, and she hadn’t been afraid at all, though the deck had seemed a tiny thing below her. I can do sums too, and keep a cabin neat. 

But the galleas had no need of a second boy. Besides, she had only to look at the captain’s face to know how anxious he was to be rid of her. So Arya only nodded. “Ashore,” she said, though ashore meant only strangers. 
“Valar dohaeris.” He touched two fingers to his brow. “I beg you remember Ternesio Terys and the service he has done you.”
“I will,” Arya said in a small voice. The wind tugged at her cloak, insistent as a ghost. It was time she was away.
Gather your belongings, the captain had said, but there were few enough of those. Only the clothes she was wearing, her little pouch of coins, the gifts the crew had given her, the dagger on her left hip and Needle on her right. 
The boat was ready before she was, and Yorko was at the oars. He was the captain’s son as well, but older than Denyo and less friendly. I never said farewell to Denyo, she thought as she clambered down to join him. She wondered if she would ever see the boy again. I should have said farewell.

The Titan’s Daughter dwindled in their wake, while the city grew larger with every stroke of Yorko’s oars. A harbor was visible off to her right, beyond a sinking point of land where the tops of half-drowned buildings thrust themselves above the water: a tangle of piers and quays crowded with big-bellied whalers out of Ibben, swan ships from the Summer Isles, and more galleys than a girl could count. Another harbor, more distant, was off to her left. Arya had never seen so many big buildings all together in one place. King’s Landing had the Red Keep and the Great Sept of Baelor and the Dragonpit, but Braavos seemed to boast a score of temples and towers and palaces that were as large or even larger. I will be a mouse again, she thought glumly, the way I was in Harrenhal before I ran away. 

The city had seemed like one big island from where the Titan stood, but as Yorko rowed them closer she saw that it was many small islands close together, linked by arched stone bridges that spanned innumerable canals. Beyond the harbor she glimpsed streets of grey stone houses, built so close they leaned one upon the other. To Arya’s eyes they were queer-looking, four and five stories tall and very skinny, with sharp-peaked tile roofs like pointed hats. She saw no thatch, and only a few timbered houses of the sort she knew in Westeros. They have no trees, she realized. Braavos is all stone, a grey city in a green sea.

Yorko swung them north of the docks and down the gullet of a great canal, a broad green waterway that ran straight into the heart of the city. They passed under the arches of a carved stone bridge, decorated with half a hundred kinds of fish and crabs and squids. A second bridge appeared ahead, this one carved in lacy leafy vines, and beyond that a third, gazing down on them from a thousand painted eyes. The mouths of lesser canals opened to either side, and others still smaller off of those. Some of the houses were built above the waterways, she saw, turning the canals into a sort of tunnel. Slender boats slid in and out among them, wrought in the shapes of water serpents with painted heads and upraised tails. Those were not rowed but poled, she saw, by men who stood at their sterns in cloaks of grey and brown and deep moss green. She saw huge flat-bottomed barges too, heaped high with crates and barrels and pushed along by twenty polemen to a side, and fancy floating houses with lanterns of colored glass, velvet drapes, and brazen figureheads. Off in the far distance, looming above canals and houses both, was a massive grey stone roadway of some kind, supported by three tiers of mighty arches marching away south into the haze. “What’s that?” Arya asked Yorko, pointing. “The sweetwater river,” he told her. “It brings fresh water from the mainland, across the mudflats and the briny shallows. Good sweet water for the fountains.”
When she looked behind her, the harbor and lagoon were lost to sight. Ahead, a row of mighty statues stood along both sides of the channel, solemn stone men in long bronze robes, spattered with the droppings of the seabirds. Some held books, some daggers, some hammers. One clutched a golden star in his upraised hand. Another was upending a stone flagon to send an endless stream of water splashing down into the canal. “Are they gods?” asked Arya.
“Sealords,” said Yorko. “The Isle of the Gods is farther on. See? Six bridges down, on the right bank. That is the Temple of the Moonsingers.”
It was one of those that Arya had spied from the lagoon, a mighty mass of snow-white marble topped by a huge silvered dome whose milk glass windows showed all the phases of the moon. A pair of marble maidens flanked its gates, tall as the Sealords, supporting a crescent-shaped lintel. 
Beyond it stood another temple, a red stone edifice as stern as any fortress. Atop its great square tower a fire blazed in an iron brazier twenty feet across, whilst smaller fires flanked its brazen doors. “The red priests love their fires,” Yorko told her. “The Lord of Light is their god, red R’hllor.” 
I know. Arya remembered Thoros of Myr in his bits of old armor, worn over robes so faded that he had seemed more a pink priest than a red one. Yet his kiss had brought Lord Beric back from death. She watched the red god’s house drift by, wondering whether these Braavosi priests of his could do the same.
Next came a huge brick structure festooned with lichen. Arya might have taken it for a storehouse had not Yorko said, “That is the Holy Refuge, where we honor the small gods the world has forgotten. You will hear it called the Warren too.” A small canal ran between the Warren’s looming lichen-covered walls, and there he swung them right. They passed through a tunnel and out again into the light. More shrines loomed up to either side. 
“I never knew there were so many gods,” Arya said. 
Yorko grunted. They went around a bend and beneath another bridge. On their left appeared a rocky knoll with a windowless temple of dark grey stone at its top. A flight of stone steps led from its doors down to a covered dock.
Yorko backed the oars, and the boat bumped gently against stone pilings. He grasped an iron ring set to hold them for a moment. “Here I leave you.”
The dock was shadowed, the steps steep. The temple’s black tile roof came to a sharp peak, like the houses along the canals. Arya chewed her lip. Syrio came from Braavos. He might have visited this temple. He might have climbed those steps. She grabbed a ring and pulled herself up onto the dock. 
“You know my name,” said Yorko from the boat. 
“Yorko Terys.” 
“Valar dohaeris.” He pushed off with his oar and drifted back off into the deeper water. Arya watched him row back the way they’d come, until he vanished in the shadows of the bridge. As the swish of oars faded, she could almost hear the beating of her heart. Suddenly she was somewhere else . . . back in Harrenhal with Gendry, maybe, or with the Hound in the woods along the Trident. Salty is a stupid child, she told herself. I am a wolf, and will not be afraid. She patted Needle’s hilt for luck and plunged into the shadows, taking the steps two at a time so no one could ever say she’d been afraid.
At the top she found a set of carved wooden doors twelve feet high. The left-hand door was made of weirwood pale as bone, the right of gleaming ebony. In their center was a carved moon face; ebony on the weirwood side, weirwood on the ebony. The look of it reminded her somehow of the heart tree in the godswood at Winterfell. The doors are watching me, she thought. She pushed upon both doors at once with the flat of her gloved hands, but neither one would budge. Locked and barred. “Let me in, you stupid,” she said. “I crossed the narrow sea.” She made a fist and pounded. “Jaqen told me to come. I have the iron coin.” She pulled it from her pouch and held it up. “See? Valar morghulis.”
The doors made no reply, except to open.
They opened inward all in silence, with no human hand to move them. Arya took a step forward, and another. The doors closed behind her, and for a moment she was blind. Needle was in her hand, though she did not remember drawing it.
A few candles burned along the walls, but gave so little light that Arya could not see her own feet. Someone was whispering, too softly for her to make out words. Someone else was weeping. She heard light footfalls, leather sliding over stone, a door opening and closing. Water, I hear water too. 

Slowly her eyes adjusted. The temple seemed much larger within than it had without. The septs of Westeros were seven-sided, with seven altars for the seven gods, but here there were more gods than seven. Statues of them stood along the walls, massive and threatening. Around their feet red candles flickered, as dim as distant stars. The nearest was a marble woman twelve feet tall. Real tears were trickling from her eyes, to fill the bowl she cradled in her arms. Beyond her was a man with a lion’s head seated on a throne, carved of ebony. On the other side of the doors, a huge horse of bronze and iron reared up on two great legs. Farther on she could make out a great stone face, a pale infant with a sword, a shaggy black goat the size of an aurochs, a hooded man leaning on a staff. The rest were only looming shapes to her, half-seen through the gloom. Between the gods were hidden alcoves thick with shadows, with here and there a candle burning. 
Silent as a shadow, Arya moved between rows of long stone benches, her sword in hand. The floor was made of stone, her feet told her; not polished marble like the floor of the Great Sept of Baelor, but something rougher. She passed some women whispering together. The air was warm and heavy, so heavy that she yawned. She could smell the candles. The scent was unfamiliar, and she put it down to some queer incense, but as she got deeper into the temple, they seemed to smell of snow and pine needles and hot stew. Good smells, Arya told herself, and felt a little braver. Brave enough to slip Needle back into its sheath.
In the center of the temple she found the water she had heard; a pool ten feet across, black as ink and lit by dim red candles. Beside it sat a young man in a silvery cloak, weeping softly. She watched him dip a hand in the water, sending scarlet ripples racing across the pool. When he drew his fingers back he sucked them, one by one. He must be thirsty. There were stone cups along the rim of the pool. Arya filled one and brought it to him, so he could drink. The young man stared at her for a long moment when she offered it to him. “Valar morghulis,” he said. 
“Valar dohaeris,” she replied.
He drank deep, and dropped the cup into the pool with a soft plop. Then he pushed himself to his feet, swaying, holding his belly. For a moment Arya thought he was going to fall. It was only then that she saw the dark stain below his belt, spreading as she watched. “You’re stabbed,” she blurted, but the man paid her no mind. He lurched unsteadily toward the wall and crawled into an alcove onto a hard stone bed. When Arya peered around, she saw other alcoves too. On some there were old people sleeping.
No, a half-remembered voice seemed to whisper in her head. They are dead, or dying. Look with your eyes.

A hand touched her arm.
Arya spun away, but it was only a little girl: a pale little girl in a cowled robe that seemed to engulf her, black on the right side and white on the left. Beneath the cowl was a gaunt and bony face, hollow cheeks, and dark eyes that looked as big as saucers. “Don’t grab me,” Arya warned the waif. “I killed the boy who grabbed me last.” 
The girl said some words that Arya did not know.
She shook her head. “Don’t you know the Common Tongue?”
A voice behind her said, “I do.” 
Arya did not like the way they kept surprising her. The hooded man was tall, enveloped in a larger version of the black-and-white robe the girl was wearing. Beneath his cowl all she could see was the faint red glitter of candlelight reflecting off his eyes. “What place is this?” she asked him.
“A place of peace.” His voice was gentle. “You are safe here. This is the House of Black and White, my child. Though you are young to seek the favor of the Many-Faced God.”
“Is he like the southron god, the one with seven faces?” 
“Seven? No. He has faces beyond count, little one, as many faces as there are stars in the sky. In Braavos, men worship as they will . . . but at the end of every road stands Him of Many Faces, waiting. He will be there for you one day, do not fear. You need not rush to his embrace.”
“I only came to find Jaqen H’ghar.”
“I do not know this name.”
Her heart sank. “He was from Lorath. His hair was white on one side and red on the other. He said he’d teach me secrets, and gave me this.” The iron coin was clutched in her fist. When she opened her fingers, it clung to her sweaty palm. 
The priest studied the coin, though he made no move to touch it. The waif with the big eyes was looking at it too. Finally, the cowled man said, “Tell me your name, child.”
“Salty. I come from Saltpans, by the Trident.”
Though she could not see his face, somehow she could feel him smiling. “No,” he said. “Tell me your name.”
“Squab,” she answered this time. 
“Your true name, child.”
“My mother named me Nan, but they call me Weasel—”
“Your name.”
She swallowed. “Arry. I’m Arry.”
“Closer. And now the truth?”
Fear cuts deeper than swords, she told herself. “Arya.” She whispered the word the first time. The second time she threw it at him. “I am Arya, of House Stark.”
“You are,” he said, “but the House of Black and White is no place for Arya, of House Stark.”
“Please,” she said. “I have no place to go.”
“Do you fear death?” 
She bit her lip. “No.”
“Let us see.” The priest lowered his cowl. Beneath he had no face; only a yellowed skull with a few scraps of skin still clinging to the cheeks, and a white worm wriggling from one empty eye socket. “Kiss me, child,” he croaked, in a voice as dry and husky as a death rattle.
Does he think to scare me? Arya kissed him where his nose should be and plucked the grave worm from his eye to eat it, but it melted like a shadow in her hand. 
The yellow skull was melting too, and the kindliest old man that she had ever seen was smiling down at her. “No one has ever tried to eat my worm before,” he said. “Are you hungry, child?”
Yes, she thought, but not for food.

Each night before sleep, she murmured her prayer into her pillow. “Ser Gregor,” it went. “Dunsen, Raff the Sweetling, Ser Ilyn, Ser Meryn, Queen Cersei.” She would have whispered the names of the Freys of the Crossing too, if she had known them. One day I’ll know, she told herself, and then I’ll kill them all.

No whisper was too faint to be heard in the House of Black and White. “Child,” said the kindly man one day, “what are those names you whisper of a night?”
“I don’t whisper any names,” she said.
“You lie,” he said. “All men lie when they are afraid. Some tell many lies, some but a few. Some have only one great lie they tell so often that they almost come to believe it . . . though some small part of them will always know that it is still a lie, and that will show upon their faces. Tell me of these names.”
She chewed her lip. “The names don’t matter.”
“They do,” the kindly man insisted. “Tell me, child.”
Tell me, or we will turn you out, she heard. “They’re people I hate. I want them to die.”
“We hear many such prayers in this House.”
“I know,” said Arya. Jaqen H’ghar had granted three of her prayers once. All I had to do was whisper . . . 

“Is that why you have come to us?” the kindly man went on. “To learn our arts, so you may kill these men you hate?”
Arya did not know how to answer that. “Maybe.” 
“Then you have come to the wrong place. It is not for you to say who shall live and who shall die. That gift belongs to Him of Many Faces. We are but his servants, sworn to do his will.”
“Oh.” Arya glanced at the statues that stood along the walls, candles glimmering round their feet. “Which god is he?” 
“Why, all of them,” said the priest in black and white.
He never told her his name. Neither did the waif, the little girl with the big eyes and hollow face who reminded her of another little girl, named Weasel. Like Arya, the waif lived below the temple, along with three acolytes, two serving men, and a cook called Umma. Umma liked to talk as she worked, but Arya could not understand a word she said. The others had no names, or did not choose to share them. One serving man was very old, his back bent like a bow. The second was red-faced, with hair growing from his ears. She took them both for mutes until she heard them praying. The acolytes were younger. The eldest was her father’s age; the other two could not have been much older than Sansa, who had been her sister. The acolytes wore black and white too, but their robes had no cowls, and were black on the left side and white on the right. With the kindly man and the waif, it was the opposite. Arya was given servant’s garb: a tunic of undyed wool, baggy breeches, linen smallclothes, cloth slippers for her feet.
Only the kindly man knew the Common Tongue. “Who are you?” he would ask her every day.
“No one,” she would answer, she who had been Arya of House Stark, Arya Underfoot, Arya Horseface. She had been Arry and Weasel too, and Squab and Salty, Nan the cupbearer, a grey mouse, a sheep, the ghost of Harrenhal . . . but not for true, not in her heart of hearts. In there she was Arya of Winterfell, the daughter of Lord Eddard Stark and Lady Catelyn, who had once had brothers named Robb and Bran and Rickon, a sister named Sansa, a direwolf called Nymeria, a half brother named Jon Snow. In there she was someone . . . but that was not the answer that he wanted.
Without a common language, Arya had no way of talking to the others. She listened to them, though, and repeated the words she heard to herself as she went about her work. Though the youngest acolyte was blind, he had charge of the candles. He would walk the temple in soft slippers, surrounded by the murmurings of the old women who came each day to pray. Even without eyes, he always knew which candles had gone out. “He has the scent to guide him,” the kindly man explained, “and the air is warmer where a candle burns.” He told Arya to close her eyes and try it for herself. 
They prayed at dawn before they broke their fast, kneeling around the still, black pool. Some days the kindly man led the prayer. Other days it was the waif. Arya only knew a few words of Braavosi, the ones that were the same in High Valyrian. So she prayed her own prayer to the Many-Faced God, the one that went, “Ser Gregor, Dunsen, Raff the Sweetling, Ser Ilyn, Ser Meryn, Queen Cersei.” She prayed in silence. If the Many-Faced God was a proper god, he would hear her.
Worshipers came to the House of Black and White every day. Most came alone and sat alone; they lit candles at one altar or another, prayed beside the pool, and sometimes wept. A few drank from the black cup and went to sleep; more did not drink. There were no services, no songs, no paeans of praise to please the god. The temple was never full. From time to time, a worshiper would ask to see a priest, and the kindly man or the waif would take him down into the sanctum, but that did not happen often.
Thirty different gods stood along the walls, surrounded by their little lights. The Weeping Woman was the favorite of old women, Arya saw; rich men preferred the Lion of Night, poor men the Hooded Wayfarer. Soldiers lit candles to Bakkalon, the Pale Child, sailors to the Moon-Pale Maiden and the Merling King. The Stranger had his shrine as well, though hardly anyone ever came to him. Most of the time only a single candle stood flickering at his feet. The kindly man said it did not matter. “He has many faces, and many ears to hear.”
The knoll on which the temple stood was honeycombed with passageways hewn from the rock. The priests and acolytes had their sleeping cells on the first level, Arya and the servants on the second. The lowest level was forbidden to all save the priests. That was where the holy sanctum lay.
When she was not working, Arya was free to wander as she would amongst the vaults and storerooms, so long as she did not leave the temple, nor descend to the third cellar. She found a room full of weapons and armor: ornate helms and curious old breastplates, longswords, daggers, and dirks, crossbows and tall spears with leaf-shaped heads. Another vault was crammed with clothing, thick furs and splendid silks in half a hundred colors, next to piles of foul-smelling rags and threadbare roughspuns. There must be treasure chambers too, Arya decided. She pictured stacks of golden plates, bags of silver coins, sapphires blue as the sea, ropes of fat green pearls. 
One day the kindly man came on her unexpectedly and asked what she was doing. She told him that she had gotten lost.
“You lie. Worse, you lie poorly. Who are you?”
“No one.” 
“Another lie.” He sighed.
Weese would have beaten her bloody if he had caught her in a lie, but it was different in the House of Black and White. When she was helping in the kitchen, Umma would sometimes smack her with her spoon if she got in the way, but no one else ever raised a hand to her. They only raise their hands to kill, she thought.
She got along well enough with the cook. Umma would slap a knife into her hand and point at an onion, and Arya would chop it. Umma would shove her toward a mound of dough, and Arya would knead it until the cook said stop (stop was the first Braavosi word she learned). Umma would hand her a fish, and Arya would bone it and fillet it and roll it in the nuts the cook was crushing. The brackish waters that surrounded Braavos teemed with fish and shellfish of every sort, the kindly man explained. A slow brown river entered the lagoon from the south, wandering through a wide expanse of reeds, tidal pools, and mudflats. Clams and cockles abounded hereabouts; mussels and muskfish, frogs and turtles, mud crabs and leopard crabs and climber crabs, red eels, black eels, striped eels, lampreys, and oysters; all made frequent appearances on the carved wooden table where the servants of the Many-Faced God took their meals. Some nights Umma spiced the fish with sea salt and cracked peppercorns, or cooked the eels with chopped garlic. Once in a great while the cook would even use some saffron. Hot Pie would have liked it here, Arya thought.
Supper was her favorite time. It had been a long while since Arya had gone to sleep every night with a full belly. Some nights the kindly man would allow her to ask him questions. Once she asked him why the people who came to the temple always seemed so peaceful; back home, people were scared to die. She remembered how that pimply squire had wept when she stabbed him in the belly, and the way Ser Amory Lorch had begged when the Goat had him thrown in the bear pit. She remembered the village by the God’s Eye, and the way the villagers shrieked and screamed and whimpered whenever the Tickler started asking after gold. 
“Death is not the worst thing,” the kindly man replied. “It is His gift to us, an end to want and pain. On the day that we are born the Many-Faced God sends each of us a dark angel to walk through life beside us. When our sins and our sufferings grow too great to be borne, the angel takes us by the hand to lead us to the nightlands, where the stars burn ever bright. Those who come to drink from the black cup are looking for their angels. If they are afraid, the candles soothe them. When you smell our candles burning, what does it make you think of, my child?”
Winterfell, she might have said. I smell snow and smoke and pine needles. I smell the stables. I smell Hodor laughing, and Jon and Robb battling in the yard, and Sansa singing about some stupid lady fair. I smell the crypts where the stone kings sit, I smell hot bread baking, I smell the godswood. I smell my wolf, I smell her fur, almost as if she were still beside me. “I don’t smell anything,” she said, to see what he would say.
“You lie,” he said, “but you may keep your secrets if you wish, Arya of House Stark.” He only called her that when she displeased him. “You know that you may leave this place. You are not one of us, not yet. You may go home anytime you wish.”
“You told me that if I left, I couldn’t come back.”
“Just so.”
Those words made her sad. Syrio used to say that too, Arya remembered. He said it all the time. Syrio Forel had taught her needlework and died for her. “I don’t want to leave.”
“Then stay . . . but remember, the House of Black and White is not a home for orphans. All men must serve beneath this roof. Valar dohaeris is how we say it here. Remain if you will, but know that we shall require your obedience. At all times and in all things. If you cannot obey, you must depart.”
“I can obey.”
“We shall see.”
She had other tasks besides helping Umma. She swept the temple floors; she served and poured at meals; she sorted piles of dead men’s clothing, emptied their purses, and counted out stacks of queer coins. Every morning she walked beside the kindly man as he made his circuit of the temple to find the dead. Silent as a shadow, she would tell herself, remembering Syrio. She carried a lantern with thick iron shutters. At each alcove, she would open the shutter a crack, to look for corpses.
The dead were never hard to find. They came to the House of Black and White, prayed for an hour or a day or a year, drank sweet dark water from the pool, and stretched out on a stone bed behind one god or another. They closed their eyes, and slept, and never woke. “The gift of the Many-Faced God takes myriad forms,” the kindly man told her, “but here it is always gentle.” When they found a body he would say a prayer and make certain life had fled, and Arya would fetch the serving men, whose task it was to carry the dead down to the vaults. There acolytes would strip and wash the bodies. The dead men’s clothes and coins and valuables went into a bin for sorting. Their cold flesh would be taken to the lower sanctum where only the priests could go; what happened in there Arya was not allowed to know. Once, as she was eating her supper, a terrible suspicion seized hold of her, and she put down her knife and stared suspiciously at a slice of pale white meat. The kindly man saw the horror on her face. “It is pork, child,” he told her, “only pork.” 
Her bed was stone, and reminded her of Harrenhal and the bed she’d slept in when scrubbing steps for Weese. The mattress was stuffed with rags instead of straw, which made it lumpier than the one she’d had at Harrenhal, but less scratchy too. She was allowed as many blankets as she wished; thick woolen blankets, red and green and plaid. And her cell was hers alone. She kept her treasures there: the silver fork and floppy hat and fingerless gloves given her by the sailors on the Titan’s Daughter, her dagger, boots, and belt, her small store of coins, the clothes she had been wearing . . . 
And Needle. 
Though her duties left her little time for needlework, she practiced when she could, dueling with her shadow by the light of a blue candle. One night the waif happened to be passing and saw Arya at her swordplay. The girl did not say a word, but the next day, the kindly man walked Arya back to her cell. “You need to rid yourself of all this,” he said of her treasures.
Arya felt stricken. “They’re mine.”
“And who are you?” 
“No one.”
He picked up her silver fork. “This belongs to Arya of House Stark. All these things belong to her. There is no place for them here. There is no place for her. Hers is too proud a name, and we have no room for pride. We are servants here.”
“I serve,” she said, wounded. She liked the silver fork.
“You play at being a servant, but in your heart you are a lord’s daughter. You have taken other names, but you wore them as lightly as you might wear a gown. Under them was always Arya.”
“I don’t wear gowns. You can’t fight in a stupid gown.” 
“Why would you wish to fight? Are you some bravo, strutting through the alleys, spoiling for blood?” He sighed. “Before you drink from the cold cup, you must offer up all you are to Him of Many Faces. Your body. Your soul. Yourself. If you cannot bring yourself to do that, you must leave this place.” 
“The iron coin—”
“—has paid your passage here. From this point you must pay your own way, and the cost is dear.”
“I don’t have any gold.”
“What we offer cannot be bought with gold. The cost is all of you. Men take many paths through this vale of tears and pain. Ours is the hardest. Few are made to walk it. It takes uncommon strength of body and spirit, and a heart both hard and strong.”
I have a hole where my heart should be, she thought, and nowhere else to go. “I’m strong. As strong as you. I’m hard.” 
“You believe this is the only place for you.” It was as if he’d heard her thoughts. “You are wrong in that. You would find softer service in the household of some merchant. Or would you sooner be a courtesan, and have songs sung of your beauty? Speak the word, and we will send you to the Black Pearl or the Daughter of the Dusk. You will sleep on rose petals and wear silken skirts that rustle when you walk, and great lords will beggar themselves for your maiden’s blood. Or if it is marriage and children you desire, tell me, and we shall find a husband for you. Some honest apprentice boy, a rich old man, a seafarer, whatever you desire.”
She wanted none of that. Wordless, she shook her head.
“Is it Westeros you dream of, child? Luco Prestayn’s Lady Bright leaves upon the morrow, for Gulltown, Duskendale, King’s Landing, and Tyrosh. Shall we find you passage on her?” 
“I only just came from Westeros.” Sometimes it seemed a thousand years since she had fled King’s Landing, and sometimes it seemed like only yesterday, but she knew she could not go back. “I’ll go if you don’t want me, but I won’t go there.”
“My wants do not matter,” said the kindly man. “It may be that the Many-Faced God has led you here to be His instrument, but when I look at you I see a child . . . and worse, a girl child. Many have served Him of Many Faces through the centuries, but only a few of His servants have been women. Women bring life into the world. We bring the gift of death. No one can do both.”
He is trying to scare me away, Arya thought, the way he did with the worm. “I don’t care about that.”
“You should. Stay, and the Many-Faced God will take your ears, your nose, your tongue. He will take your sad grey eyes that have seen so much. He will take your hands, your feet, your arms and legs, your private parts. He will take your hopes and dreams, your loves and hates. Those who enter His service must give up all that makes them who they are. Can you do that?” He cupped her chin and gazed deep into her eyes, so deep it made her shiver. “No,” he said, “I do not think you can.”
Arya knocked his hand away. “I could if I wanted to.” 
“So says Arya of House Stark, eater of grave worms.”
“I can give up anything I want!”
He gestured at her treasures. “Then start with these.”
That night after supper, Arya went back to her cell and took off her robe and whispered her names, but sleep refused to take her. She tossed on her mattress stuffed with rags, gnawing on her lip. She could feel the hole inside her where her heart had been. 
In the black of night she rose again, donned the clothes she’d worn from Westeros, and buckled on her swordbelt. Needle hung from one hip, her dagger from the other. With her floppy hat on her head, her fingerless gloves tucked into her belt, and her silver fork in one hand, she went stealing up the steps. There is no place here for Arya of House Stark, she was thinking. Arya’s place was Winterfell, only Winterfell was gone. When the snows fall and the white winds blow, the lone wolf dies, but the pack survives. She had no pack, though. They had killed her pack, Ser Ilyn and Ser Meryn and the queen, and when she tried to make a new one all of them ran off, Hot Pie and Gendry and Yoren and Lommy Greenhands, even Harwin, who had been her father’s man. She shoved through the doors, out into the night.
It was the first time she had been outside since entering the temple. The sky was overcast, and fog covered the ground like a frayed grey blanket. Off to her right she heard paddling from the canal. Braavos, the Secret City, she thought. The name seemed very apt. She crept down the steep steps to the covered dock, the mists swirling round her feet. It was so foggy she could not see the water, but she heard it lapping softly at stone pilings. In the distance, a light glowed through the gloom: the nightfire at the temple of the red priests, she thought. 
At the water’s edge she stopped, the silver fork in hand. It was real silver, solid through and through. It’s not my fork. It was Salty that he gave it to. She tossed it underhand, heard the soft plop as it sank below the water. 
Her floppy hat went next, then the gloves. They were Salty’s too. She emptied her pouch into her palm; five silver stags, nine copper stars, some pennies and halfpennies and groats. She scattered them across the water. Next her boots. They made the loudest splashes. Her dagger followed, the one she’d gotten off the archer who had begged the Hound for mercy. Her swordbelt went into the canal. Her cloak, tunic, breeches, smallclothes, all of it. All but Needle. 
She stood on the end of the dock, pale and goosefleshed and shivering in the fog. In her hand, Needle seemed to whisper to her. Stick them with the pointy end, it said, and, don’t tell Sansa! Mikken’s mark was on the blade. It’s just a sword. If she needed a sword, there were a hundred under the temple. Needle was too small to be a proper sword, it was hardly more than a toy. She’d been a stupid little girl when Jon had it made for her. “It’s just a sword,” she said, aloud this time . . . 
 . . . but it wasn’t.
Needle was Robb and Bran and Rickon, her mother and her father, even Sansa. Needle was Winterfell’s grey walls, and the laughter of its people. Needle was the summer snows, Old Nan’s stories, the heart tree with its red leaves and scary face, the warm earthy smell of the glass gardens, the sound of the north wind rattling the shutters of her room. Needle was Jon Snow’s smile. He used to mess my hair and call me “little sister,” she remembered, and suddenly there were tears in her eyes.
Polliver had stolen the sword from her when the Mountain’s men took her captive, but when she and the Hound walked into the inn at the crossroads, there it was. The gods wanted me to have it. Not the Seven, nor Him of Many Faces, but her father’s gods, the old gods of the north. The Many-Faced God can have the rest, she thought, but he can’t have this. 

She padded up the steps as naked as her name day, clutching Needle. Halfway up, one of the stones rocked beneath her feet. Arya knelt and dug around its edges with her fingers. It would not move at first, but she persisted, picking at the crumbling mortar with her nails. Finally, the stone shifted. She grunted and got both hands in and pulled. A crack opened before her. 
“You’ll be safe here,” she told Needle. “No one will know where you are but me.” She pushed the sword and sheath behind the step, then shoved the stone back into place, so it looked like all the other stones. As she climbed back to the temple, she counted steps, so she would know where to find the sword again. One day she might have need of it. “One day,” she whispered to herself.
She never told the kindly man what she had done, yet he knew. The next night he came to her cell after supper. “Child,” he said, “come sit with me. I have a tale to tell you.”
“What kind of tale?” she asked, wary.
“The tale of our beginnings. If you would be one of us, you had best know who we are and how we came to be. Men may whisper of the Faceless Men of Braavos, but we are older than the Secret City. Before the Titan rose, before the Unmasking of Uthero, before the Founding, we were. We have flowered in Braavos amongst these northern fogs, but we first took root in Valyria, amongst the wretched slaves who toiled in the deep mines beneath the Fourteen Flames that lit the Freehold’s nights of old. Most mines are dank and chilly places, cut from cold dead stone, but the Fourteen Flames were living mountains with veins of molten rock and hearts of fire. So the mines of old Valyria were always hot, and they grew hotter as the shafts were driven deeper, ever deeper. The slaves toiled in an oven. The rocks around them were too hot to touch. The air stank of brimstone and would sear their lungs as they breathed it. The soles of their feet would burn and blister, even through the thickest sandals. Sometimes, when they broke through a wall in search of gold, they would find steam instead, or boiling water, or molten rock. Certain shafts were cut so low that the slaves could not stand upright, but had to crawl or bend. And there were wyrms in that red darkness too.”
“Earthworms?” she asked, frowning.
“Firewyrms. Some say they are akin to dragons, for wyrms breathe fire too. Instead of soaring through the sky, they bore through stone and soil. If the old tales can be believed, there were wyrms amongst the Fourteen Flames even before the dragons came. The young ones are no larger than that skinny arm of yours, but they can grow to monstrous size and have no love for men.”
“Did they kill the slaves?” 
“Burnt and blackened corpses were oft found in shafts where the rocks were cracked or full of holes. Yet still the mines drove deeper. Slaves perished by the score, but their masters did not care. Red gold and yellow gold and silver were reckoned to be more precious than the lives of slaves, for slaves were cheap in the old Freehold. During war, the Valyrians took them by the thousands. In times of peace they bred them, though only the worst were sent down to die in the red darkness.”
“Didn’t the slaves rise up and fight?”
“Some did,” he said. “Revolts were common in the mines, but few accomplished much. The dragonlords of the old Freehold were strong in sorcery, and lesser men defied them at their peril. The first Faceless Man was one who did.”
“Who was he?” Arya blurted, before she stopped to think.
“No one,” he answered. “Some say he was a slave himself. Others insist he was a freeholder’s son, born of noble stock. Some will even tell you he was an overseer who took pity on his charges. The truth is, no one knows. Whoever he was, he moved amongst the slaves and would hear them at their prayers. Men of a hundred different nations labored in the mines, and each prayed to his own god in his own tongue, yet all were praying for the same thing. It was release they asked for, an end to pain. A small thing, and simple. Yet their gods made no answer, and their suffering went on. Are their gods all deaf? he wondered . . . until a realization came upon him, one night in the red darkness. 
“All gods have their instruments, men and women who serve them and help to work their will on earth. The slaves were not crying out to a hundred different gods, as it seemed, but to one god with a hundred different faces . . . and he was that god’s instrument. That very night he chose the most wretched of the slaves, the one who had prayed most earnestly for release, and freed him from his bondage. The first gift had been given.”
Arya drew back from him. “He killed the slave?” That did not sound right. “He should have killed the masters!”
“He would bring the gift to them as well . . . but that is a tale for another day, one best shared with no one.” He cocked his head. “And who are you, child?”
“No one.”
“A lie.”
“How do you know? Is it magic?”
“A man does not need to be a wizard to know truth from falsehood, not if he has eyes. You need only learn to read a face. Look at the eyes. The mouth. The muscles here, at the corners of the jaw, and here, where the neck joins the shoulders.” He touched her lightly with two fingers. “Some liars blink. Some stare. Some look away. Some lick their lips. Many cover their mouths just before they tell a lie, as if to hide their deceit. Other signs may be more subtle, but they are always there. A false smile and a true one may look alike, but they are as different as dusk from dawn. Can you tell dusk from dawn?”
Arya nodded, though she was not certain that she could.
“Then you can learn to see a lie . . . and once you do, no secret will be safe from you.”
“Teach me.” She would be no one if that was what it took. No one had no holes inside her. 
“She will teach you,” said the kindly man as the waif appeared outside her door. “Starting with the tongue of Braavos. What use are you if you cannot speak or understand? And you shall teach her your own tongue. The two of you shall learn together, each from the other. Will you do this?”
“Yes,” she said, and from that moment she was a novice in the House of Black and White. Her servant’s garb was taken away, and she was given a robe to wear, a robe of black and white as buttery soft as the old red blanket she’d once had at Winterfell. Beneath it she wore smallclothes of fine white linen, and a black undertunic that hung down past her knees. 
Thereafter she and the waif spent their time together touching things and pointing, as each tried to teach the other a few words of her own tongue. Simple words at first, cup and candle and shoe; then harder words; then sentences. Once Syrio Forel used to make Arya stand on one leg until she was trembling. Later he sent her chasing after cats. She had danced the water dance on the limbs of trees, a stick sword in her hand. Those things had all been hard, but this was harder. 
Even sewing was more fun than tongues, she told herself, after a night when she had forgotten half the words she thought she knew, and pronounced the other half so badly that the waif had laughed at her. My sentences are as crooked as my stitches used to be. If the girl had not been so small and starved, Arya would have smashed her stupid face. Instead she gnawed her lip. Too stupid to learn and too stupid to give up.

The Common Tongue came to the waif more quickly. One day at supper she turned to Arya, and asked, “Who are you?” 
“No one,” Arya answered, in Braavosi.
“You lie,” said the waif. “You must lie gooder.”
Arya laughed. “Gooder? You mean better, stupid.”
“Better stupid. I will show you.”
The next day they began the lying game, asking questions of one another, taking turns. Sometimes they would answer truly, sometimes they would lie. The questioner had to try and tell what was true and what was false. The waif always seemed to know. Arya had to guess. Most of the time she guessed wrong.
“How many years have you?” the waif asked her once, in the Common Tongue. “Ten,” said Arya, and raised ten fingers. She thought she was still ten, though it was hard to know for certain. The Braavosi counted days differently than they did in Westeros. For all she knew her name day had come and gone.
The waif nodded. Arya nodded back, and in her best Braavosi said, “How many years have you?” 
The waif showed ten fingers. Then ten again, and yet again. Then six. Her face remained as smooth as still water. She can’t be six-and-thirty, Arya thought. She’s a little girl. “You’re lying,” she said. The waif shook her head and showed her once again: ten and ten and ten and six. She said the words for six-and-thirty, and made Arya say them too.
The next day she told the kindly man what the waif had claimed. “She did not lie,” the priest said, chuckling. “The one you call waif is a woman grown who has spent her life serving Him of Many Faces. She gave Him all she was, all she ever might have been, all the lives that were within her.”
Arya bit her lip. “Will I be like her?” 
“No,” he said, “not unless you wish it. It is the poisons that have made her as you see her.” 
Poisons. She understood then. Every evening after prayer the waif emptied a stone flagon into the waters of the black pool. 
The waif and kindly man were not the only servants of the Many-Faced God. From time to time others would visit the House of Black and White. The fat fellow had fierce black eyes, a hook nose, and a wide mouth full of yellow teeth. The stern face never smiled; his eyes were pale, his lips full and dark. The handsome man had a beard of a different color every time she saw him, and a different nose, but he was never less than comely. Those three came most often, but there were others: the squinter, the lordling, the starved man. One time the fat fellow and the squinter came together. Umma sent Arya to pour for them. “When you are not pouring, you must stand as still as if you had been carved of stone,” the kindly man told her. “Can you do that?” 
“Yes.” Before you can learn to move you must learn to be still, Syrio Forel had taught her long ago at King’s Landing, and she had. She had served as Roose Bolton’s cupbearer at Harrenhal, and he would flay you if you spilled his wine.
“Good,” the kindly man said. “It would be best if you were blind and deaf as well. You may hear things, but you must let them pass in one ear and out the other. Do not listen.”
Arya heard much and more that night, but almost all of it was in the tongue of Braavos, and she hardly understood one word in ten. Still as stone, she told herself. The hardest part was struggling not to yawn. Before the night was done, her wits were wandering. Standing there with the flagon in her hands, she dreamed she was a wolf, running free through a moonlit forest with a great pack howling at her heels. 
“Are the other men all priests?” she asked the kindly man the next morning. “Were those their real faces?”
“What do you think, child?”
She thought no. “Is Jaqen H’ghar a priest too? Do you know if Jaqen will be coming back to Braavos?” 
“Who?” he said, all innocence.
“Jaqen H’ghar. He gave me the iron coin.”
“I know no one by this name, child.”
“I asked him how he changed his face, and he said it was no harder than taking a new name, if you knew the way.”
“Did he?”
“Will you show me how to change my face?”
“If you wish.” He cupped her chin in his hand and turned her head. “Puff up your cheeks and stick out your tongue.” 
Arya puffed up her cheeks and stuck out her tongue.
“There. Your face is changed.”
“That’s not how I meant. Jaqen used magic.”
“All sorcery comes at a cost, child. Years of prayer and sacrifice and study are required to work a proper glamor.”
“Years?” she said, dismayed.
“If it were easy all men would do it. You must walk before you run. Why use a spell, where mummer’s tricks will serve?”
“I don’t know any mummer’s tricks either.”
“Then practice making faces. Beneath your skin are muscles. Learn to use them. It is your face. Your cheeks, your lips, your ears. Smiles and scowls should not come upon you like sudden squalls. A smile should be a servant, and come only when you call it. Learn to rule your face.” 
“Show me how.”
“Puff up your cheeks.” She did. “Lift your eyebrows. No, higher.” She did that too. “Good. See how long you can hold that. It will not be long. Try it again on the morrow. You will find a Myrish mirror in the vaults. Train before it for an hour every day. Eyes, nostrils, cheeks, ears, lips, learn to rule them all.” He cupped her chin. “Who are you?”
“No one.”
“A lie. A sad little lie, child.”
She found the Myrish mirror the next day, and every morn and every night she sat before it with a candle on each side of her, making faces. Rule your face, she told herself, and you can lie.

Soon thereafter the kindly man commanded her to help the other acolytes prepare the corpses. The work was not near as hard as scrubbing steps for Weese. Sometimes if the corpse was big or fat she would struggle with the weight, but most of the dead were old dry bones in wrinkled skins. Arya would look at them as she washed them, wondering what brought them to the black pool. She remembered a tale she had heard from Old Nan, about how sometimes during a long winter men who’d lived beyond their years would announce that they were going hunting. And their daughters would weep and their sons would turn their faces to the fire, she could hear Old Nan saying, but no one would stop them, or ask what game they meant to hunt, with the snows so deep and the cold wind howling. She wondered what the old Braavosi told their sons and daughters, before they set off for the House of Black and White. 
The moon turned and turned again, though Arya never saw it. She served, washed the dead, made faces at the mirrors, learned the Braavosi tongue, and tried to remember that she was no one. 
One day the kindly man sent for her. “Your accent is a horror,” he said, “but you have enough words to make your wants understood after a fashion. It is time that you left us for a while. The only way you will ever truly master our tongue is if you speak it every day from dawn to dusk. You must go.”
“When?” she asked him. “Where?”
“Now,” he answered. “Beyond these walls you will find the hundred isles of Braavos in the sea. You have been taught the words for mussels, cockles, and clams, have you not?”
“Yes.” She repeated them, in her best Braavosi.
Her best Braavosi made him smile. “It will serve. Along the wharves below the Drowned Town you will find a fishmonger named Brusco, a good man with a bad back. He has need of a girl to push his barrow and sell his cockles, clams, and mussels to the sailors off the ships. You shall be that girl. Do you understand?”
“Yes.”
“And when Brusco asks, who are you?”
“No one.”
“No. That will not serve, outside this House.”
She hesitated. “I could be Salty, from Saltpans.”
“Salty is known to Ternesio Terys and the men of the Titan’s Daughter. You are marked by the way you speak, so you must be some girl of Westeros . . . but a different girl, I think.”
She bit her lip. “Could I be Cat?”
“Cat.” He considered. “Yes. Braavos is full of cats. One more will not be noticed. You are Cat, an orphan of . . .”
“King’s Landing.” She had visited White Harbor with her father twice, but she knew King’s Landing better.
“Just so. Your father was oarmaster on a galley. When your mother died, he took you off to sea with him. Then he died as well, and his captain had no use for you, so he put you off the ship in Braavos. And what was the name of the ship?”
“Nymeria,” she said at once.
That night she left the House of Black and White. A long iron knife rode on her right hip, hidden by her cloak, a patched and faded thing of the sort an orphan might wear. Her shoes pinched her toes and her tunic was so threadbare that the wind cut right through it. But Braavos lay before her. The night air smelled of smoke and salt and fish. The canals were crooked, the alleys crookeder. Men gave her curious looks as she went past, and beggar children called out words she could not understand. Before long she was completely lost. 
“Ser Gregor,” she chanted, as she crossed a stone bridge supported by four arches. From the center of its span she could see the masts of ships in the Ragman’s Harbor. “Dunsen, Raff the Sweetling, Ser Ilyn, Ser Meryn, Queen Cersei.” Rain began to fall. Arya turned her face up to let the raindrops wash her cheeks, so happy she could dance. “Valar morghulis,” she said, “valar morghulis, valar morghulis.”

